      "identifier" : [
         "8_06911_585"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "A\u0026 N 1 A TEN CE NTS March 2, imately Fia g. XIL. No. Il 1918",
         "CANADIAN. COURIER It is, a Haný'dmade Clar VHavaniaC Cgr You save'6Oper cent.iof the' duty because cIGAR is Made in Canada by expert native Cuban cigar makers out of clear Hava.na. tobacco, wrapper and filler, and packed in Mexican. cedar \"boite nature. Here is Our Offer 'AGRAA PERFEMT We wiII send twenty-five fresh, fragrant \"Agradas\" packed in a Mexican cedar box, and shipped to you Direct from Our Cigar Factory It the f ollowing prices: Corona or Per- fecto size, box of twenty-five, $2.50; Panatèla size, box of twenty-five, $2.25; you can then .Try Four at Our Expense Smoke four \"Agradas\" when you receive them --- if they don ft please you in every way ---send back the balance and we will return your money without a wo rd. Don't wait --- get your order ini the mail to-day. You can't tose ---we stand ail the expense if they fail 'to please you. Remit by money order or cheque and mention whether you like light, medium THE.T'ORONTO RAILWAY COMPANY REPORT 0F THE PRESIDENT AND DIRECTORS For the. Vear EndIng 31st December, 1917. yOUR Directors with pleasure submit the Twenty-sixth Annuel Re, port, together with Balance Sheet aànd Profit and Leos Account of the Company, for the year euding, 31st December, 1917. While the gros income et the Company bas shown an Increase, the net Incokme has been'adversely affected owing to, increase lni wages and to;the abnormal war conditions causing the price of ail classes of sup- plies to, advance very materially. The sgross earntngs aanounted to .............. ............... $6,291,75Q.06 Cbiargm for operating, maintenance, etc........................ 3855,77.82 Net earnlniâ ....................... ............... ..... $2,476,481.24 Prom whlch net earnings there w\u0026s dedüiéted thi, s=m of - 3223918.98, distrlbuted as foflow- . . ..nd....................................... $980,000.00 Bond Interest, etc.................................. 146.887.66' 1,106,887.66 Payments te CIty. Percentage on earnings ......................... $970,512.41 Pavement charges............................. $8,840.80 General Taxes ............................. 117,678.11 1,187,031.82 The grogs passengor earnings show an Increaso of $321,057.39, being for the year $6,202,562.67, compared with $5,881,505.28 for the year 1916. When one has in mimd the. large number' eto our citizen. who are stili engaged In the war overseas, the Income from the operation of the $y$- tom. muet be recognIzed as satlsfactory. The operating charges bave increased-(a) through the large iu- crease ln the wages of conductors, motormen and shop bande; (b) owing to the tact that lu nearly every, lne of materlal, used In the upkoep of the Company's plant, the price ha. advanced greatly-in some cases the material used has increased ovor 200 per cent. The operatIng and maintenance cost for the year amounted te. thé, sum of $3,815,277.82, an Increaseo0f 4.5 per cent. ever the coat 0f opera- tien In 1916. 1The payments made to the City et Toronto amounted te the sum ef 41,187,031.32, which when compared with payments made durlng the previeus year, shows an Increase of $74,021.57. The seventh drawing of the Company's currency, and sterling bonds, under the terms of the mortgage deed dated lot September, 1892, took place oný the 2lst day of June. Under said terme the Company draws annually during the last ton years of is franchise, flve per cenit. (501) of the amount ef bonds Issued, thus reducing during the ton ýyears men- tiened, the, outataliding bonds te flfty per cent. (50%) of tue original ,issue, and ail bonds se drawn are te b. redeemed on or \u0026fter the 3lst day of August following the date ef. drawing, from whlch date ne interest is payable on bonds se drawn. Thelre ha. been drawn te date a total et $1,592,519.98. 1 Careful attention ha. been paid te the maintenance ef the. plant, rolllng stock equipmont and ether propertion of the Company. Your Directers doclared, eut of the accumulated surplus earnings of tho Cempany, feour quartorly, dividende et two'per cent. (2%). ail ot which dividend# were paid on the soveral dates net for paymeut. A regular menthily audit'sud verification of the. books, accounts and veuchers, wao made blr W. S. Andrews \u0026 Company, Chartered Acceunt- ants, and thoir certificate han been attached te, the Cempauy's balance shoot, Respectfülly submitted, WILLIAM MACKENZIE, Prouident. INCOME ACCOUNT. Grass earninas .....................................3'81291,749-06 Operating, -maintenance, etc .................... 3 Ï1,778 Interest onbonde. etc........................ 168,6 Percentag eon oarnlngs ................90514 Pavement, taxes...................... ..........2984;271.30 5.19f,949-10 $1,094,809,87 PROFIT AND LOSO ACCOUNT - Balance from lûut year ................. 1................ $5,408,873-68 Surplus earnings, atter pamn talepneinttreet, taxes, etc ....... ........................................ 9.898 Dfvldends, four of 2 per cent. each, on the psj\u0026uo capital...$ 960,000.00 Balance froin 1916 ...«............................ 15,408.873.48 Surplus carried forward ............................ 134.809.87 5548.888.65 $6,508.683.55 GENERAL STATEMENT-Year Endlng 3lst De., 1917. ASS.ETs. Rood and equipment,' real estate and buildings, includIng pave.. mnUta, etc...................... ............... $19,592,694.81 Âd.vance*g te subsIiary cornpsnles........................234521 Stores ln hand................. 25,26.28 Accounts reevbe...............193,893:43 1 496 Cashlnhd and lu bank............... .....................4804169 LIABILITIES. $23,781,243.57 Capital Stock, Âuthorized and lasued..............................3$12,000,000.00 Bouds outstanding, 4i,ý per cent. Sterling ..1,927,200.01 Bonds eutstandhig, 43% per cent. Currency ..... 1,030,000.00 297200 Short Tern Notes .. ........ ....................... 1,00,000-00 Mortgage.................................................70000 Accounts and Wages payable ....................... 7696000.00 Accrued Interest on Bonds.......................... 44,479.53 DlvIdend Ne. 86, payable 2nd January, 1918 ...........240,000.0M 8,1. Reservee: Provision for renewals and ticket redemptiox ..... $1,846,651.82 Leis charges te date............................. 1391,645.0H 3465,006.76 Insu rance~ fu4d f8or Injuriez and damagns..... 274,782.29 .05 Profit and Loas..... ........ ... .. .. . .. ....... 5,543:683-55 Certifled o w. s.",
         "CANADIAN COURIER ÀANADIAN CO)URIEr Publ\"sed fortnightly at 181 Simcoe St., Toronto, by the Courier Press, Lumited, scriptîon Price-Canada and Great Britain 31.00 per year, United States $1.50 Year, other counitries 82.00 per year, payable in advance. IMPORTANT: iges of address shouid be sent two weeks hefore the date they are to go into t. Both old and new addresses must be given. CANCELLATIONS: We that most of our subscribers prefer nlot to have their subscripionsinterrupted se they fail to remit before expiration. While subscriptions wilt flot be carried Tear over an extended period, yet unless we are notified to cancel, w-e assume ;ubscriber wishes the ser'.jce continued. NADA NOT A NO-MAN'S LAND RTICLES about Canada are flot necessarily% Cana- dian. Stories about Canada can be circulated in any Engllsh-sp.eaking country. Getting ex-Canadians live in New York or Boston to write and illustrate 'S about a country which they did their best to for- ong ago, is not getting far ahead in the business of in- reting Canada to Canadians. e say this, because such things are done in the name anada. We say it in a condition of real acquaintance the man over the border or across the \"pond,\" who profitable affection alludes to Canada as \"We, Us and And we publish the Canadian Courier as far as pos- to show that Canada is not merely a copy-mine for gn exploitation. It is the business of this paper to in- ret Canada for Canadians by being on the spot. our- ýs and seeing to it that the highest possible percentage rr production cornes right, from this country by Cana- 3 who rnay talk about Timbuctoo if theywa nt to»-but 1 they talk they talk as one of ourselves. ,nada has toolong be.en a No-Man's Land between the !h lines. It is time we took stock of ourselves. It's-ail easy to say that Canadiàn writers and artists are not 1 to those in some other ceountries. And they n.ever be in our estimation unitil we Canadians open our eye, ýat they cani really do. Il getting out a Canadian per- al is merely a matter of assembling a lot of more or elever foreign-made stuif and giving it a Canadian ,we mnight as weIl move .our plant to Detroit or Buf- or Seattle or Bostoni. We could get out a paper in any ose places with Iess effort. We could even send it into Ida with a Canadian label.. But it would not be Cana-, and our readers would' very soon find it out. NEXývT ISSUE, WE SHALL HAVE' -amouflage in Medicine Advertisementie Timne wc Abolished Fortunes from the Guli Industry other Menace of the MWo vies w Kind of \"Pub.\" on Other Corners ýo Views Quebec rs 3000 Miles Distance iChoral Conductora Contraated rand A. S. Vogt linder the Musical Microscope 'q T HE wvife of a successful young \"Well, Rena?\" Sliterary mani bad hired a buxom The girl %îusised, fumbled with lier Dutch girl to do the housework. apron, and then replied, \"Veil, you pay Several weeks passed and from. seeing me four toltars a veek-\" ber master constantly about the bouse, \"Yes, and I really can't pay you the girl received an erroneous im- any more.\" pression. \"It's net dot,\" responded the girl; \"O0gscuse me, Mrs. Biank,\" she said \"but I be viting to take tbee tottars to bier mistress one day, \"but I like to tilt titi your husband gets vork.\"- sav ýsomedings.\" Boston Transcript. the seeds sown are capable of producing sturdy, vigorous plants. Plant Rennie's War Garden Seeds and insure a fuil crop ! Oabbage pkt X ~ Y4 ~ 2 0. lb Daish Summer Roundhead .10 ..........0.90 2.75 Caulifower For Rennie's Danish Drouth- Plnig Rçasting ..........15 .25 1f.00 1.16 3.50 10.-00 lga. 1 St Paris Golden Yellow (Extra te select) ...................15 .60 1.10 2.00 On.l 5h on pkt. OZ. X lb. lb. Ar1th Rennit' 8 xatra Early Red .06 .35 1.00 .3.75 Order Radiah-Cooperle Sparkier bS6 M2 .65 2.20 *rO \u0026t-M\"tKig.. .10 .60 1.75 NOW 1 Rennie'sImpioved Beefsteak .10 .75 2.50 pktt. L PasUM-Renne's XXX Exhibition Mixture... ....25 Sweet Pea-Renniela XXX Spencer Mixture . .15 Nasturtium-Rennies Xxx Chameieon Mixture. .10 Stooks-Rennie's XXX Large Flowering Globe Mixture ..................................... 20 AA LOOK FUR \u003cMETRS* The Radial Lines Passonger and Freiglit Service Daily Toronto Richmonid Hill Aurora Newmarket Sutton Schomberg New Toronto and Port Credit Information as to rates aand schedules Iwiil bc gladly furnished by local agents or traffic depart- ment He\"d Office:- 88 King St. East, Toronto Toronto \u0026 York ]Radial Railway Rap,.. SerývÎce at FTd1M \u0026ac aonby lmitanh-I atint CauaLans for ««e hian a century. PALE ALE= LF and HALF lz XXX PORTER Mi 4St.PaulSt.West, MONTREAL oesfewugloer. 4row'. o TIi COGRVUC DREWELRT 0 LTD. Toronito: TeL. Moblide 4%6.41 If y.u change your address and de- ae tip reoetw your cWy wrdmtrt de- lay, im y* ulve yousr to Mdý MB WWN -» yr -u U",
         "CA.NADI'AN COURIER BEAIODPRDO World's Sliortage Demnands Wheax-M'orc Wheat-More Wheat. Plant aFew Dollars Each Montb, in Fields of W heat and W atcli Them. Grow. -Stay., at Home and Reap YVour Profits-Later, Settie on Your Own Wheat Farm if You Wish. Now, for the flrst time, the small investor can share in the big profits frolu grain-growing on a large scale, under modern methods, with power machinery; the maximum of production with the minimum of expense. Remember, the war must bc won by arms and farms. Go 50.000 You tan own a definite number of acres in Western Canada's largest grain farm. You can own a amaîl, medium or large acreage, on easy payments, or for cash. Your çrops will be put ini for you, harvested and marketed, VII Acresyeir by year. We will farm It for you; or, later on, -if you wanit to, you c an farm It yourself. Get the Big Free Book That -Tells the Story to5It is Illustrated-It is Interestin g-lt is TrueVihu Yo ilhave no taxes or insurance Vo pay, nor money -tied up in tractors, plows or other machiaery; nor ina \u003etebuldings or equipment, and no seed to buy, while we farm itfor you. Our Big Free Book gives ail details and nectissary Information coveriag these -points and others. famous for its record yields of 25 to, 65 tuahela of wheat per acre. Wheat is now selling better than $2.00 per bushel. Every acre of this land Io tillable, free from stones, and there 15 no0 cost for clearig. Western. Canada- Wins World's Prize For, Wheat Growin'g At Pleorla, Illinois, Sept. 23, 1917, Western Canadian Fariners walked away with the Wheat Championship of the World, and took ail the other Wheat Érizes besides at the Twelfth International Soul Products Exposition. They aliso took First Prize on Barley and Flax, aad Sweepstakes on Oats and Rye. Our Big Book will lay before you a mass of evidence that wlll show you our every etatement to be most coaservative. You simplY can't affoÊd to miss this book, -and you wiil read every word of IL. Help Yourself and Hieip Win the War Idle land grows tax buis; cultivated land la the basis of ail wealth. This'la your opportunity Vo, share In big pay- lng crops by becoming a viheat iand owner. Young mien and olti men, here is a chance to benefit yourselvcs and aid lu winnIng the war. You can, help grow wheat, and hy saving a few dollars each month, you can produce a steady income, and provide a good home for your olti age. You ought to dig down and dlg up every dollar y ou can spare to speed the piows and tura the furrows where serrled ranks of waving grain are grown In the sunshsne of Saskatchewan. Saskatchewan Io the ban- ner wheat growing province of the world--that's a fact. The Snipe Lake District of Saskatchewan la the banner whcâ. district of Saskatchewan. Ask Any Bank or Dun's or Bradstreet's Regarding This Organization 'rse:The Natlqnal Trust Companly, Limited, Toronto, ,Canada, Capital and IReserve $3,000,000 will hold titis to the land purchasse until conveyed to you. Fiscal Agents: Baker, Vawter \u0026 Wolf, Certlfied Public Ac- couaitants, witJi offices in Chicago, New York and other important cities, will uevs the recelpt and disbu'rse- ment of ail moneys and- render each Purchaser a' certlfied annual statement. Farming OrganIzatIons: J. E. HauskIns \u0026 Copipany, of Eston, Sasgkatchewafl, wll have satire charge of ail farrnlng operations. The fa-.nming wilt be done under Vhe persoýxaI direction of M[r. J. E. Hausklns. Almoat eýveryone la Western Canada wlill tell you about the succeaseul record of Mmr. Haýuqhîna in the Field Mana.gement of ,olg whxeat farm properties. Asý-oclated with him a.- comxpetent and experlencedl wheat growers, who have placed snany thousad acres of Caaadlan wheat lands - under tIhe plow. Generai Counisei; Tolman, Redfild \u0026 Sexton, of Chicago, 'who have drawn the cýontraCsa and are la charge of ail legal matters. Generai Sales Agents. Oliver £Company, Dearboma and Washingtoni Stresýts, Chicago, xnensbers oft he Chilcago Real3 Fstate Board, and of the, National Ass~oiation of Real Estate Boards, with thfrty ycars' experience la Enlist Your Idile Dollars' Idle dollars are as coati:, as' idle men, or idie lands. Thisplan la latended for those Who wish to continue in their present work, and make a profitable investmnent, wîtho'ut leaving home. Under our plan' you can start right now, and geV your share of the pFoflts, beginning wlth this Fail. LaVer on, we wiil, turn over to you, if you wish to farm it yourself, an lmproved, cultivated, producing farm, ready for you to operate. 'You are spared the hamdships and expense of pioneering, and your farm, will be in a hlgh state of cultivation when you move onto It. Send for the Book The Book-WHEAT PROFIT AND PATRIOTISM\"ý- will answer ail your questions. It is Free, and sendlng for iV will place you under no obligation whatsoever. Land values in Saskatchewan, it la freely predlcted, will double in price after the war ia over. Get la before the Big Rush, andi get your share of this Prime Wheat'Land andi what it produces, and get 1V NOW-flve acres, 'ten acres, a quarter section, hiaif section, or section-as much as you want for cash or on easy payments, and have 1V farmed for you. Remember, by sendling In the coupon aow, you wil} ho given an opportunity to participate in the profits of this year's crop. Don't wait until to-morrow, anti don't lose any fimie ln gettlng our literature. It wlll cost you nothing. WRITE NOW: Just send the coupon, or put your naxpie anti address on a post..çard, and wvewlll send Vhe Big Illustrated Book by return mail. Oliveir \u0026 Company Gener. I Sales Alients DepL . LDoarb.r n d Washngton SLeets, Chi-ago, li1., U. S. A. 1 - --FREE COUPON---- OLIVER \u0026 COMPANY, Dept. K., IDearborn and Washington Sts., Chicago, Ili., U.S.A. Gentalemen; Please sead me by metuma mail your Big IFree B-ooI-'WýHSAT PnoFTT' AND PATIOTISL\u0026\"-. telag me how I cari make money raising wheat without Ileavlng* home, and laVer 'on, If I wish, mnay own a -wheat farm. This request places me under no obligationx what- 8oever, .............. . . . . ............. .......... l............",
         "OL. XXIII. No. Il MARCH 2, 191.8 uww iî~iwiiîwitwnrnwi iw~imm~wairnwuwauumunuuiuuuuuiuz1uu IOME day soon Canadians will waeup, blink their eyes and find that they belong to one of the world's itest nations, flot in area, alone, in wealtb ani power-a regular die of a nation. he war bas probably pushed the Lng ci this day ahead at least ,cade. In spite o! the suffering, srty and misery, loss of lite. tage of materials and cost In ley, no onedoubts that the world emerge from the struggle- or. The triumiph o! the doc- es for which we are fighting, no ter how long it'takes to achieve, 'mean benoifit to every country iged. inada will probably profit more 1 any other country. Every- i points to that. Her losses. 't fromi tbose of ber dallant, sono fell in battie, are only skin- I.Canada 'bas been îsolated 1the actuaÏ hostilities. While 1 -7 7 C ANADA bas bad! enough of real estate boom anxd other kInds. Wbat we wuait now is sbip's booms and the boom of orgunized Oe.nadian industry roaring with roi national progress. Jellicoe says, wit tun August and we'lli cinb the sube. Very saule weekt, sub sikings show a 20 per cent. inereame. Bonar Lawuays we lost 6,000,000 tonnage ini 1917, and replaceti less tbau 2,000,000; andi we must bee.t tbat record. We are dosad sick of bnnkum. Lot us get d.own to business, and believe in the future of Canada as a nation. B y C HAR L 1 irope, countless villages and towns have been razed to the ground, ýCanada, 4ely speaiting, ls precIsoly the same as she was betore the war. )Pose we kept a balance shoot for Canada. On the loss accouht place the D\u003ef soldiers;' men who, would have led the nation a few years hence. The losses are only texnporary and wlll be retrieved In overflowlng measure e stupendous commercial and industrial awakenlng that bas already come. 'ertain type o! Canadian mlght say, -Why, things are dead to what they three yeai-s ago. And thon he would go on and tell about-the big land and the building býooms that characeterlzed. thoïe. days which now seem most of us lilte part of a dream. Hoe migbt go on to say that. the present trial situation in Canâ,da is due only to war orders and that on the return ice the whole fabrir wvill at. To tbat argument we eply presently. Two years hoe man from the Pacifie might truthfully have eÇplitions were critical, is remark would have dc- 4d the situation through- iL country. But the crisis been passed. The Mg; of tbe West, which bd hlfi1eserted a while Lre now~ ?ftnidlv fifllnz un the people. Building eau be post- poned for a while-until the great influx o! settiers whlch every thinking Canadian anticlpates after the war begins to fiow in. The new prosperity-the kind which we are tasting to-day-is preparing us' for those Cana:dian settiers t'ht are yet to corne to us, for those that are to reap the harvests and operate our mines and factories o! thie future, establish the towns and cities o! to-morrow. The new prosperlty means more actual industry and eventually more money ln* circulation than was ever possible ln the 'old era. Lt means more extensive cultiva- tion o! our !arm lands-matter-of- fact deeopment, and leas specula- tion. We are beginnlàg to dlg down into the fundamentals. CANADIAN 'shipyards are busy ~S L. S HA W as'never before. They 'are laying down schooners,- auxiliary !reight-carriers, motorships and steel steamshlps. A great Industry fas sprung înto belng within a few months. Factorles wkth milllon-dollar pay-rolle and pro- duction capaoltles far greater than the average Canadian býelieved 'possible a short time ago have. been created overnlght., Many o! them are working tweutyi- four hours a day to supply matorlals to hoe shlpped away on Canadfan-bulit and other bottoms. The war bas stimulated every basic Industry of the country. ln. spite of tlhe nation-wlde la.bor'shortage, the great agricultural, lumbering, minlng and fislring Industries have simply had to ptogress. Output records have been smashed. War-time conditions demanded It. Thle Canadian people have had the meanlng o! produc-tion and thrlft drllled lnto them as neyer before. Those engaged in industrial work. have hsd, to work . a litie harder and a littie longer per day than h- fore, and they have' done'L cheerfully., Canada to-day stands indu,,- trlally stronger and more pros,- perous than'at any time in lier past history.- And now comes the big que-- tion. 'What is going to happai when the newspaper headlinçi announce peace? What wiW happen to Cauada's Industrial machine when the deinand for sheils and other war supplie3 suddenly ceases? Will stagna- gradually read justs itself to the naw conditions'lmposed by - peace? WIII thte roturn )! overseas soldiers clog the labor markeot? Will Qq.mmodity prices undergo a shock? Wl» Canada linger in preparlag lier- self for the new ara until other",
         "CANA DIA COURIER matter .when the war ends, Canadiâ's war-timie effi- cleucy must go on. The factory wheels muat keep turning. Shipa, must be launched lu greater numbers than before. Far mers, tbrougbout the land must con-' tinue their puce, ciinging to thia one slogan-blgger crops. Lupbermen cannot afferd to lag lu their activity. The output of\u003c tbe mines-and fisheries mnust not slacken. B ECAUS_ý-ftg the war there wllb a demand trade war will' be on. Equipmenit for victory will consiat of two main factors-labor and sea-going tonnage. 1The return, of 400,000 soldiers to civilian occupations, if the pr.ocess ls worked out methodi- cally, will solve tbe Canadian labor problem, and it wilI ibe. furtber, solved by a' tremendous post-war immigration to thia country. The second factor. that of tonnage, dependa on thevokce and labors of, the Canadian people tbemselves. If Canada la, found ivitb a weak merchant marine, then abe must of uecessity drop out of the running. Especially is thut a fact since 1Uncle Sam launcbed his' greatý ship- building programme to bridge the Atlantic with sbips. Tbe United States bas learned the leason of isola- tion. Lt bas ut lat thrown off the'sheil wbich for neurly haîf a century beld it down to a policy of internai development and scorned the idea cf over- seas expaion, not only ln colonization, but in trude. Now the Amerîcana are getting a new perspective. Merchant marine and forelgu commerce are the twe main foci of tbe picture. Canada, ufter the war, sbould create a market for MuIde-in-Canud'a goods lu every country oh he world. Canada la too big to remain by itself, self-cpontained, reserved and self-complacent. That la not the theory that made the British Empire. Canada as got to muintain un open door-an open door to the flow as well as to the ebb. Let the ebb, tide be people, and the outfiow-let thut be artilfes of commerce, carrled lu Canaudian slips. Canada's Industriel leaders shouid lay their plans so as to reduce to a minimum the time necessury. for readjustiug their, planta te peace-time require- ments. And the Goverument sbould be unanimous and determined, that sblpbuilding must be given every encouragement. Shilpa will be, by far the moat effec- tive weapons in the war cf peace. Alter un exhaustive survey,' the Dominion Com- mer 'cial Intelligence Service bus reacbed thîs con- clusion: Expert of Canadien manufactures can be main- talned ut the wur levei when the demand for muni- tions and other war supplies ceuses, if Canadlan manufacturera lu general will really study the possi- bîlities of export trade and organize for business lmmedlutely after the war. Great as Cana'Ia's ex- porta have been durlng thxe war, thxe total la amal comnpared with Germany'à export trade theé year before wur began. To secure suffîcient overseas business to replace the present war orders, Canadian mianufacturera weuld only need. te capture a small percentage of Germany'a former trade lu markets where German 'goods\" are likely to be unpopular for many years. Canadian manufacturera will be able te meet Eure- peau gooda fl more equal competition after the war, because the European workingman ha beeu accus- tomed te hlgber wuges during the war. We shall net be competing wltl the sweatshop. European wagea after, the war wfll more nearly approximate those paid here. Great naturel advantages are possesaed by Canada that are shared by ne other country. We bave aimoat a mouopoly of severul important minerais, the biggest foreat reserve and the. greateat grain country lu the world. Cunadians den't appreciate the advantage that the possession of unlimited cheup waterpower gives us over a country like Germany, for instance, wbich almost entirely lacks waterpower. There are stili éome people left who'scoif ut the idea, o! Canada competing lu foreign markets with the older-estublished powera of the world. The posi-ý tion o! those people la precisely the samhe as those who lesa than twenty yearsaugo laughed ut the ide of Canada supplylng !ts own manufactured tleeds, and lad'rut »n the bîgh achool geography books of the time the fact that Ontario was \"net adapted te mànufacturng.\"~ Here ls tbe anawer te those peasimista for the years 1911, 1913, 1917: Manu- Farm. Forest. Fisherles. Mines. factures. '$134,646,458 $45,439,057 $15,675,644 $42,787,561 ,$85,283,118 1912. 194,930,040 43,255,060. 16,32,6,721 57,442,546 43,692,708 1917. 352,543,470 51,'271,400 ý22,377,977 66,589,861 242,034,998 Iu 1911 manufactures atood feurtx on thé liat. La-st yeur they were second, nearly seven timea as great as the manufactures of 1911. It was net until 1916 that Industrial Canada really bit its stride, because lu the year before the munTr- fuctured exportsa, .while higber than those of any previous year, were more than two and a half times less than these of 1916. The growth, of experts of manufactures would, make an even more remarkable sbowlng if ail foods prepared ln factories and ferest producta that underwent some proceas lu the mills were,, ai se iucluded. Munitions and war supplies, e! course, smalle 'd the total, bùt the figures go to show the rel capability o! Canadiau industry when there la the demand. One o! the -resulta of the war la certain te be the creation of 'aà distinct imperlal preferëee on re vised conditions, Iu thîs. scheme Canada, on account e! her geographical position and ber oapabil.itiea of production, will -share bounteously. The Trade Agreement b etweeu Canada and Australla lashad t'le eff ect of forcing the trend o! ýtrade'between tbe two dominionse steadily upward, and an extension Of t\u003ehis,\u003ereeiprocity between Canada and other parts Of the Empire, as weil as wîth the motherland,, muat bear the' samle fruits. The Oriental field stands ready for Canadien exploitation, and while China is likely to be the boe of contention among balf a dozen world pewera bent on extension of trade, Canada's geographicul situa- tion wiil be ot tremendous advantage-advantage that cun be emphasized by Erhips. As to markets ln the motherland: l3ritaln Importa 11,0,00,000 cwt. of flour annuully, of whicb haif cornes from Canada. Canada is eminently lu a poition to expert foeur, as with an annuel capucity of 30,000,000 barreis per annum and an approximate home con- sumption of leas than 10,000,000 barrels every year, our mills must grind very largely for expert. Inivestigations have disclo sed that freigbt rates are practically the dominuting fac ter lu, t 'ho extension of Canadian 'business lu foeur. Becuse Canada wa$, dependenton the ships of other countries and hadl nope of ber own, she was heipless at the outbrealc o! war, and the special trade commission sent tO Europe lu the spring of 1915 reported that, In taking a general view of the transportation be- tween Canada and the Âllied nations, it would appear that the established lines have not given that service ln linking up Canada wîth other countries that might bave been expected. It bas been felt for some yearf tbat the rates of freight bave been of sucb a character as to seriously impair tbeir usef ulness as a meails o! developing Canadien trade. Canada's ocean trans- portation will have to be completely reorganlzed if the Dominion la to derive the fullest benefit froxu her natural resources and manufactured products. Devastated France and Belgium will need the Pro- ducts of Canada, especially ln -the way of building inateriais. Here, again, booma the question of sa5 transportation, for the ships suitable for carryiilg timber. wbeat and pulp are not adapted te ,oarrying back silks, gloves, perfumery and other articles whidl express the genlua o! the French people and whlch will conatitute the bulk of tbe French Importa tO thie Dominion. 'It ls simply a question of shIPs, Ships, SHIFS! They must be bad, and ln gre3at quantîties. Evidence that after tbe war Canada muy steop lu1 and corral business, hitherto untoucbed la lnexhaust- ible. There can be-only one conclusion reacbed after an examination of facts. The opportunity la there, and everyone must belp Canada make tbe best of 1t. There is a part that can be played by every mlalt woman and cblld to make this wonderful land of our'3 stîlI greater by making it their ambit -ofn to see Canada proaper 'ab-oad as welI as at home. 1t,, is a dutY which iwe'owe thé eountry, ourselves auad those wbqo fougbt and perisbed that Canada migbt go forward. Canada la too great a jibtion to c=fitne ber great' nesa wltbin ber own bordera. Make way for ber! TWO0 SI1DE S TO0 BOLSHEVI KI SM T,4HETHER the Roisheviki movement will become a world movement or back itself ingloriously off the stage seemas to be the mfost pressing speculation just now. Constantine Nabokof t who represents Kerensky interests in London says, Trotziy pro-German and predicts that hunger will eliminate the Bolsheviki movement ti a few weeks. The Copper King from Moni says, Rolshevikism is going to0 laat -long enough any way to use up a million dollars which he has subscribed to the movem 0ON the rlght, Col. Thompson, the cop- per king, who was in~ Petrograd for six months last year and was se im- pressed by the oounter-revolutlon that h. believes the Boisheviki should be fi- nanced as the greatest living foe to auto- cracy the world over. He sys the Bol- shevlkI are certainly flot pro-Qerman; anlythlng but that. On the loft, morne of the Circassian Tartars who have subscrlbed their lives to uproot the Bolshevlki. On' the rlght of the picture le Prince 1kagratan, the last descendant of the Circassian ne- biluty that once ruled the Transcausian",
         "CANADIAN CO0URIER REE PICTURES BBELLE DOBIE SSOCIATED witb tbree meu and three pictures .is a chalu, of iuterset that inspires a f ew fragmeutary recollections. The cts are (M4ajor). Jobu Pringle, lain of the Highlaud Brigade. dians, France, (formerly of, the a);' Lieut. John Prnugle, late of By, Cape Breton; and Vilhaljmar fleson, the canadian explorer, ln ar uortb, Who bas reached' Fort ni, Alaska. îile each man ilinstrative of the Poss'esees etrong ludlvidnality. \u003e)ubt had it been tbeir good for- te mneet, chat, compare expert- ans.d exchange luterests lui snch sas Mas eey Hall, Toronto; AI- Hall, London, Eug., lieteners I. have been reudered spell-bound, carrylng away impressions'neyer \u003e0 forgotten. However, It wll rbe the fate of \"the tbree\" to Two may meet, but Lieutenant Pningle (sou of Major Pringlé, on dnty lu France), who gave hie Il the Battie of'the Somme, uow Pies a spot lu the \"Garden o! Il and field of Honor lu France. 70 years .ago, wblle lu Victoria, I called to see an old girl frieud, Mary Riter Hamilton, uow a Iated artiet. Sbortly atter 1 en- 1 the studio, lu iookiug at a pic- 1 reniarked lun rathen au abrupt fier, \"who'e the man witb the iii- dting auburn hair?\" The artist ed, \"That's Stefausson, the ex- 'C who outfitted. lu Victoria, be- 8tarting out on bis jouruey to tbe AiàBOUT PEOPLE C ANADIANS of ail sorts are welcome s.ubjects to, thisdepart-, ment. True storiettes and anecdotes are all useful. If possible send pho tographs. -Editor. LORD ABERDEEN AND THE REPORTER By ýWILL FROST W H EN Lord Aberdeen was Goveror-General of Canada hie occasionally reslded ln Montregat accompanied by Lady Aberdeen and bis, retinue. It was duriug one of his earliest sojourus la that clty that the Cub' Reporter was \"wished, upon hlm\" by an enterprisIflg local uewspaper. As, defiued by bis City Editor the cub'e duties were to keep track of His Lord- Lehip-wbere hie weut, what bie did,» and what he said-illustrated by pictures from lite made on the spot by \"Our'Own Special Artist.\" The euh described himself as an Artist-Journalist; the victime of bis peu and pencil described him strongly otberwise. So it came to, pas that every- where His Lordship went, the Cub was sure to, go. Ris Lordship's doiug, ilue- trated, bad appeared in the paper quite a wbile before the victim reallzed that he was sbadowed by a recording fiend. As the alleged portraits of 111e Lord- sbip drawn by the Cub Reporter generally, resembled various types of crim- i l, it ie possible that they passed unrecognized. Qne afternoon the Oub entered the office burriedly, bis chin lu the air, slap- ped hjts copy on the desk,' elapped bis kuee and guffawed. *'Listen,\" bie cried, \"Lîsten to thie, ye low\"boru caitiffs. You know,\" be coutinued, \"that Lady Aberdeen was to open that sale of Irish linen in Blank's store this afternoon, and His Lordsbip was to speak. Well, of course, 1 wae there. The place, wae jammed, but no Lord Aberdeen. 'Yes,' said Her Lady- ship, 'he eboùld be here, he's very late. 1 can't see hlm anywhere.' So I took uùp a coigno! vantage behind one of the counters and got out my sketch-book. You fellows 'know how it Ie wheu you get up against the bar counter for a drink, you rest one foot oun tbe rail belo w. Force of habit. I felt around under- the conuter witb my foot and rested it ou a bale of cloth. \"«Oh, boys! The bale equirmed and I pressed barder to steady it. Sud- deuly a baud clutcbed my leg and a voice said, 'Hist!' I looked under-aud met the basilisk optlc of Hie Lordshlp.\" \"'Go away,' he said, in that toue of 'get to, blazes out of bere you meddllug lilt.' Of course I etarted lu to apologize. \"'Keep quiet,' be said, 'this le a joke on Her Ladysblp.' \"H-e crawled out, wlplug the dust off him, got 1into the crowd aud outo the platforiu amid cheere aud laugbter. So you eee,\" concluded the Cub, wltb the air o! a victorlous prize-flgbtpr, \"It le flot ever uewspaper mau cau boast of baviug bad the neck o! a belted earn beneatb bis heel!\" Arctlc Circle.\" While lu Victoria, Stefausson was eutertalued at Goveru- ment Honse, and ln the studio men- tioued. Wbile bie was maklng au inci- dentai cali at Mrs. Hamiltou'e studio the artiet cangbt an excellent sketch lu. pastel of Stefansson. Aften bang- iug for a wbile It was taken to an es- tablishment toi be framed. Two years alter (lu June, 1917), 'f made anbther caîl at Mrs. Ifamiltou's studio, lu Victoria. Oue of the firet paintings 1 looked for was that of Stefanseon's. \u003eNot seeiug the picture I said lu the ipsual curioslty of WO- man' \"Wbere le Ste!ansson's pastel?\" The artiet Informed me that ebe bad sent ît as_ a glft \u003eto bis dear old mother lu Saskatchewan. The antiet tbought that the explorer bad doue so inch for Canada, the 'proper spot for the pIcture wae lu bis home. Sbortly after the presentation of tbe gît t, Mrs. Hamilton received a very sweet letter o! acknowledgment froin. Mrs, gte!- ausson, tbanklug ber for, ber thougbt- fuluess. Wblle makiug the sarne eall I no- tlced hanglug lu almoet tbe same spot, a plt¶re o! Major Pningle, sketcbed wblle he was making a bnrried caîl. en route to Seattle, Waeb., Mre. Ham- ilton having been a member of bis Port Arthur Preebytenlan congrega- tion. To add another lluk to the chain of interest, the wrlter had seen the îcrultiug lectures ore, durlng wblcb ne Highland uni- ai the pîcture. On ýtorla, just three moutbs later, I fond ou my writiug desk a pbotograpb of bis son, Lieu- tenant John Pringle, wbo liad fallen lu the Battle of the Somme. This boy, wbo iubenited bis fatber's gifts for walklng tbrough the wilds, traveled (by foot) five buudred miles tbrongb the Peace River district to Edmonton, Alberta, to offer bimeelf for ovenseas se -rvice. Spea-kiug of Major John Pringle, wbo le stili dolng excellent work as cbaplain, lu 'France: No man lu Can- ada, Great Britain or the Yukou, bas wonked barder lu the intereets of meu'e souls (and womeu's too). Dur- lng bis five yenrs' labon lu the Yukon be was often kuown to tun bar-roome and worse places inito temporary prayer-meetiug roome, lu order to ap- pnoacb meu, thus makiug mauy cou- verts wheu ble otherwlse might not have liad an opportunIty o! approacb- iug tbem. Major John Prînglo le es- peclally glfted lu !erretiug k-t Cana- dians lu faraway places, partlcularly persouMl friends. Juet a few days ago I was hailed ou the street by a womau frlend wbose basband ie a patient lu a French bospital, to tell me \"in,. maklug hi4 mnniserial calîs on the pallent, Major Fringle called ont 'Are tiiere auy .Canadiane bei-e?' The patient~ replied, \"Yes; Inm fromn Port Arthur, Caniada; my namne *is Rogers,' .Major Prnl sald. 'Do you kuow W. C. Doble, the polIce mnagie- trate?' Rogers auewered, 'Yes, I do, offlcially but-»ot ecriminly; Iw~as fris assistant.'\" It is ln mest such~ latereet- luge was he-ferrets out, mny o-thon Canadians ln another sphere. CLIMBS TREES AT 73 By DOUGLAS BUSH N Nan age wheu teachers, like poon Joe, are \"*always ou the move,\" a period of tbirty-one yeýans as bead- master of one echool le something' to be proud of. That leî the record of J. S. Jainieson, M.A., wbo lu 1914 re- tired from the principaiship o! the Morrisburg Collegiate Inistitute, wbich be haed beld continuonsly since 1883. Next to a newly-elected M. P. no one bas more ueed o! Infiuite patience aud tact than the principal of a bigh school. That Mr. Jamieson bas au inexhaustible supply o! both was shown at the tîme, of Ihis retirement, wbou graduates of ahl ages, froin far and near, united to do hlm honor. Bora at Kars, lu 1844, Mr. Jamie- son, like many another lu those daye. dlvided bis early yenrs betwoen farm- Ing and etudyiug. It le cbaracteristic o! such men that neither occupation enffered. After graduatiug from' Vic- toria College hie taught in several blgb scbools before going to Morrisburg. Wbeu, la the teacbing profession, a nman holde the saine position year aiter year, nine times ont o! ten h le grows stale. Mr. .Jamiesou's, case was tbe tenth. With hlmi lncneasing years meaut no decrease lu work; hie was an ablen principal lu 1914 than in 1883., Que caunot mensure the achieve- mient o! such a man. Mn. Jamieson was no mere overseer o! studios-; hie watchword wvas \"education,\" flot \"crammiug.\" Examinations were a minor consideration, lits aim wvas to make 'boys and girls useful and up- rigbt citîzens. In school and'out hie was 'am father to bis pup~il; ail over Canada 'and the United Statesi are men and women who look back witb gratitude to the Inspiration o! bis words or (more ofteu) hie example. As -Mackintosh sald o! Dugitld Stev*- art, he \"breathod tbe' 'lové eof vir'tue iuto -wbole géneratious o! pupils.\" There le uo grea-ter praise. People say that to kepep youug'oue, miuet bave a hobby altogether, outside one's work. Mr. Jamieson' nover bad a bobby-except bis echool-but there le no doubt about bis- youtb. Unique among teachers for continu- onus service, be le unique~ lu another polut-.o drives a car, and moroover, ltuows wbere the grease-cupe are situl- ated. Mn. Gladstone lu bis old age was content to take exercise witb ah axe; when Mn. Jamioson, at seventy- tbnee, desîres relaxation, ho climbs a ftfty-foot niaple ýnd saws off~ a fev limbe in mnexory oî bis boyhood.",
         "CANADITAN ('OUBTERF O LD MACHO VAI knew this migh- ty r*ver of the nortk t had car- ried faim bravely in the spring-time of life. The river was hi. friend, the great river with its rap- ids above, its cat- aract and the whirlpool below. 77aen - The Trail. D, awlnig bg T.W. McLean Cfolire '0LD maxi caxi't get up traits this wj\u003e,.ter,\" dTe. \u003cMdl aifa a.ge\"dmnway fo TomeTatiCatmar'etno gOlidmaxi ayb.fo hunt 'or .trap. Just sit andi \u003croak 111e frog on blanket all day. Better o14 maxi stay here.\" \"Un-xi-n,\" agreed Tom Tait Cat's squaw. \"Old Mani OwI. stay. Better.\" '\"We say nothlig ta oit maxi af it. Better,\" eau- tioxiet T' m. Tait Cat. \"Maybe get mari anti make Wintigo. Better just leave hxim. Chuirexi stay wltli hlm; one on. week, one nezt. Maybe soon die.\" \"Un-n-fl,\" came the crooniug assexit of the squaw again. \"Maybe sooxi die.\" 014 Mani 0w! Just wltliout the. shack door gave utterance ta an expietîve lin Engilai for which there is no Qbjlbwa synonyni. \"Dirty rats\" É nttrd \"They wouid leave aid Macliova that they call the Owl on'tlie'réservation whie they go traY andi citase inoose. ,Take kids, take dogs, but leave oid chie! ta die, Dity rats!\" 0 Id Maxi Owi aquatteti upoxi a dirty bianket to the so4ltb. side of the reservatlon shack, pufflng medi- tatively at a straight wooden pipe anti absorblng the mornlng warnith. A colored Hl. B. blanket wai wrapped about his shoulders. for lie was very oid- trading posts, who kuew nothing, andi careti less, about bis past giory, ordered him from their dooS- ways. He bail ta b. led about- li the open by lia graxidehildrexi. Oid Maxi Owi kxiew thlngs would have been dit- ferent if bis oidest son, Peter Chie!, were home. But Peter ChIef was away ta tlie Great War across the big waters, aid Peter Cbief's squaw now 'ived apart in style on bis asslgxied'pay-, 8h. would have noue of the. pauper, Oit Man~ Owi. To\"day It dawxied ou Oid Mani Owt w.itl tliree-fold bitterness that bie was a nobody li thue village. Tlie *tieed-s af hi. yoxith andi strength countecd for xiotbing xiow. . The world had taken \u0026Il of what lh. lad te gi-v. andi when hie was no long~er usefLul was about ta tosa him aside as se .much buxuan garbage; its people were lipatlently waltixig for h1ni ta die sa tliat 'they\u003e Lapit puat him ont o! their way, Peter Chie!, Whniaxw anid thon sent part o! lis soldier's pay ta buiy hiil tobacco and warni clatit., was not there ta -offer om! rt. He was u\"eteas, despiseti anti alan. The others tolerat.d him aniy because tbey feared lie wouid muke of lis spirit a Wiutigo ta brlig vengeance upon thein. The. oid huntei, llstened ta the preparatiaus for departure wlth a hezyy heart. Tt was the first season since away back Inta lis dlii boyiiood pa3t that he would not go up the traits. Stoic tbough hoe appeared w1thout, the sb.ock o! It, the siraIn of the. bitter tumuit wlthln eeemeti \u0026bout to sxiap his reason. WAVE a! O14 Mani savage abandon swept upaxi e spraxig t. hLis f..i. Straight In bis robust day's, bis 6llnd openeti bis mouth andi burst pictured from ît lonely lâkes anid racing rivi where stalked.the mighty moose and the nimb Laribou-bearded mauntain ranges wherc tl black bear iumbered and the gauint, grey wc \u003c padded eilently. Aiways it began wlth trib 'ut to the picturesque and i the, beauties of natut - welled li its descriptions , f the might mani, grieved over bis oncoming infirmiti' and swooxied to a wail that told, of death ai the. despalr of despair. Tom Tati Cat's household stood wtthout LI shac\u003c and listened in silence tilt the aid mW hati fiuished andi again talten up his pipe. \"Olti Man Owi sings,\" said Tom Tat C, \"He 18 well?\" \"ýOld Man 0w1 15 well,\" answered the othE \"He asks xiothing but to lve here tilt lie dies \"Un-n-fl,\" clioruseti Tom Tati Cat's feula househoid, \"Olti Man OwI wiii tive beret lie dîes.\" Tr HE day foilowing their departure, Old M SOwl appeareti aýt the agent's office, ledI littie Joe, ls graudson. He produced a bit inuer birchi bark about the size of a postc.ar on which was depicteti with colored basit staixis the figure of a mani waiking lIn stars at Coudis. He indicated. for the agent to wTt bis namïe at the, bottom of it. \"Maybe send to Peter Chie! at Big War ~ old man?\" hie requesteti. He smiied, bis blil eyes turned trustingly to the white mnan. \"But what the thunderation does tliat fur\"l picture mean?' asked the. puzzted agent. \"Oh, Just letter fromn oli man,\" wasr the U eniiglitening reply. \"Peter Chie! lie know.\" \"Oh, ail riglit, -then, '\" and the agent stu\u003c thie bit of bark in an envelope andi tlirew on lits desk. At the, dooi' the aged bliud maxi turne - \"Maybe wôu't forget ta s.xid old man's lett to Peter Chie!,?\" lie ,pleadeti. \"No, VIl iý rget.\" The next moruing OPd Man 0wl catieti litt - Jae at sunrise. \"Must get ready,\" lie auuouinced. '5Long wSI Take can0e, take gun, ta ke packsack and mea fd many days. Long waik.\" Little Joe asked'na questions. Tliey wexit withl the sliack, where the oid manl tluug bis arm te fi Northi. \"See long blg» hli against sky?\" hie aslked. TI boy affirmed lie diti. -\"Se. mnany little hlls runir to big bli otlier side of muskag? Un-,n-n?. Tra there. Oid man go to big li; lîttle Joe lead way \" And so they set out, the boy lu the leati tuinil the packsack andi Otti Man OWI's aucient carb1ne, ar the old Indian behlnd packing the, canoe. To tC ortiinary eye, lu the deceptîve Northern .light, LI heiglit of landi iud.tcateà as bis objective waxiid appel but a few miles away. As a mnatter of fact, it w2 twenty. Tbree days they trudged over an oid, loug-disusE trait, ou bis ofý rattling shale, tliraugli sprling tliigh-wearylng muskegs, across wlidfall labyrlilti and over weird, burnt-ov.er wastes. -Nlghts th'~ camipet Iu the. open before a tended fir., roli iu their biankets. No fancied dangers si*ab- hll the whiite traveler in the wQods interfred -wltIC slumbers of these children of the wld. The f ourtli day they pasmed ove the tip ofC height of land. An hons later they desceneq -t L shores of a mlghty river, seldom i slted nwd% by Indiaxis and @6ç yet practically uxiknown to white maxi. The canoe was dropped into is element. In bow were placed the old man's rifle and an ode lection of belonglngs Old Maxi 0wl fished frorf packsack, rusty o14 trape, -bis huxiting kiÉean few old trlnkets Inclutied. The Indlixi lad's eyes w.re giistening as eg fareweii and the old mn pushed bis gc.noeWe d sweetness o! tone, inhant. now low and",
         "ýCANADIAN COURIER TORY,,PICT'URES by the WAR ARTJST Interesting and Varie gated Episodes in Five Countries 0 W could any Tommie keep his face straight when he sees his Captain pantominiing as Cinderella? Vvar has its funny side, ~ sometimes. W IFE of the Japanese C o n 9 u I-General in j New York working as head ~ ~ of a Japanese ned Cross Auxiliary Branch, who al- ready have made about 2,- 000 articles for use at the front. Many of the work- f ers are among the most prominent social figures from Mikado-Land. R USSIAN women ifl a Pctr ograâd milk queue. T HEY caîl this a strangebillet in France. Turn thie page around ond'you get an Ides of what it was-omething like a silo. This cylindrical hotel contains several floors, but no windows. AFTER ail, as 'chose Tommnies know, nothlng like a donkey for a real joy-ride. T IS old lady was compelled by the GArmans to move aIl her beiongings -in a wheel-barrow-to what place of refuge, heaven oniy knew.",
         "CANADtAN COURIER C OMPULSORY service bas bogun te sàhow us Medical Science 's Opportun ity what perceutageé of fiat-foots. anaoïmics, rheu- e matics and syphilitics we have in this country. For a country only a goneration or two away from Russia Needs Benevolent Des pot the bush and the prairie trail we soom to, average e pretty higis. Adrnlttod we have clirnlates that try out the constitution. Witis a range of température What is -National Unity ? from 60 below te 100 above we should be a people of unusual adaptablity and strength. Two thîngs, however, wll offset any vlrilitY lmparted by battllug with olimate. One la disease. The other is mollycoddllug. We semn te have- ail tise diseases. under thse sua and as hlgis an average of the deadllest as any other nation. Against this wo shall have te figlit by commnon- sense methode if we are ever te corne to anything as a physically strong and dlean people. BRpfu we shall nover malte 'nucis liadway bat- tllng against diseases until we quait coddllng our bodies as though theY were exotics. A lot of men and wo- men seemto thlnk we sheuid sf111 be, living In a garden of Eden. But we dou't. We may as well accept Our clîmates as semething beyond our power te control, except by adispting ourselves te cllmnatic conditions. M EDICAL s cience will do wel te keep itseof fromn becomiug a hlerarchy. Not ail the pro- gress lu medical science cornes frem wlthln. Medicine le protocted by ]aw. Every law-protected body tonds te become a tyrauuy. Tisere are doctors practliug under tlie law ~who are ne more intelligent to-day In deallug withi the human bedy tissu tise old country practitiener -whe fifty yoars ago plnned lits faitl1 te leaclies and blisfers. Tlie last twenty years lias proved that mental science and eeteepatisy are capable of being useful curative agencies. Bach of themn cornes at fthe probloni from an oppesite angle. The rnofhod of curing a disease by euggesting that yen will get better or tisat .you really isavon't got it, le about as far as possible frorn lilng ou a coucli aud having au athiote whe knows -wliere your joints and nerve centres are knead eut of yen a cold or an attaclt er riseiinatteni. Yet these twe antipedal curative agencles have ,one fhing ln commoti. They bofli .eliminate medicine. And wliatevor 7progrese may yef be made wltli drugs, antiseptice and electrie treat- moents, If le a fair surmise tliat the. science of medicine wlll nover keep ,up with the rest of cIvilization In Site own pecullar field unless it de- docides to incorporate the best lu ieutal science audosteopathy. R. JOHN 'M. GODFREY, one ot the fathers ot Bonne Entente, 1ias. delivered an address In the Ottawa Forum on Contoderatiotl-Its -,Seoend 'Phase. Its contents, motive, mothod and general spirit of falrneessare admiratile. As a plece of kintily lôgic looking at each sideof thse Ottawa from tise othor, as far as possible. it la a réai contribution to thse cornlty of two peoplos. ýWere there more Godtreys in Ontario thero might'be legs of a problem In Quéec. But in ail conscience lsn't thse rost of this great country a bit woary ot the old Ottawa River tune? Why dou't wo pay a littie more attention to the St. Lawrence «Whicli rise near tlie hinterland of three lnland provinces and emp- ties Into the sou around three others? Rivera lu war are alwuys good baffle- grounds. But the course o!ý Canadian development ts net acrons the Ottawa; it lies aloug thse St. Lawrence. Aud It's becausebellgeroute on both aides of tise Ottawa have porslsted lu regardlng that river as of first Importance that wo have liad ail this foolieli talk of damming flie Sf. Lawrence by leffing Que- bec but of Confederation. Quebec le 'not golnig ouf. Mr. Godfrey admîts that. Ho maires a leading peint et the fact' thaf for fitteen years Canada br'ldged the Oftawa by honor- lng a French-Canadian Premier. Ho makes another point et thse fact that ln the, first Canadian contingent te tise great war eîghty per cent. were British boru. We have published the figures ou flue page before. As a liait lu an argument It Is couvinclng. But wliy ehould we ompliasîze lu flue country the land ef a mau'e blrth? Wlien a man cornes\"here wlthlitsI famiiy te lve and te vote, what under hoaven le hoe? English, Irishi, Scotch-or anyfhing Euro- peau? If se, we may as weil abandon tise Canadian idea. Tise\"otisor eveniing a man whose father was an Uletermuan and wlio was hirneel! born lu Cana-.a, declared that lie was an Irishmau; yet the saine man would raise a. terrifying liulabaioo at even a native boru German wlio lias a Canadian vote cailing hlm- self a German. Either we are building a nation lu Canada or we are maltlng tise country ah eldorado fer forty ltinds of people who intend te stay foreigners. Adrnitted that we cau nover be the saine kindof nation fliat Engiand, France, Germany are--a ene-language nation; must we aise admit that we cuit nover becomo a one-tiag nation? Must we forever sympathis e with the Britlelier who when hoe recroises tise Atlantic, says hle i golng bacis home; wltli the Italian wlio maltes lies meney hers and soude It to It.aly; with tise Chînamun who maltes hie pile and goees back te China for cremation; with any and everybody who regards flue laud as a sort of expérimental Siberia, te which lie is exlled.and which existe only for tise sake of ton or a dozen homelands acrose any ocean?ý Iu heavenes naine le Canada neyer te be a home fer any but those who are bora bore? Tison lot us put a crimp lu immigration, give Hlon. J. A. Calder soine other job and abandon the idea, of ever maklng Canada ànything but 'a transplantedl International celouy. The roui peint efthfue matter le that whatever thse patrioti c motive of thoso elglity per cent. Britisers lu tise first Canadian contingent, tise mon themnsolvoes were or sliould have been Canadiaus and flot Britiehers. The writer of this -wus born lu EngisanI. Ho dlaims te be first of ail a Canadian. Hie second dlaim je on Eugland. Does tise so-called broncho and tise eparrow-te re- quete Mr. Godfrey's words-thlult that Canada la forever a colouy and tliat ne matter hew many ofts ielth and kin corne lier and for isew muny génera- tiens, tliey are stîli Britishi? Tison let us sed -a message te King, Lords and Commons and say we have ne right te national aspirations. Lot us coucodo that ail tise roui Canada tisere Is les on botis sides ofthfle Ottawa; that tise Canadian hein Anglo-Saxon vs. the Canadian born Frencliman will alwiys ho tise main programme lu this country; that oui biggest problern wlU always be this tiresome fend between Ontario and Quebec. Ne, if eur national talk le auything better thun twaddle, wo must look for- 'ward te tise day wisou tise business et maltlug Canadiaus o! people fions ail parte ef tise earth le a isundred tises bigger problemi tisun setting whlch la tise greater bigot, Quebec or Ontario. And If Canada le ever te achieve na- tional unity amoug a conglomeration ef peeplos, It muet ho hy the united et- forte ef ail Canadian-boin, on botis aides ef tise Ottawa-and everywhere else. succeseful botis eldes tragedies lu this war'is Ruesia. hiaî ofthfue Alles, tise unspeakably me1 now a hllud and buttered glant Ho of growing auar-chy thaï; maltes etb lue grlm slaugliter-machine next ..Pl ,.n1d. qhA Ibau beeu ail but dis- lei was not consumînated. Therefore site is, an How weak and helpless is now beginning to be s But in the pîty that the rest of the world feels vast Russia there is an element of hope. Thte heart of Russia is right. Tbe people are right. leaders are wrong What Russia needs is a rest tion of'atitocracy. She needs an enlightened de3 isrn with ail the gradation of authority which i Poses» Government by discussion, as Bagehot cailed i ail very well in countries that have been practi. discussion for generations or centuries and has le ed to read newspapers. Russia is not even leari te speil She is only spell-bound Py orators. greater the oratory the worse the distraction. people wheo can't read mnust be governed witi democracy, until sucit time as newspapers. K IPLING says the Germans a] slaves. That is flot the wiiO truth. The siavery of GE many, which makes possible tl aniazing national concentration the country, la, a siavery of edue tion. The people have been trafl\u003c to submit and te sacrifice now the hope of a great aatisfact\u003c hereafter. They have tise M hornedan creed, of fatalismn and tt future. Long ago they began te 0 dure the privations which are \"10 beginning to be feit in other cu tries. They have been hardenied sacrifices by a 1 system of educS.tiO They are not helots\u003c clamûring È freedom. They area nation of fa aties with blind fait'h la the powerÛ righteousness of their ruiers and delusion that thse worid is in arrns crush thom. Enlightenament is- 01, beginfning to damn upon these SY tematlzed slaves. G;ermany is much behaind in enlightonmont as are la sacrifice. 'And the light tUs confoundls the Prussian war lo11 wili not break in Germuany until atk\u003c nations have begun to catch Up suffering and sacrifice. ut L ORD BEAVERBROOK des goed turn for this countrY securing and sending us t portrait of Sir Alexander MaChOç zie, painted by Thornas LawrOJiEl A large number 0f Canadians iIW not know who the great explorer '91 beyond the fact that lie gave Il nains te the greatest river in tl nortis of the worid. it is considE ably due te the persistent efforts Sir, Edinuud Walker that sucliII tericai things as this are being 0 iectedfor Canada. No bu8y could possily do more fusai Edniund lias doue to encourage 0 formas of art in Canada. Ând thi portrait of the great explorer stal te thse crédit of botis Sir Edmtg the custodlani and Lord Bearbrl) whe raised the fund for its Vu chas,. choice. Tise propi bec Telegrapl isl Iu tise principle Bonue Entente. Fc gllish newepaper lu tise ,liat oflier people call",
         "CÂNADIAN COURIER 'HIPBOARD SKETCHES \\ïE are istill tn Halifax barbon When we \"lIa sall-is a state secret.; what cargo w. axe carrying'-is a stat6 secret; whea we shall Cet aur coal, 'wlio our canvoy- O«se are state secrets aisa. An Àmerican batte, ffil app\u003eeared lui the harbor and vanished in the gbt; à 'white hospital ship orhiamented wltli large, d ecrosses and green stripes, has gone; but other LilY camouflaged vessels flyiug flags ai variaus LtiOnn are hoveilng near, while tugs aud barges me and go an mysterlaus 'errands. Sometimes ,e sblp's mator boat is lowered and the captain )el ashare, or the officer iu command ai troaps; It these dIgnitarles sfternly refuse ta post aur tters or purehasel the 1ý pound ai waal we need r aur kuitting. We gaze daily at the snow-clad bis araund Hall- x. We cau see the resîdential part af the clty, itii Its windows covered wlth uew boards. The wu of Dartmoujth, too, looks picturesque, its cbarm ereased a tbausandiold by the iset that noue may' 'ter- The devastated part ai the city af Halifax hiddeu iroin us by a beud lu the river, and in the stance we'see the slauting masts ai the beached iiiO.\" At sunset the river Is flooded with pink' ,d gqîd, aud the signal stations an the bill are out- led sharply against the radiant sky. At nlght. lieu tbe wind bas dropped, the scene 15 aven Veller; and tlie ligbts'ai the vesseis trail serpentine fi8etionsai yellaw, red aud green in the dark water. There is little ta do. We pace, the deck, but it Is 0 eold ta use aur steamer chairs; even wben play- 9 shuffle-board¶ the bauds and feet get numb. But er~e are pienty ai comiartable chairs In tbe lounge; 11venielit tables at wbichi ta write or play carde; d books may be obtaiued Iu the casy iibrary wfth Open fireplace. AM first the passeugers camplaiued bitteriy ai the iay, but naw tbey are becoming recauelled or mare euatom ed to the mouotony ai slip hie. Tbey have Caine iuterested lu their games ai nards, their ,oks; but most ai all,, uaw that e big slp is about to start its Jouruey aver the ocean, ey have become lnterested luIn 'eh other. The proper study of flklud is man,' and daily we ýquie saine new plece of informa-' Sabout the scant huudred of\" St-clss Passengers aud learu ta Il thent by their names. T~he genlal captalu bas time, ta be able uaw, aud a priviieged iew 'ý.e vlBlted hlmn In bis casy qua- ýs aJOft- The afficer lu camm»and trOaPs is able ta Join lu a gaine ai bridge, tbe ' tams have iew patients, and the peaple -wbo will' tire ta t*heir berths at the first bint ai stormy ll1her discaver how .pleasant lu Ie on the acean \"l mlay be. the short voyage from St. John ta Halifax, r'nuY' were laid 10w; but aveu. wlth a dlzzy ad it eeraed good ta be moving. Additlonal ex- e1eztwas caused by a fir. in the'lounge, due dfeveinaulation iu the wlrlng-ai the electrie p8 aBni'all faine appeared au the celling, blister- etheê paint, A Uittle girl wltb a scar ou ber cheek vtln1 of the By ESTELLE M. KERR lelsurely manuer, braught fire extinguishers, the sbip's carpenter, witb bamnier and chisel removed the inuulding froin a beami andI laid bare the smoulder- ing wires, the amrous youug man in \"civies\" drew bis lady-laver Into bis protecting arins, and the yaiug lieutenant,' wbeu the extinguisher spiashed lu hi.- direction, ducked to. safe ty behiud the corpuleûat lady, niistaklng ber for a parapet. In balf an hour the lire was ont, the smake cleared away and the stewards were busily cleaniug the woodwork aud Bplashed mirrors. Au extension cord with a drap- Iight replaeed the illumination lu the damaged cir- cuit and, in another balf baur, tea, was served lu the lounge lu its usual orderly fashion, andI the pas- sengers wba liad slept tbrough the excitement, dranit two cups ai tes, befare their eyes, iallawiug tbe trail ai their cigarettes, remarked: .\"Why, wbat's hap'pened ta tbe ceuiug?\" F RIENDSHIPS aie iormed quickly on sbip board, andI If, by chance, a man and a maid wlio are seated beside escli other lu the dining saloon fiad plessure iu eacli otber's campsny, we are apt ta camne ta the conclusion that they are married. It surprises us ta learu that the pretty little red-cbeeked girl who jiaees the darkened deck escli evenîng, arm in arm with. tlie young lieutenant, is goiug -averseas ta marry a soldier, sud that ber constant campanian carnies lu bis breast pocket a photograpli ai a sinaîl baby. The stald spinsterwho' sits kulttlug lu the corner ail day proves ta be a prospective war-brlde. and tlie pretty young thiug wba romps around the deck lu runnlug sliaes, andI you have mentally placed lu the bride cstegary, caila your attention' t lier wedding-riug antI tells yau that \"lie\" went overseas lu 1914. I am making a study oi uuliax'ms andI military badges, for tbere are no -twa alike, but just as 1 am becoming prficieut, niast af thié officers have dauned murfti. I eau dIstiuguish between the grentade oi the artillery- inu woru on the e-at lapel, from that ai the en- gieer. ,I cau tel] the tmperial machin'e eu badge fram that af the Canadian. A youthful off icer lu the, Royal Canadian Draguons. crosslng for tbe flrnt time, rexusins lu uiorm, spurs aud aIl, aud we can't help mëriuriiig: \"*Twtukle, twInkle, lttie spur, 110w I wander whst you'refer, Fa.steued ta theý boot 80 tight AndI nat a bloomin' h6rse lu siglit!\" 's The Aviator. -J T~ C_ 1 take an Interest ' iu wound-bars and try ta discover where each af mY fellow - passengers \"got bis\"-at the Somme-at Ypres -i n Macedonia. \"And how do you' feel about going \\back?\" 1 aiten ask. Usually they ad- mit that when they flrst gat t hei1r \"blîghty\" they were so glad ta get ont alive that they neyer wanted ta go back agalu, but after a long time in \\ the hospital and a short period of S mare or less normal existence at home they begaii ta itch ta get back. \"As long as the war lteeps on yau can't think ai auythlng else,\" they say. \"And it's sa dluil ta be aut ai it! \" The Belle' of the Ship. But a Une that a youth whose sick- leave wasn't suffîient ta restore lis nerves to their former strengthb las wrltten in my autograpli album, tells a dIfferent story: \"If the boat were gaiug the ather way, There would be somethlng mare ta say, But I've been before, V've seen the gare. How I wisli it were golng the other way!\" Most ai the -in*pl mîy_ little baok by the afficers are very cheerful. One lias drawn a crude picture ai our slhip, a sub- 'marine and a tarpedo, and lias write underneath: \"In keen anticipation ai the voyage!\" Mauy time-warn verses deemed sultable for autograpl albums are tbere, but sometImes, meauIng ta be funny, the modern rhymes are pathetie. In the trenclies one acquires a grim. sense ai bumor, and one ai the ýN. C. O.'s ou board bas ,written: \"Wbat daes It matîter-7the lass afiaan arm or a 1eg, The glary and honor ai baviug te~ beg? Thinli ai yanrduty, thinli ai yonr pay, To sbaot and be abat for a dollar a day!\" .knotber writes on \"'The Glary af Wax\": «*A trencb, A stench, Same seraps af Frenchi; Sanie horrible German vapors. A sheil, A yell, Na more ta tell, But a paragraphi Iu the parers.\" Many or these g a ant fellows, botli offleers and N. C. O.'s, crossed to England Bteer' age, returned In liospital ship and are no\u003ew enjayliig the luxuriesl of a first cabin passage for the firat Urne. Perhaps there inay lie more equalltyp between the afi- cers anid mben In the Ibo Infantry LIiete 4e.h ]P M",
         "CANADIAN COURIER~ E'YE S, ARKHAM was neyer so sure /F that lits big \u003cbusiness ,sh ip .L.L wa in sale waters .as when lie wyas alone with lits sie- ter'Gretchien Malone in lier iibrary. \"Weüll, Henry, have you got the pychic' personaýge sale?\" she askeci hlm. after thie rest of the house had retired. \"In the Markliam Ward for Nervous Cases,\" lie said quietly. \"What does Dr. Heinfeldt say?\" \"That he Io nndoubtedily suffering from n derangement. Lt will be t empor- ary, hie thinks. But af course-\" He'smoked siiently. \"Of course,\" she tooli hlm up, \"your doctor will see that the time involved in ls compiete recovery ls long enougli for your purpose.\" \"Whatever that is,\" lie repiied dreamily. There was a ticking silence. \"And whatever it 18--do you realiy knQw, Henry ?\" She suddenly spolie In Gerniân. lie replied ln the samie. \"'Nobody knows,\" lie InsIated ex- \"They askod me what I knew about such sples as the Jupe with their ban- xals t6 the Mikado.\"y citedly, \"This aide of the water there la nothing but the vaguest suspicion. Parlilmet talles of the German men- ace when It miglit as welI be talking of the bubonic plague. I have been down there. Those M.P.'s know noth- Ing about Europe. Nine-tenthe of them have neyer seen It. Ail they know about Germany la that she lias a great army, that she lias model ciles, a great mercantile marine, a powerful and reculiar Kaiser and good schools of music, where somne of tliem ba4ve their sons and daugliters. What on earth wouid happen if Germany were to deciare war tliey know not. .Some of them fear Russia more than they do Germany. They talli mucli mnore bitterly against the Japs who mnay come across from the other side of the Pacifie. They eUhl remember the. case of the Komagata Maru and the. mad iudus who were deported before they were aliowed to land. You remember that play-\" «'Typhoon,\" she broke ln. \"Yes, very weill\" \"lt was ln Ottawa. I heard M.P.'s very muoh exclted over tliose Jap spies. I agreed with them. With a few drinks they became quite confi- dential; asked me what 1 thouglit Ger- imany knew about such splep as the Japs with their banzaings ta their Mi- Iwado. I saM--why, I sald of course, It *was bad enough. Germiana s -1 1ç\u003e an Emperor; no~t a spiritual deliy, but 3BUTT H1E, SAW NO0 ]IARKHAMS' Conàolidated, wvith ils sinister con trol from a hidden agenCU has ai last corraled Martin Hoag, after his sojourn on an island. Hoa9 is now in the Markham, Ward for nerve 'cases. A German specialist from Vienna has him in, charge., Helen Munro expects to marry Henry Mark hamn the iron-m aster, when ? She knows not. What is the secret that makes Mark- ham fear Hoag and delay his marriage to Helen ? Read the next to the last instalment of\u003c WHAT HAPPENED TO HOAG a human person who lad sowed lhls wild oats and liad now become the real father of lits people, initerested in ail their good works, lelping and teacli. ing the world wherev~er they could under the sun. Yes, they agreed witli that. ýThey liad met. (ermans at the Capitol; men wise on trade matters. They admitted that Germany lad a wonderful trade system-\", Hie paused to, cluclilela the smoke. Gretchen lighted a cigarette. She had no need to say a word now. Henry was wound up on a subject very close- ta lis Imagination. 'II have a way of pulling people out ta. talk about Germany,\" lie went on. 'II sometimes admit that my father's name was oniginally MarRlieim; that for naturalizing reaàons, wishing ta be a Canadian out and out, lie hlmself changed It ta Markham; that I was mysel! dliristened Heinricli, bu.t that because lie wished me also ta become a subject of His Majesty the lX1ng wloever. he miglit be, lie had It changed taý the 'good Anglo-Saxon equh'aient Heniry. So-that 32ets any good Canadian going at once. You see, tley are becoming quite national liere. Or think tËey are-whidh is mucli the sanie thing.' Eh ?\" 'elHeitry,\" ahe went on quietly. \"And then what 'dofthey, talli about 2\" \"Poli!\" Hie bruslied back lits lair and gazed'into the -lire. \"Tley tell me liow wonderfully Germany or- ganizes lier trade bureaus ail over tlie wo\u003e-id. .What a complete knowledge Fhe lias o! even Canada. Ha! Ha! Ha!\"I Lt_ powerfully, excited Markham to observe that Canadians were mudli compllmentedl ta thînli that tue great Kaiser knew*about Canada; thnt lie thoaglit it important enougli ta have a memorandum on fyle about every great indus try, every raîlway, every mine--everything. -It flattera themn up ta the hlt,\" le. went on. \"And they say that It is al so open and above board; not like tuose stenlthy Japs, I admit, that s0 it le. I tell tliem-tliat of course at Berlin there is indeed a complete re- cord o! ail my own interests. 1 freely admit that I have let Germnan investi- gators througli my çvorks-minee, foundries, factonles, slips, rallway tracks-everything, Thnt is business. 1 have nothing ta conceal. I do not fear Germany, so 1 tell them. No, nnd nieither should they. Germany le my naturni aily. 1 am a good Canadlan. Germans are welcome and useful here. Taji. Very welcÔxne. Very usefuL S TRICT ORDERS were issued rom the. Marklam Ward thnt on n~o .i'.,o\"t was an-, 7 - 10 see fhe patient designated as Martin Iloag. By THOMAS TOPLEY Lt wvas an a ggravated form of neuras- thenia, coupled with serlous psydhic disturbances; so serious, thle German specilist admitted when questioned by Mr. Markham, that perfect solitude was tlie only condition for a 'cure. \"Very weil, doctor\"-speaking de- lberately between whiffs of smoke- \"what I want is to save that man toi lits work in civilization. 1 know hlm. My old office manager. Given lits firat place by my fatlier wlien the business was a shop. So-\" \"Sentimental rdasons, sir., I under- stand.\" \"Whicli will neyer again be permit- ted ta operate ln thîs Ward. I am asking you to make an exception of me. That is alI ut T HE doctor's perturbation began over thus order when a lady came and asked to see Mr. Hloag. S#e was cquite tlie niost Interested and lnteresting lady Dr.' Helnfeldt liad ever talked te. She told hm, lier name, and le said, \"Ah! QuIte superfluous, Mademoi- selle. I knew ItL You are a friend of-hls? Ah!, 'Iou have brouglit tliose beautiful roses for hlm. Are tliey *not-magnifi cent!\"I He spolie the mest word like a cli- max ln a Strauss tone-poem. \"Doctor Heinfeldt, I don't believe Mr. Hoag should be in this hospital Dr. H ,einfeldt expresses great aston- Ishment ut Miss Munrols sceptilsm about Mr..Hoag's Iliness. ab'il I don't thinli lie la really 111.\" Heln!eidt's big hands went up.' \"Mad-em-ols-elie! \" His eyes were buiged witu physical admiration. \"You scientists-think you ander- stand people. Well. if they were natu- ing bat flesh and bones, s0 you migît, TeIl me, lierr Doctar, wliy yen~ Ger- nns seeni to be mach world authori- ties on even medioal mattera. Are you- ?\" \"Seems, madamoiselle? Nien! We -ara! We must be. TheG world dé mands it.', \"Fiddlestlcks! Dr. Heinfeldt-\" \"Ali-please to caîl me Heiny!\" IlHeiny then-wliat do yoli reaUl: know about Mr. Hoag ?\" He tilted lits liead and cocked ii eyebails over imaginary spectacles. Helen was surely, more beautifu than any garden. The spring seeme\u003c to have made lier Its apostie. Hein feldt did not wonder at Mr. MarkhaIl deciding to marry sucli a creature, s\u003c beautiful, yet so boid. Neither dld hE marvel tliat lie himseif waa somewh-1 obsequioi;s. As Madam Markham- some day-she would be in a pasitiol to. command hlm; miglit become tlif especial divinity o! the Ward. \"Ah! You ask me for symptais Miss Munro. That la not easy. Y0I would need to understand the psychO phyaical inter-relations, o! which assure you 1 have neyer seen, eveI in BerlIn or Vienna, s0 remanliable a' example as Mr. Hoag.' Neyer D'le And 'I can promise you that when we have flnished with Mr. Hoag th el ence a! psyolio-tlierapy wiil have, beeX advanced-much! But for the pres ent, I cannot, 1 am afraid ta pernii you to see hlm. He ls ln my care. W must save hlm, to civillzatlon and tt Mis bleseed work la the world. POO] man! He ts too mudli, I ami afral of an aitruist. Hie proiects too muel o! himself Into ,the'lves of othýerg,\" Witli grandiose politeniess the dec tor reiuctantly bowed the lady dut He watched lier as she,,lîoated dovl the walk to bier lmous Ine., The roffit seemed stili to be lianted by lie gracious and etlmalating presefloe Such color; animation*, splritual lit man intereiti and such a gentie la~dy H ýEINFELDTý carefully' examl11OK the great clump*o!i red rosee she iad le! t. There was11 visible message except lier card, wiril' lie put Anto bis own pocliet as a gr claus souvenir. Bat, o! course, fl0wen~ are subtie; miglit have iauls? S' mach-like. wamen as they are, h should roses not canvey from the sPirl life of the lady ta the remarzalé psychlc personallty of Mr. Hoag sOn intimation more powerful even hl lier own presence in the room? T HE room ln whch Eoag was col' Tfined was desperately whlte. glistened of tile and enanIOL was ovmx more terribly maddeXIn than a oon a! all black. Ha e jlressed all ln white like a ho0 sur geon. Ifle hair had turned wbit-ý51 face, shrunke and hollow, w4sa5 ns grey And yÈýen that 'grvnef5 gf enlianoed by the snow-wliite Cn",
         "CANADIAN COURIER lexion of the- room and the white Ucli on whicli lie lay, looking out at le green and biue o! a great centre uirt walled off from the street. Hoag sat up wben lis medicai jailer tine in. \"Wliy dtdn't you hrtng the roses?\" Iwunted to know. \"Aýh!\" -startled Heinfeldt. '\"Wlat )Ses ?\" \"Dou't lie alarmed, Herr Doctor. I eu the roses whicli I can smell from Eur liands. 1 presume a lady brouglit lem. As she could flot have brouglit 'Pm for you, and as 1 am tlie first lain patient admitteil to this Ward, deduce tliat tlie lady wlio lias just Dne is Miss Helen Munro. If you ilii look in your leftupper vestpocket Du wtli discover lier card whicli you ave stolen fromn me along witli the )ses. Pieuse keep it-with my coin- tlments.\" Hleinfeldt Juat stood and delivered imsel! of a seriles o! gesticulations. \"Do' you-wisli to examine me gain?\" asked Hoag with a curious \"Nein!\" exploded Heinfeldt. \"The lore I examine you the less about you klnow. So it is necessary to keep you \u003ea while quite alone.\"l Hloag wenùt about the rooma witliout' souind.* flein!eldt smiied at the ab- ardity o! any sucli phantom being in Ive with sucli a lady as hiad been in le office that mori*ng. Suddenîy Hoag loomed uip in front f him \"Wly,\" he asked, \"do you keep me a white room? Wliy Lhe devIl 011't you fetcli in those roses? Don't ou kniow -that I liate this 'white ?\" lHeinfeldt slirugged. as lie rose. I\u0026\u003cckng towards the door lie said, \"'Aniillusion,* Mr. Hoag. You do flot ate white. Psychicully you have 'aile white your bete noir-your black east. Conquer that and you are ail SELE N'S flrst impulse was to liàve a talli witli Poundem, edîtor of , the Clarion. She clioked lIt [On Th~e enemny o!. Henry, Mark- ,'as also lier enemy. lier second va to tell Markliam hlm'self wliat she liuglt of keepîng Mr. Hoag. coopeil ~tin the Ward, Here again slie feit lere! balitng. lier personal luterest M\u0026r. Hoag was scarceiy of the kçinti bIe ventilateil before Hlenrk, wlio, 10 oubt, a~s lie hbad aireaüy tolil lier, btgt lie was doing the riglit thing iMr. Hoag in maintaînîng hlm witli- )i a cent o! charge at an institut1on ý1essly designed~ und tinanceil for to lie married in the faîl. finltely understood. Per- enlier, At any rate wlien tifarious tuterests e! ',\\r. )uId permit hlm ttme' iake it, as lie said, an rthe' naine of Markham; least a six-months' trip ýrmany. Whicli, Ot she must lirush up )ent mach o! biIs n Ottawa.' Helen knew what hie wus lie qeexned te be Henry sometimes brouglit tlie matter up. He seemeil to enjoy talking about it; one o! lis ways o! expresstng lis sense of power. A!ter ail was there anlythting so badl about it? Political money neyer grew on bushes. Some one must provide funds. And 50 long as it was good, lionest money got from developtng the resources and indus- tries o! Canada-well? She liad ail lis arguments off by rote. He neyer met lier but lie talked o! business, o! lis many interests, o! the iron -milîs, the mines, the steamships -and o! a possible election which lie said would flot lie due until after tbey had returned fromn Europe. One evening in lis sister's library lie sliowed Helen avoluminous docu- ment ln typewriting. \"Oh ju st a complete report o! aIl our industries,\" lie said careiessly. \"As you see, it is a carbon copy.\" \"'Oh yes-and tlie original?\" He leaned forw«rd, with a stagey lustre tn lis eyes. \"It was, sent-to Berlin,\" lie s aid. \"I wanted te prove to those Germans that Canada bas the making o! some indu stries that- He paused to see liow she would finish tlie statement. \"Oh,\" she said evasively, \"I don't care en mucli about wliat we can show Germany about our industries. It seems'to me that we hail better mind our own business. I don't ses wliat business it is o! Berlin-of the Kaiser -wliat any 'Canadian flrm is doing. Wliy is lt?\" Hie rosé andl tooli out a fresli cigar. \"Uh\"ý-gancing stdelong at lier- uImy dear. don't get exctted.- Busi- nesks, like art, is world wide. Berlin and Leipsic open their musical doors, to Canadians wlio have the money. Canada maust eitlier, become a world nation or remain a kîtchen door o! tlie Empire. In my opinion-I was bol'» \"Physical, Mr. Hoag, you, have made white your bete hoîr., Conqluer. that\u003c and you are ail right\"l liere as you were-Canada is tee great to be the kitchen door.\" \"Oh well, T quite agree to thut.\" \"Yes, andl if there is auy coUntry ou earth fIat knows how to estimate the value of a country like this-It ls Germany. Perhaps wheu 'our law- makers aund our governors liere find out how Canada is vulued lu Berlin tliey ivli quit exploittug this country in tlie interesti - o! other nations. For instance - the \u003e,êmertcans; the Britishi.\" s chatter ONVERSATION endeil there. ty lu the C Nothlng more spemed xnecessary. ýw littIe Helen was At least couvinceil. enougli, And lho uuilerstood her sentiments. Anyway lie, told lis sister so atr wards. \"Ail very well,\"- she said. \"But what did either of you say about-?\" \"Hoag?\" lie suggested in a taltering way. 'Nothing. She knows 1 don't want to discuss him. I kuow she wants to.\" \"And of course ha.s too much maid- enly reserve to bring the matter up; understanding of course that you are spending money in the humanitarian business o! restoring so useful and so unusual a man to the work lie does so well among the worlring classes. I do hope, my dear bunging brother, that you have got Helen to appreciate ail this bunk at its face value.\" He picked nervously at the ragged end of lis cigar. \"\\N hy o! course she does. That's 'why we don't discuss it. Anyhow I'vê' left it to you to sugar the pill.\" \"Me? La-la! My cake's ail dougli with Helen now. She doesn't even like being under my roof-poor dear!\" '\"I wish 1 hadn't taken your advice. about Hoag,\" hie blurted. \"Bless my soul! What better would you have done? Whose advice did you want? Warman's? Poli! He did very well corraling your manwith a whole lingo of evidence in case any- body sliould bring an action. There lis usefulness ended. The rest of the business must be a work of art. And se it will bie. Look-you've got the respectable press aIl doped witli the bumane M~ea of that Nerve Ward. Nothing the Clarion says can affect tbat. The Ward is under your con- trol. Helen knows that it's badl for Hoag's nerves for hlm to see bier. She lias lis letter saying sq.\" \"Yes, but sie's been to see hlm, Gretchen.\" \"And faiied. A mere impulse. Some desire to have a love melodrama in a -sanltarium, corne wliat might. No go. Your Heinfeldt was -ton cute. Even her roses !ailed to, reach him. He can't get out wltliout breaking trou bars and leaping tliree storeys. Heiny tells me that tbe ciear white room angers the man's nerves. But he's keeping thle room white. One of these nice summeir days there will be a lit- tle more white than usual in that room. There will be a' deatli notice in the newspapers, accompanied by the cheerful news item that altliougih the best mnedical specialistavailahle !romn Gprmafly faîled to save Mr. Hoag's lite owlng to the peculiar na- ture of the malady-one neyer before encounitered ln quite the same way- yet researchi on the subject of psychio- thlerapy lia3 heen e~normousily ail- vanced by lis case, mucli to tlie bene- it o! future patients produced by ouir higli-pressure clyllîzation-ali tliat rot! And as everybody knew that Mlr. Hoag lived more for other people thau for htmself-why even Helen Mýýunro will admit thatlieý miglit have enjoyed dying for- oter-\" Markham ciapped botli hands over' lis ears. H-e ruslied to the door and stood there puffing like a grapipus, lis eyen double-crossing one another. \"Pleuse-to keep the rest-te your- pelf,\" lie said husklly. \"T neyer bail sucli an idlea.\" She Iooked ut hlm wlth a f rigli smile. \"Henry,\" she said, \"you know youj are foollng yourself. Yoii knew It ail along. But you neyer hail the tour- age te put It in plain laliguage. it was ail very well to d\u003cbu it up wltb scientitic palaver. But you walnte4 to, get rid o! Hoag. You fear hinm. Yoti fear him enough to hatte huîn. He rushed ta the door and stood there puffing like a grampus; his eyes double-crossing one another. Now you're pot hlm where you can haiffle hlm iyou're welching. Shame on you!\" M 115 BA.RTOP, landliady, mûst not be overlooked. lut the for- tunes of Mr. Hoag she was only less interested than Helen Munro. His retura to the city !rom the i sland without returning to tlie room wh.jcli ha\u0026' been vacant since lie left it liail mucli perturbed Mrs. Bartop. Sh. understood why lie liail not come back. More than once she badl been 'bol enougli to visit the sanitarium lu the hope of seeing Mr. Hoag; 'always pe- litely refused admittance by the Ger- man doctor, and.!aitb!ully turning uiV again in the hope tliat -any day there miglit be a turu for the better and that she miglit be the firat te see hlm. No lover can surpass the tenacity o! a reaily devoted landlady. As sum- mer came on and the days grew hiot, Mrs. Bartop's desire te have a word wîth Mr. Houg increased. Every day she anxtousýly searclied the Clarion for any newB about hilm, or any Intimation that the Other Worids than Ours. columu tn the Saturday, issue wouid bie resumed and when.î Finally tn lier agitation-thîs time remarkably unusuai--Mrs. Bartop paid a visit te the editor. M-r. Poundemn was sitting in the littie box office !ormerly tuhabited by Mr. Hoag. \"Oh!\" she gusped as she sut down, \"I don't blume ye for comm' t.in liere now and then. Hlaven't 1 been up tilt his roem every blesseil day since lie le!t lt, dustin' the bookis lie never reads, makin' the bied that's neyer slept in. !ussinig wld the slippei's aiul things lie never wears and seein' \"Go easy, miadam. You've flot lieuei seeing hlm. Net Hloag.\" Mrs. Bartop wiped a blur !romi lier eyes. Discreetly noddiug lier bead, s he sali, \"Oh, wel tsmaybe you that knowil. But it's me that's teiling you. That roomn o' lhis isn't l11e auy other I've ýgot. -And it neyer wilI lie agaîin, She paused, squintlng ut the loppy booksliel ves. \"Why don't ye ask me ;omethi'?\" she sappeil. \"Deur me! I thought editors wanted news.\" \"Go abeail, ma'am. You came hè~re te toli1 me. Why should I have to pump It of you?\" Slie reudliel over andl pludheil hlma by the shirteleexe. (ContiWid o'r page 21.)",
         "4DANADIAN ýCOUitïEie A ND suddeniy aur Cana-. dian armny doctor, wlth hie littie camnera, found himmelf, one fine. Mesapotamilan morning, gazing at theý Bazaar. Fram Bazra and ail points east and weit the camnel traîne came ta Koweit, ç ar ryl1 n g merchandise. Note the 'date packa. In the baokgraund,e what laaks Ilke hlis le a raW af candy-shaPs. And the bronze god 'ta the ieft thought the khaki-mani was a strange Sahib.. TSAY, Mac, we can get water in'the village If we start now.\" Mac bal! wolte up. He hoard the ramn on bis \"bivvy\" and tbought be was dreamlng, for there had been ne main for Seven months; but feeling about, heoun his kit getting wet, and woke UP aitogether, asklng wliat lfi blazes was happening. (He dldn't say \"blazes,\" bit that's wbat he mçant.) \"Nothing. Oniy If we want water, we've get te get it now.\" In a parched ceuntry,, wheme the troops' drlnklng Palestine Narrative by Norman Mac donnel Mesopot'lamizan, Snaps.hots ýby G. A., Dickson ABOUTI three years ago Norman Mac-, don eil, lawoyer, disappeared from Canada'b enistmnnt. 'He i4ent abroad in the artillery, was in En gland a long while wondering.iohen he would get. into action; took a sadden attack of appen- dicitis, folloiwed'by an operation, was inealided, back; went over again-and nothing more was heard of him until'a few days ago\u003e the editor of this paper got a pencil-scrawled screed -with his name at the bottomn and \"ASunday in Pales- tine\"P at the top. The article herewith describea -a certain mysterious camel- jaunt in which'Cap t. Macdonnell was one of the cheerful victims. D R. G. A., DICKSON, fresh as a MVaY morning, -enlisted long ago with the Army Medical Corps, in the Imperial Army. He knew he would be a mobile iAtem when he leit Canada. But heý had littie or no idea that beforeý he got back here on furlough with a pack of lively snapahots, he would have enacted such a movie panorama of orientation. R is first locationiwas at Bazra, five mon ths; thence to Ceylon, afterwards to, India, then to Egyýpt-and back to Canada. Now he has goneý again. \"'Where to ?\" asks'the'editor. \"'Heaven only kn ows,\" an.rwers the 4. M. C., \"Thaet' one of the joys of the Army.\"' \"Four miles, they say.\" Four miles takes twO heurs at a camel's pace. So off they pushed-acresS the slimy, trackless plain. Palestine is a land of fields, but nlot of roadýs exceptiflg the two great highwaye, one on the coast, and the eother inland tlhrougli Jerusalemn; for the rest it lias merely mountainpaths and clay tracks, which dis- appear in the raie. It wa8 dark, and they had te wander round innumerable \"Wadis.\" The camels slipped and slid in the mud-splendid beasts 11n sand, 'but heipless where footing is insecure. The wallahs, clad only in. tbtl usuai biue smocx, wlt)i bare feet, made loud la- ment; for it is a mistalce te suppose that crying wval lndulged In oniy by the ancients; the modern oriental Is ever -ready te ',lift, up bis volce.\" The rain kept drizzllng d'wfl; and ýthe padre and Mac made venemous remarks which mucli relieved their feelings, but need not be repeated'here. The vl lage wasthere ahl right-a collection of mnud huts leaving one narrovw. straggllng Street fllled with L 0 and behold, these are \"white-wings\" of the desert; the scavenger corps with the donkey that keep clean the city. L.egend saith that behind a wali the donkey turned and devaured the garbage. water le cari-led ln bags on camels (Y2 gallon per man per day for ail purposes') the rlsk e! ieslng the day's supply la enougli te rouse the laziest sieeper. And the water drlpplng off the padre'e bat-he wasn't realiy a padre, but they called hlm se -because, befere the war, lie had been a minîster o! the Auld Kirk;* now lie was a captain ln the gunners and had made great friends wltli Mac, who aise was connected wlth the cloth-lndicated that desuitery conversation would net be tolerated. \"Are the cameis rea.dy?\" 'They will be lu a minute,\" was -the instant meply. \"Rlght ho!\" Se: Mac pulled on hie boots whule the padre hustled the unfortunate native' camel wailah7. Hie language was net ortliodox; b\u0026t wliat will you at 3 a.m. in a November rain? \"110w far le the village ?\"-the- old, old query that dates back te the year 1. F AIR enchantresses at BaZra; ane with her-birds of fortune in cages cri of a pole'iin the market place'. \"Ahai\" remnarks our Canadlian camera -Why se mhy, pretty one$?\" rubblsli and refuse, waitlng for the tîme Wban the Orient wlll appoint a scav it might have been a clty of the dead. Net a sign o! l1fe; enly an occasious. herse, te proclalrn the fact that the retreating Turklsli ammy lied not long 1 tbreugb. Seen the street epened into wbat mîglit bis calied a square- side a muet unprepossessing-leoking mosque, on the ether a row of diiap deors and shutters, at the end a' camel shied, and-. lu the centre a well. 1 the same sort of 'well as existed severai thousand years age, like theC which Abmahamn's servant that fine mornlng lnvelgled Rebekali Inte In8 Isaac. And It had means ef drawing water whleli iîglit have been us Rebekali lietsef. But alas, . there was ne- Rebekab tbhJ'e, ne damsel \"ver te look upon\"; onl3j a dlmty deiman; and a dlrty deirn'an ln a nolsome at 5 a.m. wltli the ramn maldng puddles ln the mucli ail round, le net eaet essence cf romance, even if lie le wearlng wixat lookis ilke a set o! bed e",
         "CANADIAN CJRE Of the ark. But water is water Lbey \"barracked\" their camnels, toid the wallahs to get on with drawixng. eantime Mac wanted to tie up horse. So he grabbed a hook :ewall to run bis head-rope ýugb. To bis dismnay the who'e 1 came down,, and there aroSe ideous uproar. H1e had pulled 'n the front o! a bake-shop, and baker. wbo had been asleep3 ln- ,awoke with ail the terrors of Ider andassassinatiofi ini bis rtIt took not two minutes for ves. to appear froxn ail corners LIllions of 'em!-all wailiag and .eking as if the Turk bad re- led latent. on slaughter. T1' lider not being a Turk, ho-N- r, but a ýBritish officer. quite»as ýOrnflted as' anybody else, the oar subsided. And an off er 0, --some ohl-cake produced coml- we peace. So they sat dowa lI ingy Iittle shop lit by a sputtel'- \\candle, to eat ohl-cake. whie Ilob o! peasants ,stood ln tbe Il la ail the- colors of the rain- ï and discussed their visitors. iat was tbe subject? The, reck- sness of soldiers? The wealtb Britain? The trials of war? The )earance of their guests? Mac's 'I1-ob pipe? Neither Man nor p 1adre knew. Tbey only knew 't ''the sublect was engrossing, i the commeuts voluble. rheul It 'dawned. The rain Ised. The onlookers dispersed. e wailahs.got the cameis laden. d off .±bey trekked to camp, with .16) for another day. 'WVhat's the use of golng home by, what is there to do ?\" ýt's ride to -.The Ans- ns5 bave taken It. lt's a big and we'll bave some fun.\" 15, but tbe A. P. M. won't allox leero! Let's bave a try. G.ot No? Weli, lt's only ten miles CERTAINLV when the British b\u003eeat the Turks out of Bagdad eri route there was a sudden excursion of Christians and Jews from Bagdad.t at Bazra dlown the river. Water-bottles, trunks, bird-oages, urns, bundleî what-not. For the British deliverers had sent the boat, no tickets ta buy- but that the end of the world might be close at hand? v us there.\" any food witb ,and we'l let Fay weut. It was a busy centre on the Main Lding throu'glh Palestine, the road over whlch or part of tbe Turkish army had retreated. minarets sbowed where mnosques stood; but Lhan aill for once, glistened thecross on tbhe x Greek cburcb. In tbe twisfing streets-like tbe village, waiting for the scavenger-the ,zaars were ail alIve witlý buying and selling, tbere was lttle enough to bny or selI, the 2tving denuded tbe country of everytblxvi be tY bis bauds upon. Eveu In,. a pre,,Ipitate he robbed tbe people of most of their goodg, those who were unfortunate.,to bave none; Ows what he -would bave done, bad he bad a Ys longer to plunder l.. was an oriental smitby, very primitive; there the. Arab sheiks, the meni of mystery Il their descrt-wise travels had never a tilt they encauritered the camera-mati. \u003c~lOMINION over palm and pille,\" sang Kipling. D ere are the palms, the shadawy palms of the dates. Palmistry or pîsalmlstry-ýwhichever you Ilke. a camel slowlIy paced his endlesg round, turniag a corn miii. Farther ou a goat-berd baggled over tbe bargain of a goat for a sack o! meai. In and out ra-n ragged .children, lauglflng merriiy enough. At the bazagr entrances sat the rendors, giviug good- day. Up and down passed women wlth pitchers or baskets on their heads; an occasional camel, plled sky-blgh wlth ail tbe worldly goods andl estate of a, Bedoniln, tbe patrfarch imiisel! lu front with the face of a. god and the clothes of a luflatio, and the yourngEýs61 scion perched precarionsly on top. Swartby Syri ans were riding atrociously smiall donkeys; Greeks la Enropear costume, greasy and much patcb.ed; Jeirs o! the regniar cosmnopolitan type; and through ail and over ail the Arnxy-G-ourkhas, Australlaus, Lim- ilerlalS. Lt didn't take long to bargala for some food--breadl la one shop, mnutton ia another, radishes in a third, and some wine round tbe corner. But just as they bad llnished their purchases, a voice, A D when a Mesapatamian Arab dies he le taken riandi burled with many anather alongsîde a much.traveled road; sa thatý he may nai: b. lanesome. \"Excuse me, Sir, but you are not allowed to buy anything here.\" Lt was the minion of the A. P. M.! And ail the booty bad to be sur- rendered. For bungry men this was a bit of a shock. i\"WeU, I'ni blowed,\" said Mac. (In the army \"biowed\" is ýthe strongest expletive aliowed.) \"'If we cau't get anything to eat, let's see the town, anyhow,\" said the ýpadre. So tbey wandered into the Greek Church. The priest, a bale, bright old manl, quite the most attractive- looking person they bad seen yet, was. walking about, and shoWed a cold want of interest in bis -visitors H1e 1seemed to bave seen British officers before. But Mac, wbo had been sent to college for bis S.ins, bad a brain-wave, and tried his best Greek for \"in tbe beginning xvas the Word,\" and the frost was turnedi \\~to sunsbine. -The old priest beamed. He e-ven produced a word or two of Englisb. Tbereupofl Mac ex- plained tbat be was orthodox- Auld Kirk is always orthodclx-but also very bungry. And the priest took compassion. Ascending a stone stairway on the outside of the building, they came to a flat stone roof, witb a parapet round tbree sides, very dlean and neat. Here the priest's servant (\"a man of tbe. best familles,\" whatever that might mean, for be Iooked as If be would regard a wbole shirt as raiment fit on'ly for state occasions), brought tbem a meal; home-made bread, fresh meat (the first they bad tasted since the show started a ta Jerusaien, month before), berbs, wine (Greek .0 ses the folks priests keep excellent wine!) s of spices and Sitting on tbe parapet and muncb- -and who knew Ing their breakfast, tbey could look down at tbe str;et below, and wvatch the milltary police \"in the execution o! their duty.\" Lt was an entertainiflg sight to see, and right heartily did tbey agree tbat discipline was a splendid thing, and tbat the soldiery sbould flot be allowed to wander indIscriminately Into strange towns. At ten o'clock the churcb bell rang. Tbe congre- gation appeared and the prîest signified that he had other occupation than thalt o! trying to unflerstand Macs Greek. SQ w1th. many 9milinýg adieux,. and a healtby tip to tbe \"man of the best familles,\" they proceeded down tbe stairs, and past the, A. P. M. As tbey rode, home tbe pad re remarked, \"«Qulte a new way of spending Sunday mornig.\"1 Wbicb it was; and no one regretted It. Sunday was bora In pal estine, .so far as .Sunday sgchool stories are co cerned. Dayo! rest-no, it certainly was not, except la Soldiering; and -gladness-absolutely SOI We were ail glad of a chance to cbaik it down that at least one Sunday In Palestine 1won't 1be swallow',d up in tbe grand procession of one thing after-enotber. C 0 L R 1 E R",
         "CANADIAN COURIER RUSSIA THO' DEAD YET SPEAKETH G RMAN'Y began lier attack upon V-er- du n on Feray2,1916, under bad weather conditions and without any spe- cial need for haâte. The Britishi armies were atili far from ready, and there was no ire meiate danger from. the Frenchi. A~e timed hef offensive for the earliest possible moment in the new year in order that ahe miglit have abundant tinte to bring it to a conclusion be- fore beiug called upon for defensive activities elsewhere, We are now close to the correspond- lng date of the presenit year. There is a gen- eral expectation that Germany ta about to hurl lier masses against the western front In a des- perate effort ta reach Calais, or Paris, or both. In- numerable correspondents with unavowed and prob- ably nebulous sources of information speak of vast concentrations, of Germian troopa' lu Flanders and France. Germany la supposed to have transferredl hier eastern armies with very mucli the case and speed of a Cook'a tour. The arrival of Austrian armies la clearly *fareseen by the samne correspond- enta, and thesAe, ton, are supposed to have been awltched froni the mysterlous east. Now ail these tbiugs may be true, altliough they are highly un- likely, and ail the more unlikely front the fact that Germany lias said that they are true, and lias s-aid it with an extraordinary sôund and unaniity. .1 arn strongly of opinion that the German plans have been gravely embarra.qsed by the Brest-Litovsk proceedings, and that Russia ,\"thougli dead yet spi-aketh,\" Perliapa we came nearer to seeing the end of the war two, months ago than we yet re- alize. 'If Lenfine and Trotzky had ,been (lernian agents, as lu our wrath we assumed they were, thoy would have assented to the disguised cession ot the Rusalan provinces. Germany could then have declared herBeif to be amply repaid and she couid have gracefully receded front ah liher other de- mands. 'iThere can be littie doubt that this ls what Germany expected tlie Boîsheviki would do. She could flot concelve of resistance without an army. That was contrary ta the rules as aile had learned thent. Still lesa could alie concelve of an boneat idealisrn But alie foaund herself coufrontedi with both. Trotzky was Pot ln the Iat abasbed by the Ger- man heotoringa. Hle refused ta canalder a cession of Russiaxl territory, and lie bluntly demanded an adheston ta the basic termis agreed upon. The Ger- mans were firat perplexed, and titen titey were alarm- ed. They had opened the door for an invasion of Gerrniny by Rolalieviki ide-as, and Trotzky lield 'it open. They bad even luvited an immense audience ta lîsteni te those ideas. Tliey had plajzed thue B3ol- sheviki in the nmiddle of the stage, antd centred the limelight on themn. Trotzky refused the German de- niands, andI asked the German delegutes what they proposed ta do about 1t. And, indeed, what could tliey do? They could not (Iiap1ay thé booty ta the peoplel at home, for they had no booty. They cauîd net avow therrnselves to their other enemies as qatis- lied witit what they had gainied, For they lad galued nothiug. Ta begiu a npw military campaign againat Russa would have been as baffllng as grappling wit a hailstorm. Neither could they leave the eastern front unoccupied, simce tItis would lie ta abandon their e.ctual tenture of PolantI and Riga. M.ýorcoyer, the Germana were perfectly well aware titat the Bal- sheviki were representst.ve of no more than a samali faction of the Russian peopie', and that thte intelli- gent classes were already banding thenm#elves ta- jter ta overthraw thent witeuever the opportunity shiould offer, andI wlth unforeseeable consequences. Germany could not - strike at Russa. Site was ton vast andI impalpable andI inresiating for that. Even tetaklng of Petrograd would leave -1er just wbere bewas before. At the momt~ent of writlng cames news tbst the Bolaheviki have msde sorte sort a'r peace, but uathing is said abouit the cession af Iusan terrltory, SIX POINTS STICK OUT IN THIS SUMMRR Russia is not an open door for Germany; the G man stri\u003ce wus not staged by Berlin; Hindenbti had to follow it up witli tro mboftes about victory; is not likely to, play hîs, leau card ini the West; is faoed by certain defeat on that front. But would swap, Belgîum for a sure baud i the BaIkw By SIDNEY CORYN Itl a as clear as te suni ut noonduy that the great strike ini Austria and the greater strike ln Germany were'duie ta disappointînt andI diagust ut lte ap- parent failure of the Brest-Litovak negatiatiaus. It need hurdly bie said that even a formai peace with the Boîsileviki, witit auy peasible number af ces- sions,- would nat, have caused the Allies te relax Ilicir efforts, naer wauld, It have dispoaed titen ta ecame ta ternis ut thie cost of au inartîculate uud un- represented .Russia. Presideut Wilson made tit clear enaugit. Rusais, was not to be aliawed ta com- mil a valid suicide. Site was ta be saved lu spite of lierseif. But ai course the Germain mind waà imipenotrrable by sudh an Ides as titat. It could not conceive that the Allies would hesitale ta seize a chance ta malle Russia psy the bill, Morcover, witli that aimoat insane rellance upon moral effecîs that Gcrmauy itas always diaplayed, site believed'ltat au actual. peaco wlth Ruisi, the positive removal of tbe tinm of Russa fronm the war liat. would have a dismuaying'effect upon the western pawers. Ta fathot te German psycholagy lsa a itpelesa tasit, andI the attempt msy well lie left unniade, but it la reasonable ta believe that Germuny confldeuitly ex- pected a general pouce ta resul ut once front the Brest-Litovsk conference, or at lest that a general ýpeuce wauld be brought within easy vision. AndI the disappoîntment amoug te people waa carre- spandingly Intense. The inimediate result was, the fusion of ahl the Soclalist bodies. Philip Scheidemnaun, wito hll a- ways been moderute andI loyaliat, uow becanie somne- thing like a \"red,\" sud tankt the place vacsted by Liebkueclit wlien lie was sent ta jail. Scheldemann expressed hiniself lu the atrougest language. Ho said lte Germian representatives lad betrayed alike Germauy antI Russa, sud titat peuce had been madIe impossible. AndI thon came the strike. Il was the expression of a torturod people who lad been prom- isetI relief only ta sec it suatehed from theni. They lsd cqnftdeutly bolieved tat a pesce wîthout au- nexations and Iidemnities waXild settle their quarrel witit Russia, an.d wltli ail alter enemiea. Assurod af their practical vlctory \"on te basis of the mal).\" they could not conceive whit Il ou1tI ual. AntI titey find ltaI the offer upon whîcl they bad been buoy- iug. their lopes was nat even ta lie matIe, The peae that had seemed sa near lmmediately receded be- yond the horizon, sud an unendîug vista of more war aud mare privation toob ita place. Ta. imagine that the~ strike was engineered by te goverutueut ltself lu order ta waodue an appearance af weakness la a mere absurdlty, As woll charge lte government with arranglng the weatlier. A atrike af audit mag- nitude could be nothîng leas Ihan a. Germait disaster, sud it muy b. s far greater disaster lIait we are yel allowed ta ace. O F course lte sîrike wus easlly suppressed it its exbernala, but noue the boss it may bave a pro- nouneed bearing ou lte milhlary situation. Thc gav- erument was evidenbly frigltened. Nol only wus titere s declaratian ai martial Iaw, or a \"stale of siege\" as thte Germans cali it, but te autitorities lie- gau at once ta ressure lIe people by promises of some groat impending victory. Hindenburg au- nounced that he would b. Ln Paris in the. course of a Y: few weeks. The Junkers 'biew the customart blusts on tite war trumpet, antI drew rnnewel er 'attention ta a \"Deutschiland Uber Ailes\" whici ut last was on lte verge of accomplishmeiil Srg The government claque ahl through Germaii lie played is part lu the effort to overwhelma dia he content by expectution. How far tliey succeed ei d we bave, of course, no mieuns of knowifll lie The cessation of the atrike means nothing ex ri. cept thut there were bayonets 'enough. ta cofl] pel il ta cease. But the spirit that producel the strike is nlot umenable to bayonets. It ifaS be -villing-probubly it la- to watch the birdi and deulli of one more glowing promise. Gel many cannot aff ord ta pour oil on the embera 0~ popular diseontent by failure. Even a partial vic tory, te semblance of a victory, the pretense of' , victory, might serve. But a fuilure, a defeat, wouc now be ruin. Carl Ackerman said that Germai nerves couid nlot now bear a defeut, or words t( that effect. The-German at heurt la a coward. Tita cruel are always cowards. The inspiration of 1051 and suffering la foreigu ta the Germun cliaracter Witli every will lu the world ta atrike and injure the German commandera wlll see ta It so far as theil akili shahl suffice that they dQ not strike In vaur' And tliey are likely te choose the weakest victimi il a ight. F OR- these reasons It does not seent likely tha Gerniany will play lier curd lu VhI1e weit, whler, lier defeat is aimont as certain as anythiug milit9.fl cati be. She msy be compelled 'ta follaw a westeri \u003ctard played hy lier enemies, for there la certaifili no reason ta assume that ahe bas the initiative. I other words the Alleés are quite likely ta strik4 firat and so ta force thte pace and produco a west cru battle. We are now gradually recovering frof1 aur firat tendency ta exaggorate thte number of Ger man troops in te west, or Ilkely ta be sent there Colonel Repington, formerly of the liondon Tîmies who lias becu lu lte deepeat mourning since thi beginulng of' the war, tells us that Germany liai piled up, 165 divisions, a truly formid.'able total i the Gerrman division uow cctnsistod of 20,000 incal which - lt daca nat. Germauy reduced lier dîvisiol ta 14,000 men ovor s yoar' ago, and sbe la belcv84 by sanie ta b ave still furthier roducedit since the\"l This would give lier an army Qi 2,310,000 ln lte wesl Probably even titis figure la taa, higli. Tbe Echa ffi Paris, usually well informod, givo tbe German fore, in lte west as 152 divisions of 12,000 men oucb, 0~ 2,000,000, men lu ahl, witb same extras. GerinanY ays the same authorlty, lias left about a mihlliffl men on the casteru' front, andI tliey will stsy ther, until the Russian outlook la cloar. Iu facl alie 11W not mnate#lally changed tite relative numibera of bel men in east and west, but site bas citanged thet quallty. That la ta say, abe bas sent lier best inel ta thte wesl or elsewhere, andI the inferior ones t, the east. Site lias sent 100,000 men la Italy to l'el] the Austrians, andI 10,000 men ta Macedonla an(~ Tuirkey. But, it may be said, whal about Austria? Austri bas no men ta aend, andI if sho did have auy ta sPar' site would sentI themn ta Italy, wliero they are v deutly badly needed. The French gaverumefll I regponsilhle for tbe statement Iliat Austria bas S' enty-nine divisions in te fildlt. 0f these elle l1i, forty-flve ln Italr, tblrty-lwa on tbe oastern frol# sud two iu lte Balkans, I, la pliviois- titat Austr1ý las nothlug ta coirtrlbute ta thte west. She 0511 no bold lier own iu Italy, where te Allies are coidt1l ing a slow but succes8ful offensive. Sa far as8t Allies on tbe wost frofit are concerned we are 901ne wbat lu thte dark, but thte Frencb, Engliali, Belgi\u0026111 sud Portukuese eau not total bass titan 4.000,000 lie If we place titeir united strength at 3,000,000, arW most absurdly low figure,\\ we stili have a oe largely superior~ to any tb4t Germany eau 11o",
         "CANAI)IAN COIVB'iER IPOSTLD On W/hat's.Doing the World 0vé into a paragraph summary by the Outlook from mn- terial furnisheti in Williami M. Salter's '-apprec!i, tion\" o! Nietzsche: \"The Superman or group_ o! Supermen xvii! bave xvorlti control, the sooner tbe botter. We must ceuse entioavoring to preserve the siclt anti the feeble. Our tiuty to tbern is \"to help tbem pass away.* They May- core to choose their .own passing away, çlying thon in perhaps'greater tiiguity than they bave evor -liveti, anti almost xinning the right to 111 e again.\" As with intivitinals, s0 with races. \"Races that cannot be utilizeti in sorne way may lbe allowed to dule ont.\" Perils, disastors, wars, are a!! desirable, both becanse they develbp the noble qualities in the strong, anti bocause tboy destroy the weak. \"It is no srnall ativantago to have a hundreti Damocles- ,swortis over one-tbereby one learnis to (lance, cornes to freetiom of motion.\" There will corne n groat war, the war for an idea, for the rule anti arganization of the earth; anti In this war Nietzsche's blgher men xvil! lent. Morality furnlbbes no objection, !fQr \"there is nothing obligatory about xnorality. The only moral ,authority is general or social.\" It la fur- nishet by the custom of the social gronp anti varies witb the varions groups. Real standard for ail there is noire,, anti Nietzsche does net hesitato to cal! bis followers \"immoralists.\" \"Morality, belng that whlch produces gooti for the group, isa not a gooti ovor It. The group owes no service to nnything beyond itself; nor as creator of gooti anti evil Is i subject to its own crention. . ' .The members of one group mny tecoive, rob, kl!, thoso of another group xvlthout the slightost self-reproach. In a famo us passage (in- farnous, some would say) Nietzsche tiescribes a highly moralizei 'race, is members self-restraineti in their tiealings with one another, anti showing all manner o! mutual considernteness, tiellcacy of feel- Ing, loyalty, anti frIentiship, falling on a stranger race, murdering, bnrning, bavishing, torturlng, anti with no graver feelings than those of students on a lark.\" As to Got, the Supqrman will replace Goti. THEN HE KNIT HIS BROWS. Infantryman (to the telephonIst~ lm difficultiee): WiliUe, you've droppedl !our knlttingl -Lient. S. Baghot De La Bere, R.iG.A., in the Sketch -The task of the race is to create these Lords or Gods-'f yoil cannot create a Goti, Zarathustra says, stop talking of one.\" P EOPLE are beginning to remember what anY have almost forgotten, that the. Bible is besities being the world's best guide to lIfe and char- acter is also the greatest book of reference on spirit- istic matters. There is a tendency abroati to justify, Biblical stories in the liglit of modern phenorna, just as there wvas once a tendency among a material- istie set to discredit sucb stonies as tbe Ascension, the Transfiguration andi the Apocalypse. On the other banti, expounders of boe!e warn us against any idea tbat the deati can possibly communicate tii- rectly with the living; anti on this point Sir Oliver Lodge in the N~ineteeiith Century taltes a tilt agalnst the, ecclesiastical ban on spirit-communlication. He makes a partidular point of the Transfiguration, 'tire story of whicb may bc useful in getting at tbe point raiseti by Sir Oliver. Jesus taketh Peter, James anti John, bis brother, says tbe apostie, and brlngetb tireur up into an bigb mounitain apart. Anti was transfigured before them; anti bis face titi shine as the sun, anti bis raiment wvas white as the llght. Anti beholti, there appeareti unto tbemr Moses anti Elijah talking witb hlm . . .beholti, a brigbt cloui. overshatioweti tbem, anti beholti a voice ont of the clouti, which saiti, This is my beloved Son. In whom 1 arn well pleaseti; hear ye bim. Anti wben tbe disciples beard it, they feli on their face, ai'lt were sore afraiti. Anti Jesus came anti toucheti them, anti saiti, Arise, and be flot afralid. And when tbey bad llfted up their eyes, tbey saw no man, save Jesus only. Anti as they came tiown from the mounitain, Jesus chargeti them, saylng, Tell the vision to no man, un- tii the Son o! Man be risen again from, the deati. Sir Oliver takes ibis as the gospel instance most akin to our poor deallngs with the subject-the event which was accompanleti 1y communion with men long since «eparteti this life, who appeareti In visible and audible anti fully materializeti forîn. Therein, hoe says, the Master Hlmseif.a»lowed, His -occult mediumlStUC faculties full play, and convers'ed, we ,are tolti, wlth Moses anti Elijah. lié people lleve It? ý1fe'onfess I shoul4 ho boui to diebelleve not only this but ail these ,strange stories, wore it not for My own experience on a far lôrl~li. For l1\u0026wZér as It ls, yeêt it is sufficient to iluake me realize that the things asserteti In connexion with the Transfiguration are possible, anti under tire stress of un overwhelming Personality may, have actually happeneti. The h1storical ovidence belng as- ï3umeti gooti enough-and naturally as to that I am no expert-we may assume that these things did occur. ,Anyhow we must be right In nssumlîng that Christian Ministers belleve ln thoir occurr'ence. Why thon pretenti that Christ objects to every kinti of dealing or holding commnifou wlth the dead-with the dead wlto are not extinct but keen andi vlvid anti intelligent? Do they Imagine that He takes no pity on the boreaved mothers and widows of. to-day, anti that He objects to our lamne but flot unavalling efforts to bring them couifort by ntllzing-the facts brougbt té our ltnowletige through patient anti rever- ent sclentlfic lnquIry? Sir Oliver says that dlsllke anti dental of any kInti of real or apparent superuaturallsm ought surely flot to ho able to flourlsh iu an ecclesiastical atmosphere. Most religions doctrine Is 'saturated wlth suiperna- turalism: hence, as far as that goes, there neeti be ne complalut. Nor Indeeti le theire -complaint on that grounti; Religious controversiallots complain rather that it is the wrýng kInti of'super-nature whicli has _o be Invoketi. They claim not that the facts are uni- Transf iguration .Explaine4 Sir Oliver Lodge says it was The Ha usf rau at Downing St. Mr. Bottomiley says Beware the Petticoat Spy @MG0EWý J r",
         "CANADIAN -COUJRIER truc blit that lu their modern form tbey are diaboiic;, tkat,1! la net the powers of good with wbich wc arc deaiug lu psyclilcal lnquîry but powers et evii. Somne leaders of Uic Roman Chrcbh arc volubie lu ibis di- rection, Uiougb Uic lives of their Saints should 7give tbem pause. Thei attribution o! any unweicome power to tbe ugency of Beeizcbub ts uot anew device, it is a vcry ancien! and rbëspcctable accusation. Indeed, remembeAig certain' bîstorîcal instances, it ia, dif- ficuît altogether to refrain frdi- regardîng a dlaim' of tits klud as rather an excessive kiud o! compli- ment. Nu! ta go higbcr, the Inspirations ot Joan o! Arc werc officialiy attributcd to the machinations o! SatatL Sucb an opinion, bowcvcr, la not rcally a Judg'mcut bascd on Uic facts, It 18 merely a prima fadle prejudice against them. It Je net beid by Uic few cburcbmen wbo have expcrienccd or studlcd the phenomena; the elemenit o! gond lu them then becomes manifest. rrORÂTIO BOTTOMLEY la indignant again. HThis time thc cause 0f bis Ir, 18a . oman. 1! bas taken Horatio about two ycars to make up bis mWd to castigate tItis creature of bis cou- tempt; but he docs it exctremely well. To Illustrate the- danger, be says, lu which the prescut disgracefui laxlty places us' as a nation, ]et me tell you that a Ge rman woman, who- was not naturalizcd until two montbs atter wc bad come to grips witb the Huns, vas actually allowed te reside aIt 10 Downing Street-the residence ot the Prime Minîster, the arcauum of tbe secesunumpr at van-lu September, 1916. There wcre rumors about 1! a! thc timc-they were vague, as-tno decent person belcved thcm. J! was truc we'had ail becu. startled by Uic statements, wbich on Investigation proved to bc only ton, truc, that there was more-Uian une member o! Uic govemnranent who Uiuught il de- cent te continue te empluy German chauffeurs atter war bad brolcen out-une actually allowcd bis ser- vant to go for a holiday trip te Switzcrland! But aGerman woman ut Uic Prime MInistcr's bouse lu Downing Street-that was unthinkable; who could or would. belleve 1!? Weil, I bave all Uic tacts and documents ut my disposai, aud Uiey prove Ii coutest- ably that sucb a woman was pcrmitted te resIde ut No. 10. And I say uubcsitatingly that it is a uhame and a scandai that sncb an outrage should bave been commltted. I mligbt have hcld my peace about this iagracetal proccedlng If 1 bad auy evîdeucce to Ebow that the present Home Sccretary and thc t-est o! Uic Goverumeut were more alive thaný their pre- decessors as te Uic lurkiug danger o! thîs wanton !oliy. Tbc woman wbo vas allowed, te tube up resi- douce lu Downing Street was Caroline Hanemanu, muid to a Mrs. Grahami Smith, a relative i\u003ey marriage o! Mr. Asquitb. 1 have in my possession letters she wrote on 10 Downing Street notepaper. I bave Uic date ut ber naturalization-October 13tb, 1914. Nov l! matters nothing te me that this woman o! fifty, wbu bas spcn! hait ber litetime lu this country, may be the. meut honorable seul alive. Hen motives, ber attitude towards Uic enemies ot Uic land of ber birtb, may bc as pure as thc driven sno-w. Be thn! su, it bas uotbing tu do with my argument. WItat 1 repeat, la disgracetul in tua! tbis nation, lu Uic tbroes uf a life-and-death struggle with au unserupulous toc, sheuld be subject to Uic danger- I Ignore Uic iudigity--of a Germaîn-born woman liv- ing in Uic officiai residence o! the Prime Minleter. Nothing can excuse tue cuormity of the-offence. If Mn. Asquith did net knov what I bave cxposed, he should have kno'wn. Certainly bis sister-in-law knew. And this la Uic pertinent question: Who stood guar- autee for ber boua-fIdeu-wbo dared, lu Uic face ot wan emergencles, with Uic words \"'once a German, always a German\" ringlng lu tbheir cars, te go bail for Mise Caroline Hanemann? F ARMERS' Paliaments, says Uic Grain Groere' Guide, are mure than conventional conventions. They are deliberative bodies whieh bave a great edfcint shaplng public opinion. Tbey bave had a vondertul aud beufilcial effeet lu shaping provincial legllateon Iu the veut aud are beginniug 'ta have an eff\u003e ct. at Ottawa. The. Canadiau Couneil et Agr1ealture haî dohe great w9wk for the. fansuers. As an Instane, evry farmer la tin bu 9 than be would be but fo r tbe action o! the Counill iast summer lu rc!using ta have thc price fixed ut $L»3. The big, farnera' tradinig companies have savcd millions o! dollars for the farmers by straight- ening out Uic grain trade, lu provliIng tacilities for co-operative livcstock marketing and purcbasing fat-mers' ,supplies lu large qjuantities. But the strength ot these bodies does not lie lu thcmsclvcs. It la lu the 75,000 urganized farmers wbo stand bc- hiud thcm. Tbey can oniy accompish. reforms for the farter lu proportion to Uic number o! metubers lu theorganizations. Their work la not yet doue. Itla jus! bcgiuning. For the duration o! the war and afterwards conditions wiil be sucb that thcy can continue tu reuder yeoman service. Big business Je \u003cfnot isleep. I! la not ictting its patnlotism luterfere witb Its intercats. It can be couuted on to shlft Uic war burden froin one group to anuther until It reaciies the fanmer wheu the shlftiug stops and the puying begins. The ungauized farmers wIii bave the figbt o! tueir lives ta prevent an undue share o! this- var- buzr d-en trom being. loaded- upon thent. In that 11gb! they vii need Uic backing 'et- ail theý fat-mers. The only wuy te make sure o! -their sup- port in to get tbcm inte Uic organizations., The àas- katchevan Grain Growers' Association bus made a good stant., J! la ou! te douIble its memberahip dur- ing the comlng few. wceks. This wcek Uic blg Sas- katchevan convention la belng held lu Regina. There la as great an oppurtunlty in the uther provInces as The New Policeman 'on the Beat -Sennun lAndnay, in The. Sydney Bullet u. Ia Saskatchevan, Lfer doubllng Uic mcnmbershlp. Au organized campaign led by thc officers o! Uic a4so- diations eau do much tovards increaslng the ment- bcrsbip, but after all, Uic work muet largcly de- volve upon Uic raiik and file o! Uic preseut member- sbip. A MAURICE LOW, in the Ameican Review o! *Revievu, writes vith somne force, considen- sble accuracy snd muchinlterest. on The. PrôÔbIei ot the French-Canadian. Âceurding te Mn. Lov,-vo ot course la an American-the prublent lu veny simple snd ve!ry \u0026ecnte. Hie article bas tewer lnaccuracies tuan many articles on that subject, but such as there are eau be gathered front two statemnicns. He says Us!t Uic Fathers ot Confedera- tien madie a great mistake lu permitting French te be an officiaI lauguage by Uic tenta ofthUi B. N. A. Act; andi that Quebeckers are net Canadlans. The. Frenob4Janadians, he says, are a cunicus study In natlonaiity. TItey have ne paselonate long- iag for France and ne bitter hatred agaln8t England because Uic Union Jack andi nu! Uic Tni-cokor la Uic symbol et their nationality. Thcy have nu! Uic sain. feeling agaînat JEngland as Uic couqucror tUs! the Irih have. They bave no long lis! of real or Imag. inary grievancea te b. avengeti. Tbey do net dream ot th. day' vien the yoke ofth Uioppressor shail be cas! off aud once again they shall renev their al- legiauce te France. France la nut their motherlaud, th.y anu net ber cildren; their heurts do hot itIrill wheu tbey recail ber glorious past or ber vali-s deetts of to-day. They are nlot English; of EnglÎ hIstory they are almost totally ignorant; the 9611 of tbe English people 15 foreign to them. And th are not, whicb perbaps is most curious*,of ail, Cal dian. I'recognize tbat there is a mînority of Fren Canadians tn whom Canada means as much as docs to the Englisb-speaking people, and in t Canadian regiments at the front there are Frel\u003c Canadians wbo bave fougbt witb the samne gallant as the men train ail the other parts of the Briti Empire, and who bave sbown the supreme test patriotism: the willingness to die In defense of col try. But a minorlty, and especially a numerica. smail minority, l8 nlot representatve of the mna and wbat I say about the French-Canadiau 18 a tr presentatlon of tbe majority. In the citles uf Montreai aud Quebec, wberc si by side are shops wlth Frencbh and EnglIsb. nain, and the girl or man'bebind the counter will atisw you iu French or Euglisb according to the langulf of your question, and the street-car conductor Js ai billnguai, and the newsboys seli both French W~ Englieh neWspapers, and the gamins slang eaOcl otb lut apatois compounded of the dregs of botb tongtl' there 4s socially no 'more. contact between French a] English t1ian is'neceëssary, in fact, one may Put more correctly by saying tbat\" uuless. intercourse absbiutely necessary It la avoldcd. Money spea a universal language,' it alone -kuows no prejudi aud feels no patriotism, lt is witbont class distlnctid or racial animosities. Iu business, therefore, Frenc mnan aud Englishman w1il excbauge money, tbey W trade because tbcy bave to, but outalde of the si4 or the office, when there is no longer anything be, made au d -men - an exercise their natur al i clinations, tbe.'two races heep apart. H A S tbe conductress become an institution, 0On London tram, to be followed lu time by ti UcabbIueý, lu company wltb' the' tarmerette,'tl munitionette, the dustwoman, the motor-woi and the manageresa? Iu the land of the bistor barmiaid-who may yet be aboIsbed-ýwhy not? - rcsjiy, It seems, thc conductreas bas becu loi euough ou the tramns and the omnibuses et Lond\u003c to merit -a descriptionu as a distinct type; accordit to the London Times, wbich says that the condil tor--whom houer attend and famne be-medal-bas large 'numbers answered bis country's caîl. and miss hM. The costume of the couductre s~ answers one6 thc tetp- of beauty-fftncss for thc wor lu baud. bat set ou at. an angle that bespeake. an aiert miW a tuuic \"dasbed. with draps ut onset,\" It may lie, lie: aud there, but with a place lu It for everytbiug al everythiug tu its. place; a shirt that doce not car: the wet,. and a pair of buskins that challenge 3 miration less tItan they reat the cye. She bas an eugaging way of auking for your fa ---If you do not~ bappen to bave -eaved ber a jour1'% by paylng lt below-as If bai! apoi.glzlng for tl prosalc nccessity, and of receiving it almout as favor persoual te ber. She bas a still more cbpJi lng habit of forgetting to ask. and givlng you~ tl oppurtunity nt paying conscieiice-money, or eveil asking. not for the fare but bow rancb it ought ta 1 and so enlistiug your sympatby as weii as I honor. She secs a loke more often than she mak, oue, and can bold a conversation, whcn business slack, witbout' feeling too strngly the nced te h ber owu ln it. She is ut ber best wbeu wouIld( soldiers, or Colonials wbo de nu! know their Lo don, come aboard. lier eye then easiiy per5liSd, the mnan lu mufti, If he bas nut already donc 00, . give Up bis seat to those; and for these--she WI if it lay with ber, deposit them at the popercon And ber endurance. lt Je not easy for ber to8tal the racket, evcn te stand at ail], for s0 many bu and so many days; sometimes elle lu more r tItan others-that lu all-but the work la done. A Uic pluck of ber, At- a time when \"thc arrow b filith by day\" was givlng place to Uic ubuggy nigbt,\" and Uic Journcy was away train biole wards the more unhealthy parts, one said: \"Ide mimd 4A murgh frn,- nv.I# 4fl'\u002b1-,. - ..Al",
         "CANADIAN COURIER FORTH K-NOWING PROPOS of Rudyard Kipling's fifty spoond birth- day on Decombor 3Otb lnst, bis former edi- tonial superlor, E. Ray Robinson, observed: ere was one poculiarit\u003e' of Kipling's work whicb, lly must mention, namely, the onormous amount ]k be usod to tbrow about. In the boat of sum- White cotton trousers and a thIn veet oonstituted Office attire, and b\u003e' the day's end be waa spot- ail over like a Dalmatian dog. He bad a habit iPPing bis pen frequentl\u003e' and deep into tbe ink- andi as aIl bis movoments were abrupt, almost Y, the ink used to'fiy. Wben be darted into my 11, as ho used to do about one thing or gnotbor Illuectlon wltb tho 'contents of tbe paper a dozen ýe In the mornIng 1 bad te about te bim to 'stand othorwise, as I knew b\u003e' oxperlence, the abrupt h. would. make, and tbe fiourish witb wbich ho Oti the proo lun bMs band before me, would send ýntfuI o! lInk-lie always bad a full pen in his 1-flying over me.\" L.RT, at least, o! the gl!ts o! Jas cha Heifetz, the IRussian violînist who b as been tbe musical son- Ml o! the curront season, may be oxplalnod b\u003e' dilty, for bis fathor was In bils own way a cblld Llgy upon tbe violin. Ruben Heifetz began to at the. age o! four on a toy fiddle strung with ads, inter teaching himsel! upon a gonuine in- Meont. At *tbe age o! twolve ho was already earn- la living as vlolinist In varions cafos-chautant, at sixteen ho hati advanced to memberohp, in Phlony orchestras, playing lu Riga, Lodz, andi saw. ta \"frugalit\u003e' dance\" lu tashionabie Montcialr, ItJ., recently, those wearlug patent leather 13, eUhk stockings, or blgb collars were fiued fIve 9 eaib for eaoh offence, those wearIng marcel Il ten cents, wblle wearers o! eveningdresa, or tuniio,\" bad to pa\u003e' tweuty-fIve, conta to the 1gement. Tha, a vory considomable amount was ýd for a war-rellef purpos 'e 'In tis way seeme ave coucoaled fmom many the lrony lu the a!- Feshiouablo people, In, certain circuatancos, Day an extravagant prices to forward the cause ligality. ýTElR ail, thero le a simple explanation of the 8BIccess obtUined by tbe Gorman' raiders on ah convoya In the Nortb Son. The Gemman ~being always, In barbon, cau bo kopt-as dlean ne- p\u003ein. Tbo3r carry just enough ammunition- 110 raid, Ju-5t enough coal, no heavy stores, audý non3 are ail fresb. The British honts, coustant\u003e' 3a, get theîr bottoms more or les foui. They Shave reserves of qopal and ammuniîon for ail tuliIties, and as the\u003e' bave to do ell runnlng fr5' the\u003e' have, quite a load o! stores for repaire rlll as food. \"If shipe were the same seed. ,al,,says an authorit\u003e' stnalght from tbe Il Sea itsel, \"4the German wouid auily be the 18 12n4er oxleting circumetances. go to catch 1We have to be much fastor In the flret Iu- VEIRAL Canadian prairie cmofs, says a Unitedi 'ttsexellange, are luvolved lu se$ious flnan- 1lobrnes as an luhenitaxice from tbe boom days W1ý Years ago. These municlpalities are really v 5tia of that wboiesae speculation In meal ýe Whth la nover content to keep Itself wlthln he buride. Eacb citizen becomes a self-con- td\"booster\", o! bis town.' A straugar outeriug M'ay' fad it a comparatlvely DL smaîl and~ unpretentious addition, as lire station an X office accommodation for the old flimsy houses torn dow-n. But out of the gigantic dump rise the concrete and steel walls 'of ',he new city hall and a palatial block of stores which wouid do credit to a Chicago or a Montreal. rhe whole effect is that of a misflt. bt D AVY JONES, whose locker waa never so full as it îs now, is coming,,Ltis said, to tihe rescue of F'rance. He bas freely and unstintlngly offered the use of bis abundant sea water for the purpose of xnaking war bread. Davy Jones' sensible idea wae that, by utilizing the \"briny.\" a good deal of sait and milk could be saved for other purposes. Lt is said that the offer bas been eagerly and gratefully ac- cepted by French chemists, and that the new deli- cacy is very popular ia Cherbourg. p Tf ROTZKY is endowed with a scalpei4like critical Sfaculty, schooled by years of revolutionary ac- tivlty and study of socialist Ilterature. Tempera- mentally he is like those brIlliant JewisJi labor le7aders on the East Side whose minds require the stimulus of a strike to brîng out their resourceful- ness and thoir ingonious flghting tactics whiob have won many a bard-fought battie for the organized workers. That he la pro-German uobody familiar wlth the history of the persecution by the Prussian stato of the Russian revolutIonists can-believe. But Trotzky perhaps overestimates the effect of revolu- tionary propaganda, upon the German people under the speil of Prussianlem. German social domocracy bas itsolf bocome Prussianized. Lt-Is -laéacion and tactics' the least revolutionary of Sooiallst parties. BRIGH'T SAYINGS Recently Made, by Other People 0individuals o! 'a highly sensitive musical tom- T peramot, the feeling o! intense sadness pro- ducod by such a composition as ÇChopin'snoble \"Funeral Marcb\" or his \"Prolude In E Minor\" is as markod as the exhilaration and onliveument rosult- ing from. boarlng one o! bis military polonaises or a 101Wy popular air sucb as \"Tbere'll be a- Hot Time i 1n the Old Town To-nlgbýt.\" But even the average person wbo is neither musical in the sonse of being an artlst, nom even an amateur porformer,. regponds to chorus singing i11 a, way that 1s bard to ovor- estlmato.-Edltor of Munsoy's. THIS world la flot Utopla. It noverwlll be Utopla. TAnd since dIfferencos and contentions must always aris among mon and nations, It should be the study of statecraft to devise means for peaceful adjudication rather than to abandon the world of the future to the IllogIcal and muinous arbitraments of war.-Egditor of tho Argonaut. BUT a new day, please God, la dawnlng., À new eL ra la emerging ont o! t4e hîdeous storm-woltcr o! the blackost night in buman hlstory; a new worid la in maklng for'us. The darkest houm cannot shake our falth -that Right le Might wheu ail la sald and doue, and that preclous blood *poured out tu its defence'Is neyer sbed In valn.-Ada Camtbridge. M% S let us beware. Let las not bo led away eitbor S by 'frlond or foe. We must \"carry on,\" making wbatever sacrifices are nocessary and memembering tbat the enemy le far more hard-preased tban we, until we are In a position toýrdictate terus of poace, and not merely to diecu as them.-Major Ian Ha\u003e' Beitb, In World'e Work. tt THE world, we sa'. must ho made sata for De- Tmocracy. One o! the surest ways o! dolng tbat, and one of the absolutoly ossential roqlsites, le ta make Deocracy safe for the world.-Col. Harvey. 'insignificant Ll\u003e'aUIOUS, gaudy, mystic Bagdad! A City' o! tow hal d- L Golden Domes! The Cit\u003e' o! the Tbousand andi di dance hall, One Wonderful Arabian Nights-Genll, Aiaddln, Ali profeasionai Baba, Slubad! Rot!! Bagdad-mlltary objective, langed. The map 34, sector E-16, Turklsh town, 134,000 Inhabi- ffect la much tants. Jiiet like the rest'of the Mesopotamiau \u003cbjec- ý torn Up and tives-duet and, heat.-Artbur T. Clarkr, LAUG HABILITIES A LADY crossing !omn Detroit to Windsor was asked by the customs If she bnd anything dutiable. Sho assured him that sho bad uotb- ing but woaring apparel in ber trunits, but at the bottom o! the iargest one, whîcb to hlm. seomed the nLost suspicious, were found twelve bottles of whisky. \"Madam,\" said the officor, snmcastically, \"do yen caîl that wearing apparel?\" \"Cortailal\u003e,\" she replied, sweotly.- \"Thoso are my busbnnd's nigbt-caps.\" T HE judge's five-year-old son John bad been naughty when bis parents wore having com- pan\u003e' and had been ropmovod. Tbat nigbt when bis mother weat up to hoar John sa\u003e' bis prayors she suggested that ho agir Goti to toach bis parents bow to bming hlm up properly John was quite penitent and pmnyod bumbly: \"Please God, toach mother bow to make me a good boy.\" He pausod for a moment, thon added tboughtfully: \"And fathor, tao, if you cati do anything with hlm.\" ACOUPLE o! tourists dmlving in the picturesque bilîs o! Santa Barbara decided to take a short cut to the ocean front, but were not quite sure o! the road. The onl\u003e' buman visible boing a nagged lad sunuing bimsel! la the dust at the side o! the rond, the driver addrossed hlm. \"Say, boy, bow do you meacb the ocean fmom home?\" Whereupon the boy, without battlng an oyolash, gravoly rosponded: \"Weil, whlcb ocean do you want to go to?\" ut MOTHER was ont, and Sistor Sue was putting Mon hem bost blouse, so six-yoam.old Bobby bati to entertaîn Sue's young man. As is the way wlth bis kind, ho bogan to pi\u003e' the unfortuate callor wltb questions. \"Mr. Brown,\" ho began, \"what le a popinjay ?\" \"Wby-eb-a popiaja\u003e' le a--eh-vain bird.\" \"ýAre you a bird, Mr. Brow-nr \"No, o! course not.\"l \"Weil, that's fnnny. Mother said you were a popînjay, and fathor sald thoro was no donbt about you're bolng a ja\u003e', anti Sue saiti there didu't seexu much chance o! your poppin', and uow you sa\u003e' you. aren't a bird at ail!\" OMETHING was the mattar with tho stop-signal '-'bll o! the Toonorville trolley car, and the con- ductor bad to wbistle te the motorman tbat trlp-- one whletie to stop, oue whistle to go ahoad. At one place the car made a long stop, and some of tbe passeugene bogan to get uaeasy. Oua sought the rear platform. andi found thé conductor eatlng a frugal luacheon. \"Say', bow -long are wo gain' ta stand haro? Wbat are wo wnlin' for?\", asiret the passeager. The couductor swaiiowod bard andi was underetooti to repi\u003e': «Looky bore, I aln't got nothîn' but dry crackters' for my lunch. An' you'll ba!ter -wait tili 1 get 'em swaliered good betoro 1 kmn whistle'\" TREAS'URY notes are ýaIl rigbt, but tho\u003e' bnven't Tthe jîngle and glittor o! gold coin. This is the opinion o! an Eugllsh rallway porter, wbo bas a weekly growl about it on pay day. Ricently he me- celved a particulaml\u003e' dlrty Pound note. This he ilgereti so ginger\u003e' that the pa\u003e' dlen saiti, chat- fingly: 'Trightenod at the germe, Tom?\" Tom eyed bis questioner sadi\u003e' as ho retorteti: \"Not a bit, sir, No genin coulti ive on a railway pqrton's mono\u003e'.\" THE homoism o! France bas made the French Tlanguage p9pular. On this heati there le a stor\u003e' lllustrating the tact of M4. Jusemaut, tbe French ambassador. À senator at a incheoni said to M. Jussemndt: \"Take-e---eskn voo voo-iy-I men- er-passy-moi sill voo piay-er--\" M. Jusseranti laid hie baud ou the sanator'. shouider and in bis excellent English sali: \"My dear sir, my ver\u003e' dear sir, do, pleasa, stop speaklug trench- Your accent la se Parislan that, poeitively, it maires me borne- aickTM",
         "CANADIAN COURIER ~ I1u~trfed.1*'T.V. Nciie Copyright by Paget Newspaper Service-BY Special Arrangement with Thos. Allen, Publishers. ALITTL)@ before six Constance Sherriil and Spearman called -A to inquire after bim aud wera admitted for a few moments to bis room. She came to him, bent ovar hlm, wbile abe spoke tbe few words of sympatby the nurse allowad te -har; she stood back then wbila Spearman spoke to hlm. Iu the suc- ceeding days, he saw ber nearly evary day, accompanied- always by ber fathar or Spearman; it xvas the full two waaks the nursa had allotted for bis. remalnlng lu the bospital before ha saw\",her alone. Tbey bad brougbt hlm home, the day bafore-sba and ber father, lu the motor-to the bouse on Astor Street. Ha had inslstad on returning there, refusing the room lun thair bouse whicb they hadt offered ; but the doctor bad enjolnad outdoors and moderata axer- cîse for hlm, and she had made hlm promise to come and walk wltb ber. Ha went to the Sherrili bouse about ten o'clôek, and tbey we lkecl. north- ward toward the park. 'It was a mlld, sunny morulng wlth warm wind from the soutb, which sucked »4p the last patches of snow from the lawns an~d drled the tiny :yclsof water ,across tba waiks. Looklng to tha land, one mlgbt saq' that spriag soon would be ou the way; but, looklng to the laka, mldwinter- bald. The counterscrap of concrets, bayond the witbared sod that edged the Driva, wàs sbeotbad lu ie; the frozan' spray-bumnmocks beyond staamad lu the sun; and out as far as one iêould see, iloas floated close together, exposlng only liera a-ad thara a bit of blua. Wlnd, cold and cbIlllng, waftadi off thîs tee' field, taklng tba warm south breaza upon its flanks. GLANCING up at ber companlon Gfroma tima to time, Constance saw the coler comiug to bis face, and lha stroda beside ier (lutte staadly. Whatevar was bis inheritance, his- car talniy were stamîina and vitality; a little iless--or a -ittle dissipWtlon of tham-and ha mligbt not bave re- covered at a]l, mucb less bava leapad back to strangth as ha bad done. For sgince yesterday, the lauguor which bhad held hiim was gene. Thay haited a minuta near tha south entranca of tha park at tbe Et. Gaudans' \"Lincoln,\" wýhlch ha had inot praviously sean. The gaunt, sad figure o! the \"rail-splitter\" lu bis 111- flttlng clothas, saemad ta recall somie- thing te hlm; for ha gianced swlftly at ber as tbay turnad away. \" Miss SherrlU,\" ha askad, \"have you evar stayad eut lu the country?\" \"I go ta nortbern M4ichigan, up by the straits, almost evary summer for part of the time, at laast; and once lu a whlle we open the bouse ln wiuter, too, for a waak or so. 1t's quita wlld -treas and -saud and shore and the 'watar. I'va b'ad somne of My 1-\"t ÇONCERING the mysterious fate of old !\u0026en Corvet, head of corvet, Sherrili a.nd Spearman, great lakes shippers in (bC'. ore suddenly disappears. Alan Conrad, from Kansas, bias the contract of malting the dîscovery. Previously unknown te bimself, lie is the son of Corvet. Conrad searches his father 'i house and discovers an'intruder who is trying te fipd something and thinks CJonrad is the ghost of somwbody who, is connected with the Miwaka? Wliat was the Miwaka? Conrad gropes for a clue until SIrerrill reveals how (Jervet left his property»tohimse1f. In a stormy interview with Spearman, CJonrad gets stili more of the clue te the mystery of the M5iâka. Hýe makes a secret enemy of Speannan, who is in -love with Constance Sherrili, From old Wassaquam, Corvet's Indian servant still in the bouse, lie learus the legend of the 'Drum-a .~ that the Indiai lias just ejected an unweloome visiter. Conrad ges out' te find the man, and is sandrbagged. tinmas up thare.\" \"You've neyer beau out 'on tha plains?\" uJust to pass over-them on the train on the Way to the coast.\" \"Tbs.t woid be ln wlnter, or lui spring; I was thlnking about the plains lu late summar, wbeu we-Jim and Betty, the chidren o! the 'people I was witb lu Kansa- \"I rememlbèr tbem.\", \"Wbeu' we used te play atý being, plonears la our sunflowar shacks.\" \"Sunfiowar shacks ?\" sha questionad. 11 was dreamlng we were building tbem agaîn wban I was dalirlous just after 1 was burt, It seams. 1 thougbt that 1 was bacli lu Kansas and wes ilttie agaîn. The prairie was ail btrown as ut is lu late summer, browu billows of drlad grass wbicb let yçu This shame, this horror, were hie Inheritance. sea the chips o! lîmastona and flint scattared ou tha ground bauaatb; and iu tba bollows there wera acres and acres of sun-flowers, tbree tîmas as taîl as aither Jim or 1, and wlth stalks as thlcl\u003c as a man's wrlst, wbare Jlm and Betty and 1 . . . and, yen, Miss Sharrill, wara playlng.\" \"!' sha said, -bewllderedly. \"Wa cut patbs tbrougb the sun- fiowers wlth a corn kuife,\",Alan' con- tlidd, not looklug at ber, \"and built bouses lu tbem by twining the cut otalks lu and out among those still standing. Ped wouderad, you ses, wbat yeu must have beau lka wbeu you were a lîttie girl. en, 1 suppose, Iwben I was délirious, I saw you that way.\" S HIE bad looked up at hlm, a littia apprehensively, afraid tbat ha was going to say something more; but his look reassured ber. \"lThen that,\" sbe bazardod, \"must bava beau bow the' bospital people learnad our name. I'd wondared about that; tbey atd you were uncousclous first, and than delirlous, and wban you spoke you said, among othar names, mine-Connie and Sba rrll.\" Ha colorad ani glauced away. \"I tbougbt thay might bave told you that, se I wauted you to kuow. Thay say that lu a dream, or lu delirium, after \u003cyon? brain establishas the first absurdity-Ilke ycour playing ont among the sunflowers with me wheft we were little-everything aise ls con- sistent. I wouldn't call a littia girl 'Miss Sherrili,' of course. Ever since- I've known you, I ýcouldn't heIp tblflk- ing a great deal about you; you're not like any one els2 l've ever knowfl. But 1 didn't want you to think thought of you-familiarly.\" \"I speak of you always as, Alan tW father,\" sbe srid. H E: was sulent for a moment. \"TheY lasted bardly for a day-those sunflower house, Miss Sherrili,\" ha said quietly. \"Tbey witbered almoSt as soon as tbey were made.' Castles lu Kansas, one migbt say! No one0 could live ln tbem.\" Apprebeusive again, sha colored- He had recalled to ber, witbout mean- ing to do so, she tbougbt, that he bail seau ber lu Spearmau'1s arme; she was qulte sure tbat -recollection 0f this was lu bis mind. But lu spite Of tbis-or rather, exactly because of it --sbe understood that he had formad lits own impression of the relation bc- tweeu Henry and hersai! and that, consequently, he was nlot - lkely t\u003c) say anytbing more like this. Tbey bad walked east, across tbe damp, dead turf to wbere tbe Drive leaves tbe sbore and is built out Inte tbe laka; as tbey croçssed to il on the smootb lis of the lagoon betweau, ha0 took bar arm to steady bar. \"Thera Is somethlug 'I bave beau wantlug to ask you'\" sbe sald. \"That nigbt whnyou wera burt-- it was for robbery, tbey said. Wbilt do you tbluk about it?\"ý She watched 'hlm as' he iooked at ber' and thonl away; but bis face was completlY exprasslonless. \"Tbe procaedings were a littia too) rapldfor me to judge, Miss Sberrll.\"~ \"But thare was no demaud upoil you to give over your money before you ware attackad ?\" Sha braathed a littie more qulcklYý \"It must be a strange sensation,\", shfl observéd, \"t(? kniow that soma ouea: trlad to kîli you.\"' 11t muet, lndead.\" \"You mean you dou't thluk that hý tried to kili' you?\" *'The police captain tlliuks not; lie ,says It~ was the work of a mau neVN to thé~ blackJack, and ha bit harde' and oftener than ha needed. He sayi that sort ara the daug erous orle.- .tbat one's qite safa lu tha bauds 0l an experl'enced slugger, as you ol ba wiltb tbe skltui man\" ln any line i neyer tbougbt of It that way before' Ha almost made It luto au argunlX1 for 'leavlng the traiued artists iOOse on tha sf4treats,,for tba safety of the public, lnstaad of turuing the busiIlaPf ovar to boys oniy hait aducated.\" \"Wbat do'you thluk about the Inal yourself?\" Constance perslsted. \"The appreutica whio praetiOe ou me?\" S IIE waltd, watcb!ug bis yes.' ~ was bardly.lu a condition, Misi SherrîlI, to appraclate anytbiug abot'f the 'flan at ail. Wby do you asJ0' \"Beeaise-\" She hesitatad an~ staut, \"if you were attacked te bý killad, it meant that you muet lay'~ beau attaed as the sou of-Mr. COr vat. Than l4uat meant-at least 1 lmplied, that 'Mr. Corvet was kle (Contlnued on piage 26.)",
         "C ANA DI 1 O A RNE about tbc jail he's In. for !t's you tha t shauld have -kuown lb and exposed it long ago. Why bis windies are barred just like. a cel. -And there's lieav\u003e bars on bis door. All that. Whisht! But that's flot wbat 1 came ta tell ye, NO.\" Poundem stalked about tbc luttle floon swearing saftly. Mrs. Bartop looked ut him. lu de- spair. l'Wel, it's a queer editon ye are-- flot ta be cross-exarninin' me. Nov if, as 1 told ye, 1 saw Mn. Hoag lu Uic body and he's not botter and isn't ta came out bill God knavs whcn-boy did I ever get ta be seein' bim then?\" Poundeni sat dovu and took out a peneil. 'Tell me about IL. l'il pnint every word you say-namne or fia name.\" \"Indeed and youlIl print the name toa,,' cie iuslsted. \"I'm flot afraid 0' thom Mankhams. Not since V've seon ,my Mn. Hoag. The pon vasting-avay man! Eyec liad lie but lie sav nat. Eans, but he beard not. Hands, but lic felt not.\" The aid lady's mannen became quite, e4oquent. \"Do you-mean ta say Hoag's dead?\" \"No, na. Nat that I know botter, becauso yon Duicli dactor beld bbe man's vnist up for me ta feel oi his puise. But bliere ho lies, as I bold ye. Hie heurt beats. Ho breathos. His body's varm. Tbat's ail. The baboou-faced docton makes uo boues about lb vhutever.' Ho congratulates me that UI' the firet ta behold Mr. Hoag like that and hapes ail his friend.s'Il came lu ta vitness bhc plie- nomenai as ho calîs It. The mans. been that way since yestenday, lie says. It's flot spended animation cithen ho wants me ta knov. What lb ie, lie gives it no name. There's no living soul, Mn. Poundem, eau tell ia vhat manuer or condition Mn. Haag àu at this time. E{e's iooled us ail. Ani l'm giad of it.,, This vas a long speech for Mrs. Bartop on a scientific subjeet. She dwelt ut some length on bhe fact that thc Genman doctor liad taken lier inta bis confidence on the strange soul- chemistry af sucli cases; that he had listeued ta lier bales of Mr. Hoag's odd behavior at ber bouse; bliat lie had toid lien boy thc ouly ciasely simijar case lie had even kuovu vas a Gem- man genlus of some sort or other; and that ho haped there vould be the fullest possible investigation of the case by ail thc local experts. No doubt, as lie said, it was a case 0f seif-i'ypuatism. (Concluded lu next issue.) Romance of the Ocean Start!ing Changes in the Fisherman's Life» y'MARGARET MacLAREN Bo cean lias become a valuable.asset in the scheme of existence. Go- 11g back ta the days wheu this country was lu its infaucy, we read lu lie archives et the Maritime Provinces, the lettors written by men in msitions lu the colonies to their home country (Engiand), of Uic bonti- cries ai Canadian waters. The weaith to be garuered front the sea lu )Ygone days, tnducod man\u003e' venturesome spirite ta cross Uic sea, coming 1thei tin\u003e' veesels of their timos. takiug Uic rîaks of unkuown seas and ta buid up the fishing business of Canada, and MI1 Uic coffers afi those le vhose gold- had been inveeted lin e hlps and ge ai bbcth pioucens. rnuny years thc tleheriês of Canada wibh their largeet vessels, approxi- ten tous burthen, kept Up a travail that ever lncmeaslng in volume, .t but a scanty living ta, the actuai tailers. - Thus. Uic -lshermen, lu bal- stary, or w'hcnever ho was brought ta notice, vas called \"The Poon mnan.\" But 'an aid ifroverb sayis that there le a day for everyone, aud s.\u003e\" of ho who goes ont upon bhe great aquatic acreage af our country, lier its rlch and perental barvests, bas at lat, after weary ycurs af Y and struggie, at length \"arrived.\" 'y kuoWu devIce.for the succeseful pursuit of hie vocation is naw at the I of tho fisherman. Motors have doue away with the long h oums of 'wben becalmed. Higb .pricos brlng goad wages, and the fishe .rman, gh cugaged lu a'misky business (at leasb lb seeme so ta, thc laudeman), w)e moue\u003e' ta, put lu circulation than man\u003e' of hie bretlten *ho, pei'htps il imlagination, are 'on a hlghor plane., Ta-day, there are anc hundred, Ild men empioycd lu-tbc fishenice af Canada. Has any other industry such au lucirease lu the samie period?. ting over the bietar\u003e' of the Maritime Provinces the writer lias leurned le \u003e'ear 1854 saw but 'a emali cxport of fleli, as against bbc quantit' nlov biroad in e-pibe of the ttghbnse ai hpplng facilities. A.nd boa, the worid \u0026a given the flsherles su additlonal impetus, because, varicties of fIsh LlHinarketable are nov bclng sent across (Major H-ughte Grpcu as auth- te euPpy the fieh ration of aur soldiers, whlle home at home bbc scarcit\u003e' Ig price of meut is caustug a groater cansumption of ilsb. eaed business lu the fisherios le gi'ving a greator volume of brade ta- IriQus industries dependlng 'upon ite requIrements for litfe. But they 110w the question af conscription ta consider lu Canada lu the fishiug t'y. 014 men cauid not bear the strain of the rilky lite whicb demands ý8 fOilowers b. an the sea lu ail weuthers. A heuvy draft from bbe moun 'ngaged, would themefore deplete th earunn capaclty, und as these men ltftged Iu supplying food ta Uic arinies lu tbc field as weli as ta the homne itIon, their case miglit be coueidored as similur ta the agriculturlets. \u003e3'B the var, ladine and potash vere Importcd fram euemy countries. niOud cither be lmported? Canada bus millions of tons of kelp 'used Inl\u0026fuacture of bath, go'lng to waste along hem sca coaste. And thc r ?knows that sea manure brings ulvays bumper crops. Why are the ret uce ofa Canada alawed bo be wasted and adequate fertilisera th~e Ifiund fariner, because ho cannot afford the various fertilizera nov Market, Whle more than vould plant ail thc avallabie acreage of our 7yg06 ta vaste? Ie lb because no Canadian realize's vbat the ocoan 7eamy sciecutist nov atlmlring Uic stars vontd turu hhe (Coucluded on page 33.) Our Reserves of Stock A Business Proposition for Af ter the War By LANCASTER D. BURLING T WO boats sipped away from tjie wharf at Dawson one cloudy afternoon for a trip înto the north country. One was tarpaulin-covered and the \"tenderfeet\" Iu It had their slickers handy; the other was flot ouly un- covered but the \"old-timcrs\" in It had put their canvas lu the bottom of the boat.. The nain came and the lau.gh was on the men who had to land and paw their cargo over lu the rmin, The experience iuethod here did littie harm, but there will be little tiâie for contemplation and experieuce viii be- too slow a teacher lu the utrenuous days of Peace that are ta corne. Provision la a mark of civIizatian and it la within our pawer, it is our duty, to make up iu 8eme. way for the h.sppy-go-lucky past by lookîug into the future and preparing nov for the demande that wiii be made when Peace is de- clared. What la thie Warld goiug to want? Farm machinemy-aud stock-plows, han- rowa, drills, and harvesters, cava and horses, sheep and pige, plants and seed. Why shouldn't the nations make nome provision nov ta supply this demand? We'd like to, you say, but we can't afford to breed cattie, buiid farm impie- ments, ani grow trees and hold thcm, even for a positive indeflnitely future demand, it would-tie up ton much money. Very weli, then, let us suppose that the nations, of Europe should arrive, at some concluuion regarding the amount of agricuitural stock and implements thcy vil require 'on the declaration of peace. Suppose they institute n sys- ýtem,0f warehousing stock by authoriziug certain deslgnated farmus Iu Canada, the 'United States, Argentina, an7vhere, to pay current market prices for any stock of specifled stratus and conformiug to. certain standards. Suppose, f ur- ther, that they agree to pay a'certain per cent. per annum on the mouey- 80 lnv*ated, calculated from the day of purchase, and that tht., percentage ta large euough to provide for a reasonable returu and for thé upkeep' of bhe. stock; that they allow Uic stockhoustug farmna to use the stock and do auy- thlng necesgary to' kcep the availAlesupply iu good condition;' that they guarantce the plirchase of this stock when uecded at a prîce not less than its initial coat; and thst they a~gree to',purchase any stock bred on thefarms at a pnice equivalent, to the average cojet of similar stock plus a certain per cent. per aunum for ite yearé af age. The only, objection to, thîi scheme would be its probable effeet on the supply of stock for 1?mc' use and cons umpttoii, and any ultenior effect xnay be obvi- ated lu A number of waye. Indeed Itis probable that the plan wouid lucrease tii. stock avallable for home consanptton. Some suoh scheme as allowiug no stock over tva yeara of age to b. placed upon a etock-housing farm viii louve ail the aider animais where tJi.y are aud na one wiii go tai the expeuse of- shipping stock to sucli a farm for carrent prices as long as he can dispose of them \u0026t home. But he viii breed more than hoe needs If he Jcnovs ho eau seil them and the local market wiii be compietely sstlsfied because It cmn absorb auy deslred portion of t ai apparent surplus. WitJh regard ta surplus stocks of farm implements and machIueny the method of procodure le comparattvely simple, mhe iuterested gavenmeute would, situpiy guarautee to pay a certain per cent. per annurn ou warehouse recept, based upon currcnt market prices, and bo purchase thc machiner\u003e' coverod by 0 ihese pspera for thc sumo upon whlch Uic\u003e' have been paylug intcrest ut theP ooucluistaa of thc war. Asgrieultural. ueceasity vii àiao be reflected lu a domand for seeda sund (Ooucluded ou page 33..) -CI, 0 il R 1 E R",
         "CANADIAN 'COURIEII A BL.ACK-HAIRED, sleek, ltesllm gentle- man looking lîke a stage version of Lord Beaverbrook, occupied the virtuoso niche at tuie second Toronto' Symphony concert lu Massey Hall. -Hie tramn is Levitzkl. His home 'in Russia. His future In ýAinorica. We are not for purposes of t4ils article iuformed as'to vihat part of Russia Levitzkt came from. There vins nothing barbaric about bis appearance. New York has ac- celaimed hlm wlthout the symptom of a man\"e. Hie ls flot prodiglous. He le somevihere in. the speclifl- cations, of ' what mlght .be called a technically per- fect pianist viho In not tled baud and foot to his technique. Iu general style 11e 'cames somevibere betwèen the impeccable technique of Godowsky and the orchestral virtuiosity of Hofmann, both of wbom, are alloged near-race relations of bis. Russian planiots are more numerdus than thoy used to \u003e»be in the days of Rubinstein, the first great Slav plau- ist lu recent recollecetion. It 18 no longer necossary for a plano-conqueror to make.,hie debut as odne viho has Just been reclaimed fromn the wlldern'ess. Levltzkl impr.essed is audi-_ encle as a rather poetlc young gentleman viho has an amazing famillarlty with the resources o! a mod- orn piano and utilizes*most of them. He knows 110w to bit the maximum number of notes in a given period and to presorve the broad essential sweep of great rhythm ait the samne timo. It 'Is lu rhythmlc capacity that hie makes bis greateât Impression. Tonally hoe has the knack of usiug the pedal so \u003eas t0 make a piano sound Ilke an organ. -Ho has the senne of great contrast lu expression.' He neyer plunges Into the koyboard. as though hie viere on the ýedge of a dock on a bot day. BarrIng a very uncom- fortable jump viltb which hie gots ýsome of lis lui- stantaneous climaxes lie bas no mannorlefls that are not perfectly graceful. Levltzkl. played the Saint-Saeus concerto lu G minor'wlthý the orchestra. Ne did it viith much dis- tinction, occasionally lu the legato passages over- wýighted'by.the orchestra sud tsylce uncomfortably fianked by borns rather out o! tune. Ho had, 110w ever, the great advantage o! a perfect rhythmlcal regulation of the piece by the conductor viho bas alviays distluguished himself as a concerto-master. LevItzkIiIs not the easlest man lu the world to fol- low lu conductlng eitber. Wlt lees o! that caprici- ous business knowu as tempo ruibato thanl sorte artists he Is, boviever, a decidedly temperaniental player viho seizes an opportuulty prestissimo to get vibat hoe viats and lu so doing conveys the Impres- sion that he is primartly a solo artist and net quite au ideal concerto-perfornior. In hie three Chopfin numbers, Ballade iu A flat and two Etudes, 11e achieved surprlslug effects. The Ballade was Chopin plus the high llghts andl minus the haze. He made the famIliar plece more 111-e a succession 0f toue pictures than a reaI poetic unity. Yet be is a poetic player. lu the Etudes ho betrayed .a fine mastery o! rhythm. Ho made the plocos oh- vloue f0 any listeuer and refrained fromn auy sort of subtlefy that Chopin mlghf bave had lu mind. The Liszt Rbapsody No. 6 suited Levitzkl fi- miensely. Hlere, if lio lackod at ail, if vias lu the prodigieus breadth that makes Lilszt different froin auybody oes, Hie renderine vias pianistlcally strong and orchestrally vieak; a povierful presonfation of fthe boit iudivldual gualities o! Liszt~ ' ithouf the overpoweriug abandon tbat carrnes an audience away. Yet Levifzki made a big popular impression on bis audience by belug jusf a pianiet and nofhiug more. And no one foît sorry for the piano vi,,hen ho was doue. With greaf delicacy and suavlty of style he omiffed aIl attempts it careslng seu'timentalitî- Wifh that degree of restraint lu so youug a man ho *gives promise o! ranking un among the big inferpre- tea's vihenever hoe gets to knovi more about the rela- tion of the piano jto the power o! lîfe. *'he orchestra played a short but vory select pro- gramme or' Mendelssohn, Dvorab: and Grainger. The Grainger pieces were beauti!ufly doue. The Over- Levitzki, the Ne-west Pianiat Galli-Curci, Popular Idol Ban Russian Music?, No. By THE MUSIC EDITOR ture \"Carneval!' was a fine bit of color viork. The Overturo to the Mlýdsummer Night's Dream I hourd throuigh a glasa door. The concert vas a typically ,Toronto Symphony selection o!fus enough good things and no more. W E are, aving a revval o! coloraturas. Once more 1Info the soprano age.' Baritone's and contraltos have a rather bard tueié of it try- ing to hold up the art o! pure and perfect song as distinct !romn opera. Jenny Llnd audPatti thrllled Galli-Curci, POPular successor to Patti andi Jenn) Lhid, as Gilda tin Rigoletto. a viorld ýPat kuovi nofblng about colorafura-be cause they sang like larks and nobody gave the iig lng uncomforfablo names. Thon vie had Melba, vibc did much the same fblng, minus somefhiiig else wlitb a greater povier over the purely operatlc sidE of bel canto, as it ie somietimes called. Camne Tet trazIni, vibo amazed thousande and thrilled fevi 'do Troville, viho still pleases imimeusely wifhou' thrills and le stilI doiug It. Nordica, and Senzbriel and a bevy o! others viere ulwe.ys more o! the dra mnatie sort. They required a stage. But us a gen oral thlng the stage had difflculty accommodatIni itsel to the bel canto singer bocause opera got ou o! the bauds o! the older Itellians into those of th( modern French and German and Italian masters. Nov, bovever, Galli-Curci seemes to bo bridgini over the gap betvieeu the concert stage and thi opera. She bas been board In Canada a number c times; in New York many times; lu cago oftener. She beionged first to Chicago Opera. Here shel wasa S covery. And a good part of the -dlsC0' has been made by another cantatrice aldine Farrar viho In jnot a coloratura, wlio pays a lavish tribute to Galli-Gi whom she first heard' in the Ch4 Opera vihen both the mesdames .wer the past and neither for fifteen days heard of other. But if Chicago had the honor of the debut, York dlaims the distinction of the real dised which seems to, have cuiminated in the opera norali, giving the New York Times, a chance tliree pages about great viomen singers in a re Sunday magazine section. \"I w\",',so excited about her debut here,\", Farrar iu an interview. \"I dldn't think- there auy- doubt as t'O lier success, for 1 knew bier qui and I knew the Newi York audiences as the ]':Ir lu the world; but 1 was as exclted' as if shre my owu sister, for, of course, the appearance wg ordeal. So when this tremendous, genulue e siasm broke out after \"Dinorah, \" it vias as If had parted and showed hier lu ail bier glory. \"I always adored Melba and Sembricb, bu thougbt that this great generation of singers died away. That kind of miuslc was passifl appeared, but it was because there wai no lutc ter who was adequate. Now we have a groal supplemented by a tremeudous, Intellect an sical refinement. If you tblnk that music of sort Is becoming,,extlnct, anfd then find a slng sucb taste, refluement, and ease wiuxLlng triu witb -It,' you become more bopeftul. To tbluk1 sbe could galvanIze fnto lite such an opera af R USSIA'S defection rases the query, Sa Allied put the ban on Russian music? answer empbatlcally is-Nol Aiter goil four years of viar the Allies have not yet exte ated mi'odemn German music; and it's hlgb time dld. Strauss should be burled for the rest O Ilfetim 'e o!ý auy one novi living. WagneOr Brahms «deserves more lenleucy. .There are others worth'bannlng. But Strauss and Waglic apostles of modern, Germanfsm whlcb 15 the temper of the world. Their works glorlfy the which is fouud. In Nietszche aud'iu the unfll6ý able brutalities aud'the horrors of wai' as Y by Germans. Therefore lot us ail have the cour music masters and common poople-to, root St and Waguer with ail their consummate frOti2i sound out of modern entertaluments. We can survive very viell wltbout paylflg tion to Waguer lu the lifetime o-f any noW 1 Let Germany take hier jsuper-Dick and put Il the Valhalla. Eutranced as vie have ail beeOl Wagner's, great works we may as weli refleOl the boss of music drama badI us ail byPilOtiz the expeuseo0f the approclation we mlght hale to'other composers not belongiug to, the b1Ô94 butchery scbool of liouoring ýur Germiai 1nae What appliesto, the dead DIck appliés everl1 the liviug Richard. .Let hlm be auathemna- But flot so the Russians. We are more indeb Russia for the last thIrty years of music th rGermany. Many. of the greatest cou1positiOr knovi have cornefrom Rudsia. AIl we know O has nover givon un, tho Impression that thle composers were tryiug to boleter up any' SuP ideas lu art. Their wor k vias pure nationlh \u003enot. concerned with world-dominatlou. Some~ barbarie; but most of it is beautiful and fll deep frleudly meaulng that makes art the ~ meut o! the iorld. lusia has no sin at 1101 the equal of Germauy's. The worst we cala t that she has falled; the, best-that she mnaY 1ceed in keeping bersel! free 1 ro m Germa l d -tIon. If she becomes a free Russia, free 10 of hier ovin deýpots but of the viorse tyrai Kaisers, Russiau mnusic muet play a big part t freedoin. And tire rest of us wiii do Wel to on appreclatlng Russian music~ because It113 because we need it, and because It exPe$ only the power of art but the deep sincereIn sof life apart fromn anydevilish buncombe la £Pc-cssity; o! eveýrIastIng viar,",
         "ÇANAD1AN COURIERL THE GREATCANADIÀN CHOIR IS IN GOOD HAND'S H. A. Fricker, from Leeds, makeg his first bow as Conductor to a Mendelssohn Choir Audience FIRST CONCERT 0 T HE new con- ductor of the Mendelssohn Choir reaches up to his chorus over the orches- tra like a preacli- er calling his people to paths of righteousness. JSICAL curiosity lured tan thou- Baud people to Massey Hall lat week to 'ee first of'ahl how H. cker, .M.A., F.R.C.O., new con- of the Mendelssohin Choir, Play the role of Elisha while (Dr. A. S. Vogt) sat la the Ithe left; la the second place cOver how Laopold Sto kowskl is monster Phuladelphia orches- \u003euld stand up la comparison to leudelasolin Choir Conductors as lick Stock and Emil Paur. t, the crowd got its curiosity id. So dld the critics. Just One particular scribe thinks the wearlng o! EliJah's robe by Wlll bie ventllatad next waek, 5goes to press the concerts are t fiulshed first concert was two-thlrds or- atl, altliough tha choir appeared irnes out o! six, couniting the t arrangement of God Save. the as Number I. We have neyer the National Anthem qulte so aadled 'It was an Englshmnani baton. Iing first o! the choir which is bow under the new regime ,lie Bach Motet, Sing Ye to the WOobs;erve that neyer before Weheard quiite sncb giood anti- ISiuglag o! first and secondl Th'Ie Bnch Mlotet would be a IrearY business Linless done with regard t(- accurate vocalisai. It S' largely a choral fugue and Mr. m ade lis choir do it atter the ol f a great organ contalnlng peaklng stops. The fugal sec- àl0wever, seemed to suifer !rom ler -attenuated 4iass section, for the war is responsible; also a lack o! absoIuteîy chen de- \", SOriewliat on accouai of the teimpo Why sliould a coi~r siug le an7wsy? We don't know.- An dPes ft beter But in theê anti- the fffects were beautiful; not- ln the second choir which~ car- hosoft responses The ffIrst s0- 8 eenied te) lbe sometines. a bit W(\u003etet ls- capable down. In its present form the Motet is too much of a drili-master performance, no matter who does It. Four short choruses were the cboir's next contribution. The 4Gaelic Folk Song, arranged by Bantock, is a-charm- ing novelty. The humming accompani- menti ran like a soft stage spot liglit al'over the chorus as one after au- other of the eight sections took up the melody. And it was humming de- lightfully done. There is much art in hummIng;'and Mr. Friteker knows how to briag it out. Sornetimés the word- iess harmonies almost ran off into shadows of sound. The ladies, accom- panied by the orchestra, gave Sehu- bert's familiar, \"The Lord is My Shep- herd,\" an obvious bit of writing done very beautifully aad with absolute lyric values in ail parts. The Hymn Before Action, done by the men, was in soine small respects a departure from prevlens performances o! the samne work, suffering most from the lack of a double-heavy bass. An Er- roskay Love Lilt, arranged by Robert-, son, a Glasgow organist, to one of Mrs. -Kennedy Fraser's Songs of the Heb- rides, was the most surprislng thing on the programme. Here was'an ai- most Oriental color suggestion woven about the North; a haunting, dreamy glorification of love, mooallght and lapping waters reduced to the last possible fraction o! evanescence. Fhe vocalisation la this number was almost absolutely beautiful. The smorzando at the end was one of the finest Phan- 'toms of decrescendo ever heard here. The final chorus from Act Il. of Aida wlth orchestra wokë everybody up wlth a bang. There was no oratorio about this. The concert gallery was superseded 'by the stage. Aida -neyer had sucli a chorus before the foot- liglits, Lt was tremendously big, pby- slcally overpowering, a nioflataini of sound toppllng over on the audience- wlthout an emnotional thrill. Perhaps an earth quake Is not emotional. Mr. Frieker neglected no opportunity to provide climaxes la both chorus and orchestra. There was nothlng la the score that he dld not bring out. ,But ilobody was Ipillfted. Why? Perhaps because th1e orchestra for once had too much 0f ts own way. There were ,not men eaough la that chorus te keep 92 instruments from getting the upper biand. Yet the chorus a~tood nobly up to the test. The conductor would have made a better Impression If lie liad cut out the long orchestrai Inter- lude, iinless lie could briag the ballet on stage for illustration. Mr. Stokowski is a new figure at the baton. He.has a prodiglous band which he.,conducts with great power. La some respects he is the most dy- namic conductor heard here. Only Niltisch and Paur transcend him la cli- matic virtaosity. He coaducts with* a savage and smileless intensity. He neyer seems to relax. With one band glued ,to lis side h le uses the baton as a whip and gets wbat hie wants the way hie wants it. We have neyer hear'd Ibvelier woodwinds, flot even la Damrosch's new orchestra; seldom or never better brass; only in the Boston orchestra perhaps better cellos. The violins have not quite the soug-purity and the ravishiag sweet- ness of one or two string sections pre- viously heard here. But they are won- derfully effective. We have neyer heard a moro beautiful Englisb bora and clarinet and but one flute section at ail superior to this. Gossip, rather vaguely, alleges that Mr. Stokowski is an Englishman whose naine was. Stokes. The programme biography states that bis father was a Londoa Pole and bis mother Lrish; that lie was bora la London and got most of bis musical education there, mucb of it under Sir Hubert Parry and Sir C. V. Stamford, later la Ox- ford and Paris. Anyway whatever bis ancest)ry lie Is English by train- ing; and lie is la most respects a wonderful conductor. La general style hie most resembles Stock, witb mucb more virllty. A taîl man wlth a sligbt stoop at the shoulder, some- thiag of th e Elgar presence, a mop o! blonde hair aud a characteristic un- dercut style o! drlvlng bis men, lie la no man to be trlfled *ithla any sec- tion of the orchestra. .The two numbers by the orchestra were Beethoven's Leonore Oiierture and the New World Symphony of flvorak. Both were doue in, a big style. The New Worldý Symphony was a notable interpretation o! a work which. was tke first blg attempt to read this continent Into music by the use of native motifs, Ladian and Negro. What a Étrange hotchlotch-! As thougli there could be anythlng la commun between AfrIca, and '.the North American red man In music! And yet with Dvorak's masterIly orches- trations and colorlng the two are biended, into a strange fascinating\" nty. And If there had been a dul epii;de. ln the score Stokowskl's band would surely have made It Interestlng. 0SECOND- CONCERT MR. FRICKER improves upon ar- qualatanca, as most Englishmen do. His, second c~oncert waa aeveral \u003cdegrees hlglwr la temperature aud mucli more Britisli. Plaiuly lie la firsi o! all-Englali. He Is an El- ganite, Elgar's Spirit o! England -was the most Important work on the pro- gramme1, and was supposed to be the biggest thing lu the sarIes. It is not. a great work. It la sincere and some- what beautiful, quita striking and con- sîderably strident as many o! Flgar's choral works are. LtIs too reminîseent of Elgar's owu works Inspired by Che war,, Itf alls fart short o! express- ing what we should t7hiuk la the whole spIrit o! Englaud ln thls oaflict, El- gar is somethîug Illie H. G. Wells. He gets to a pom\u003enar climiax too often. The Spirit of England la flot as big a -work as the saxne composer's Car- goca af ter his men like a'lion- tamer in a ca-ge. At the desk he is as grim as the moral law. Off .etage lie is one of the \"dtboys.\"? actacus. But siace, It was composed as mucli for the good it might do the living as for how it miglit glori!y the dead, it is wortb while. The lamnent For the Fallen is a fine piece o! ele- giac wrlting worthy o! any composer. And the choir's rendering, like Mr,- Fricker's laterpretation, was adequate throughout. Mucli bigger effects were obtained in Soags o! the Fleet, by Villiers Stan- ford, solo, chorus and orchestra. These songs, as sung by Mr. Wilfred Glenn. of New York, and accompaaled by the chorus, were a masterly presentation off the sea story o! Eagland. Mr4x. Glenn was. superbly fine, as good a bas so as the Choir ever had. The choir outdid any of Its provieus ef- forts this year. Lt rose to a point of real dramatic power, great brlllancy of tone aad masterful handling o! purely choral climaxes. Stanford hali the advautage o! confia lng'hlm self to a\u003e set of very ccencrete dIescriptions3. Hf, did'it wlth great art. 'And bis art xvas quîte equalled by that of the chorus, the sololst and the cogductor. Up to the time of writing this must b.' set down as Mr. Fricker's biggest achievement; aàn occaasion when lie demonstrated that aationallty ln' music la a very powerful thing. He had no -heed to luterpret Songs et-the Fleet. Hle just played them on bis chorus, and gave the audience that ,.ncomparable British feeling that is eo o!ten reallzed ln, Pinafore. The 0xotr, as It -now, èon*lsts, la not exactly the calibre for the Russlan clboralei. The Gretchanînoif plece, As the Wa-ves of the Sea, proved dis- appoîntiag la the double bass section. Dr. Vogt's Tnid4'a- Lullaby was given a beautiful rendering by the women of the chorus. The orchestra had a very colorful -eveulag The -Roman Carnival, bY B erllog, that apostie o! noise and whIstllng uuso! the orchiestra. the most tempestnous F'1renchieýn that ever wrote music, gave Mr. Stokowski a brilliant chance to show how a big orchestra \u003c'an be~ a glortledl baud anci stîli remain an orchestra. Th(, After- noon of a Fawn, by Debussy, lied been \u003cContlnued on page 11.)",
         "CANADIAN' COURIER ADMINISTRA- TIO N by the National Trust Company, Limited, neyer costs more than administration by a per- sonal actministrator. -but it is vorih more. Administration is the Company'\u0026 business;' tis is flot alwayS truc of a personal adminis- trator. Write fo r -By Way of parlson.' fôlder,- Com- ~if Capia Paid-up, $ 1,500,000. Reserve, $1 ,500,000. 18-22 King St. East TRON T0 The Basis of the Nation's Wealth Real estate is t.he basis of the Na- iion's Weaith. It produces that wh.ich both man and beast mut have te sus- t ain life. Wlth our rapidly lncreasing population cornes the demnand for a cor- responding inerease in the products of the seil, and this demand will neyer be lese than now. Lftnd cannot be de- atroyed, and wilh proper care its pro- ducing power rney be maintained In- tact. Land values, therefore, pos.seseý that elemient ef penma.nency that r(ý- duc e the speculative feuture to the minimum. This corporation's borrowed funds (Depositsq and Debentures), and by far the greater proportion of the share- holders' nioneys (Capital Stock ainI Reserve) are invested in ftrst mort- gages on imipreved, productive real1 es- tate, To ai'ford a;n opportunity to ai of investing tIneir mnon-ey with such absoiute safety, we issue our Deben- tures in sumes of one hundr~ed dollars. They are a security in whIch Trustees are autborized to Inveqt Trust Funds. C0II or write for spec.tmen Deben- ture 'and copy of Annueal Report. CANADA PERMANENT MORTGAGE CORPORATION TOR~ONTO STREET, TORONTO Pald-up CýapItaI and Reserve Fond A Tlast I amn a financier. 1 have dared te bandy words witha banker. This way. In Decerm- ber a canvasser succeeded ini selling me two Victery Bonds, the price o! which was not in the ôffMni, but as he said that made ne difference, 1 would effect economies enough te gct IL I eigned the application. He asked *the name e! my bank and hew I wanted te pa\u003e' the instalments. 'I told hlm. He said good-day. The bank deducted the first lnetalment !rom niy savinge account at-a fertunate moment when the shoe was on the right foot. Nothing was said. I had ne bond. Nothing but that deduction o! ten dol- lars plus two cents from my grand total of savings effected by econoamies. Ten days ago I got a curt printed letter, rom the accountant stating that my'second Instalment was overdue. I hastened te the wicket. \"Why the devil là the bank over- duing me when-\" \"8h!\" said the acceunitant, blandly. \"It was. ln the newspapers.\" \"What was? What ln the namne O!-, \"8ýh,!\" hie repeated. \"Tbhe instruc- tions te you concerning second and other instalments. Banks have noth- Ing te de with further deduct1ons. Oui\u003e' the first. 'You pay others by check made eut te the Minister o! Finance. Did you get your recelpt fer tiret Instalmentr' - He qbowed me a sample. \"Which I did net,\" countered 1,' preniptly. \"Nothing like that.\" \"8h!\"* he couuseled, with that centre- ef-gravit\u003e' calm that characterizes al good acceuntants whe -have 'nothlng' F OUR necessary elements are neted b\u003e' a inancial autherity as beleng- lng te a geod investiment; the auth- oht\u003e' le Mr. Waldoe Newcomer, Fresi- dent o! the National Exchange Bank of Baltimuore. \"In making investmients,\" says -Mr. Newcomer, intervlewed recentl\u003e' by World's Worh, \"the hie! tiîngs te be consldered are safet\u003e' o! principal, rate - Put the Burden on Those Trained to Carry It One businest man should neot be asked by anotixer to uive the tiie -re- qiiired toperferm the duties of Executor when a capable and experienced Corporation makes ^bat work a regular business aud performs the services a4 no greater cçot. The remumeration for the services of this Corporation is fixed by the Court li thse sae manne in which the feesof an in- le appoint. appointed By Investicus ta do wîth the rising passions of irate mankind, the Bolchevik outside the wicket. As a matter of fact it wasn't a wicket. Accouiflants don't have wickets, because tbey neyer have any meney. \"Then will' you please signature this ?\" sboving towards me a printed affidavit that I had lest the receipt, had instltuted an exhaustive search- when I hadn't even batted an eye over it because it had n'eyer reached rue-and had failed te locate it; that if 1 should discover it I would return it te the banit; by which means .I was annuled from claiming a second puy- ment of ten per cent.,, and would 1 lcindly make eut a check for $30.15, covering January and February-I liked the way he said Jan. and Feb.- justalments, all wlth, that; naïve assumptio 'n that I had balance enough te turn this trick witheut depriving grocer, laudlord or butcher. Where- fore 1 wrete the check, had it dul\u003e' ascertalned for S. F. and the like, stamped and returned te me, I re- turning It obediently to the accountant -whereupon he passed eut te. me twe iportant-looking blue receipte o! large size centaining explicit condi- tiens with d ue acknewledgmen:t of what I had done. And- 1 went out full o! that holy calm whîch comes from getting rid o! ene's wrath without finlshing a sen- tence. It takes a banker te create that calm. But it'e werth baving-If you have the price. of Invèstinent return, regularityo e!In tereet payaient, and marketability. This order e! thelr enumerakion le en- tirel\u003e' without reference te order e! impertance for the relative import- ance o! these censideratiens varies ac- cordling to circumetances. If a person It dependent on a smali salar\u003e' and le lnveetlng eut ot emaîl savings, safety cf principal must outwelgh everything. else. If sucil a person la -not reail\u003e' dependfent on the income train the se- curities, but le regarding it purely a s a savinge !nnd, he cani dieregard the regularit\u003e' of lniterest, and endeavor to secure a slightly greater return ln the long run. He le also net partîcu- larly concernied wlth inarketablit\u003e'. \"If the purchaser le entirely depend- ent on an incarne fremi an investment, aes, lu the caee e! a wldow o! email mieans lnvestlng the preebede 'ef her la-te husband's life ineurance, it be- cernes of great importance thaft the ln- tereet ehoxild cerne lu regularl\u003e', and it ma\u003e' be that ln order te receive an adequate returu elle will have to take semne elight risk o! thle principal belng alwav- safe in the full amouxbt. A îr Had Heard E W HAT le a burles ,quired William. \"A burlesque, son,\" father, ''je a take-off.\" A Word With a 'Banker hurt if hie should lose it. The wic should net take such a chance. \"In inves-ting for a banking inst tion, or when investing funds belc ing to anindividual who, is likelY have sludtlen demands uapon hlm considerable amounte of money, il frequently neceesary te place question of marketability somew hlgher in the liet than the other siderations. Thus it le. seen that weight which should be givenl to different points vàires wkh the cumetancee eurreunding the îflv ment. The individual ehould be e bie underetands hie own requireifle before hie investe. \"A littie consideration alongI line will surely show that none of princîples outlined. above can be solutely and positively settieti b\u003e' one short of an expert, and frequeî flot by' hlm. Under the beet cire, stances, the real worth cf an imv ment, I believe, le, determlned t( great extent b\u003e' twe elements-h1 _ mon sense on the part o! the vestor, a quality-which. le posses ,by comparitiveiy few; and secefli by luck, wicb fails to strike a gr many ln anü acceptable manner.\" Saft-y Emphasized AT the annual meeting e! The ronte General Trusts Corp\u003c tion, held recently, thle Presd Hon. Feathereton Osier, K.0., lin, dressing the sharehoider s emphasi the soundness of the company's b' nese. He polnted eut that the iflY ments o! the comapan y were neqt .0 of a nonspeculative character but nature o! these investmnents waS closedl In the yearly retuirns ta Goverrument and open toa inspection anyen.- Attention was aIse drawn te tact' that the coin.pan\u003e' does not row, money' on depesit, ner does issue debèntures. The, General Manager, Mr. A: Langm~uir, in his addreee, dwelt l the advantages o! a ceorporate trus over a private or indIvidual trustee. The anual report submltted Wfl a meest satisfactory ,showlng. ' su ! of100,000 wae àdded te the serve fund, ln addition te maintaill the usual dividend, and a larger 1 ance thah-usual was carrield ta P and lees. The total assete under adi .s tien by 'the Toronto Generai TI'W Corporation are $83,286,782. profits for 1917 were $300,886, this, together wlth the 8 breught !orward frem the pre'Wiý year, makes a total of $399,443. surn ef $12,000 was pa.id out in Pa etie subecriptiens, $150,000 was P out in dividende o! 10 per cent. annuni and $100,000 added ta the serve !und, increasing it ta 195, The sumi e! ýl0I,443.11 was carr ferward te tis year. Points for Investors",
         "A_\\,A9AN COURIER \u003c\"Terror \u003e \"THE TERROR.\"1 By.Artbur Machen. M ASTER of soins subtîs magic witb wbicb bie casts a spell of realism over tbe most miraculous fantasies, Artbur Machen, in bis latest book, \"The Terror,\" fiourisbes bis faculty of plauslbility ia a way wbich simply makes one believe tbat the terrible things wbicb bie tells about in bis tale bave realiy bappened. The spell of the tbing grlps tbe attention in the first few paragrapbs and witb a coin- pelling clutcb bangs on to one's interest to, the final page-and a bit beyond. Tbe mystery of The Terror la neyer explained. Tbere in an in- genious denouement fraugbt 'witb philosophical significance but witbout any reai satisfyiag quality to soothe a curiosity quickened to a point which insiste on pricking one's imagination long after the book is laid aside. The author binseif cbaracterlzes tbe book as a \"shilling sbocker\" but bis astound- ing inferences and suggestions were surely not set down slmply as so much stuif for morbid minde to mewl over.- J. M. Dent. $1.35. An Unsightly Spectacle \"«INSIDE THE RUSSIAN REVOLW TION. By Rbeta, Obilde Dorr.' T HE internai situation of Russia since the revolutIon le an uný sigbtly spectacle, according to the de- talls reportsdl by Rhseta Cbilde Dorr, wbo went from Amnerica last spring to send back word from P'etrograd of the glories wblch followed tbe over- tbrow of the Romanoifs. Mrs. Dorr Is an enthusiastic sympathizer with the people in their struggle for free- dom, but bier Indictment of the mob and its main mischief makers ls about the most ecatblng denunciation as yet delvered by any western writer. Mrs. Dorr covers every pbase of aiffairs up to last Âugust. Sbe bas b held a tight rein on bier sympathles-atbough sbe may at times be suspected of being a littIe blassed In her/eulogY of bier sie- tfers over tbere-and the general re- suit is what seems te bie a,,very coin- plete record of~ events 'and reffectiOn o! conditions. Her secret Interview witb Anna Virubova Is intensely In- terestlng and bier account of Botch- kare-va's battalion o! dsatb le tbe mOet illuminatlng' record of the Russian Amazone tbat bas been pubilshed s0 fs.r.-MamiilaXl $1.60. That Terrible Triangle 4\"TIREEPS A CROWD.\"p BY WM. Caine.. T Trequires an- unustiai amount of ebil to enlîven an old theme lkeý the mother-in-law legead and to trans- late its essentiaie !a terme o! -a symi- pathetic and interesting \u003comedy. But Mr, Willam Caine bas succeeded In twlsting that terrible triangle-a man, is wlfe and bis motber-lft-law, Into an amusing piece of fiction wblcb skirts tbe edge or tragedy, ravels. it- self into a tantallzlng tangle for a 'while. tben makes a dasb for tbe de- 'iume~ n a cis-,, piece o! comedy wbich is really delightful. Incident- ally Mr. Caine injects a certain amnount o! excellent phllosopby, but bis bumor is agile enougb to dodge any semblance of preachiaess. The most obvious thing about tbe book is the rather stale truîsm Mr. Caine bas chosea for tbe titie, but tbe balance of the book from cover to cover, la fresh enougb and quite entertaining.- Tbomas Allen; $1.50. A Soldier Pojet \"A CANADIAN TWILIGHT.\" By Ber- nard Freeman Trotter. ABOOK of verse by a young man la always interssting; this one doubly s0 by the passionate life be- hind it; for awblle beating restlessly tbe bars of imprisoning ill-bealtb whilst tbe great Challenge remained to be answered overseas; tben sud- denly released for action; and finally the glorious yet tragic offering at the front wben tbe spirit tbat fiamed eag- crly for beroic expression fouad it la - -sacrifice. This but bints at the life story of oas who bas been (tempor- arily it Is hioped) called our Canadian Rupert Brooks. Lieut. Trotter-To- ronto bora, educated la Woodstock and Toronto, and led forth lato fellow- ship witb nature amidet Nova Scotian valleys, Muskoka lakes and Californaa mountaîns-gave up bis life on May 7, 1916, under sheli lire la France, but not before be bad givea forth poetlc expression to is soul ia delicate and lofty verse In a strain wblch older miads have sougbt for la vain. The tItIs posin and certain otbers-\"To Esther,\" \"The Poplars,\" *'A Kles,\" \"An April Interlude, 1917,\" \"Ici Repose,\" and \"The Road to, Tartary\"ý-tbsse place hlm ia the company o! our good Canadlans-Lampman and Campbell. But 'tis but a fragment of wbat migbt bave been; yet, but for the war, would It bave been? McClelland, Good- chIld and St ewart; $1.25. Songs of Canada \"SONGS FROM A YOUNG MAN'S LANDO.\" By Sir Clive Pýhillipps- WoUley. T HIS \"Young Man's Land\"-le Can- ada-Western Canada partIcu- larly-and the singer in of Eaglish blrth, *foadly cberishing \"borne\" thougits 'whlle abroad, yet passion- ntely e«pressing affection for the new land o! bis choies. Many o! the poes are a reprint o! an enrler work en- tltled, \"!An Fnglisb Esau,* expressing tbe joy o! the English foot-free; others reveal the pride la Canada of a, maxi Who bas got bis feet down and lai- tends te stay. perhaps the words Canadian-Imperialistic beat describe tbsm, since the author 'views Canada as b)ut the bounde o! England made 'wldsr yst,' w quote a native poet Are they Canadian songs, will b. ask- ed? Ires, distlnctively so, in so far as they deal with boundiess nature la the open. It le the poetry o! the U. E. Loyallat, the far fluag patrlotiem o! the ploneer, thnt Sir Clive Tlll!'--s- Wolley singe and singe well, la smootb and often impassioned, quotable verse. Is hie like any one? Decidediy like Newbolt - witbout his dramatlc power; like Kipling, without bis jar- goni; like Service, without bis extra- vagance. Sings more like the English gentleman that bie ls-an author. hunter, traveller, long la our last west -and bringing bis sbeaf of songs into our already well-filled poctic granary. -Thomas Allen; $1.50. Bosehe Bosh \"MY ADVENTURES AS A GERMAN SECRET AGENT.\"' By Captaîn Horst Von der Goltz. T HERE ls a peculiar twist In the Teuton mind which leads Herr ibis and that to a confidence in the guilibility of ail other peoples and an assumption tbat so long as Herr.says s0 blmself It muet bie no. Take, for Instance, the poppycock put out by the fellow Horst Von der Goltz and labelled as \"My adventures as a Ger- man secret agent\"-a most ridicul- ous mess of rubbish whlch. Horst, etc., sxpects us to accept as an authentic exposition of Germany's secret diplo- macy. It is the crudest kind of camou- flage attempting to mask a mess of pro-German propagandtu and anti- Britisb miscbisf beneath a ffimsy fabric of spy fiction. Incidsntally, and on bis word of bonor as an ex-Ger- man spy, Goltz asks the Washington authorities to belleve that since Am- erica' went to war against the Hua thers are no Germans worklng for the Wilhelmstrasse ln the Iwbole of the United States. Boscbe!-J. M. Dent; $1.50. 'Tino and Tommy \"1TOMMY AND THE MAID 0F ATH ENS»I By Joseph Hocking. IT ls a long while since Joseph Hock- lng first learned' the knack 'of tlckliagthe publisher in bis counting bouse by pleasing tbe maid who bangs up the clothes, and for years now hoe ba s been mllhlng o .ut popular fiction at popular prIces-al made Up from practlcaliy the samne formula. Mr. Hocklag is well acqualnted witb bis audience and-lt belng w'ar tie just now-be bas, added an extra' dasb of patriotism to his lateat productions. Hls last book\u003c 1s lîke any other of nis yDu may have read- plus a few Hock. lng Idea\u003e, as te the way Whiteball should deal wltb the diplomatics of tbe Eastera situation. The maid out ln the garden will enjoy readlng It when bier washlng's doae-and so, for the miatter of that, wll a few tbousand more Hocklngites.-H-odder \u0026 Stougb- ton. 50 cents. To THE REV. JAMES S. DOLLARD. (Author of \"I-r1eb Lyrîcsa nd Ballads.\") in Irish fields the gorse dotb glow. A golden ft-aîne where row on row Stand white-walled cabin. Tender the sky, Blue as the sen, where sea-bîrds fly, Xeenlng wlth mystlc sound the woe Whlch haunts that Isle. With thee I'd go To glooming glens wbere pase below The SlaughSidbe. ailld frqrn eye In Irish fields, 0f rntjting and inoonshine, frIend and foe Thou Dollarci-bard of the miystle. hlgb 0Great Celtliepast that cannot die- Itevlv't dlrn faiths wbere legends graoW, Biddlng old heroes live wbtcb lie In lri~.sh Tc)orno. CHARLES CAnLYLE.",
         "CANADIAN COURIER THE. INýDIAN DRUM (Continued, from page 20.) tbat lie did not go away. You se that, of course.\" 1\"Were you the oui)' one who thouglif tbat? Or dld soule one speak ta Y0o1 about if?\" \"No on1e did! I spoke t0 father. Ho tliought-\" 1\"Well, if Mr. Corvet was murdered- I'm foilowlng what faflier thouglit, you nn dersfaud-if luvolved, somefhing a tood deai worse Perliapa than a:ny tblug fliat could have been lnvolved if lie ba! ouly gone away. The facts wýe had umade It certain fliat-if wliat lad happened to hlm was death at the bauds ef another-ho must bave foreseOTi that deafli and, seehlng no protection for hlmself . . . it imf- plled, that lie preferred to dbl rather tlan to ask protection-that theire was somethlug .wçhoie concealmeut lie thouglit metfered oven more to him tbau Ilfe. It-lIt miglit have meant fliat lie consldered bis 11f e was due to whomever teock ut.\" Her voice, whlch lad become very low, now ceaqed. She was speaklng to Alan o! bis fstber-a fathier wbom lie bad nover kuowu, sud wbom ho could not have recoguIzed by siglif until she sbhowed hîm the picturo a f ew weeks before; but she was speaklng ot bis father. \"Mr. Sherrill dldn't feel fIat It ws necessar)' for hlm f0 do anythîng, even tliough lie thouglif thatr' \"if Mr. Corvet was dead, we couid do hlm no good, surely, by teling thîsý to the polilce; If the police succeeded lu finding out aIl the facts, we would lie doiug ouly wbat Uncbe Beuny didý flot wish-wliat lie preferd doath to. We could not tell fhe police about if -witbout telling thflem ail about Mr. Corvef, foo. So father would not lot him-elf belleve that yon liad been attacked to be kiied. Ho had to be- Ileve the police theol'y was suff iciont.\" Alan made n0 comment af once. 'Wassaquami belleves Mr. Corvet is dead,\" lie sald fiually. \"Ho foUi me so. Dues your fatbe7 bolleve thaf?\" \"I thilu lihe is begiuniug to believe T E ad rescbed the little bridge tflat breaks the Drive and -spaus the chanol througli wlilch the motor boafs reach~ barbor lu thie lagoon; lie resfed bis arma upon the rail o! thie bridge aud looked down into the cliannel, uow frozeil. I1A seemed to lier to considor sud to decdde upoli somethlug. -l'y. net told auy one,\" lie sald, non' watchlug her, '¶10w I bappeued f0 bo ouf o! the. bouse that jnlglt. 1 followed a man wlio camie fliero te the liouse. Wassaquam did net know hs naine. 'e did not linon Mr. Corvet n'as gone; for lie\u003ecame there te see Mr. Corvef. Ho n'as net au ordinary frlend o! M!r. %orvet's; but he bad coin. thore ofteu;, Wassaquam di4 nxet luxn\"wh'y. Was- saquain had sent the man away, and 1 ran eut- aftor hlm; but I could flot fiud hlm.\" He stepped au Instantf, studying lier. *'That w4s net fthe flrsf man n'ho camne fa the. hous,\" lie wnt on qubckly, as isb n'as about te speak -I found a unn In Mr. Qorvefa bouse the 4ir3t nigbt that I gent there. Wasqm n'as away, 7Q¶ reinepber, and 1 n'as aiGe fl the bu. \"A man there ln the bouse?\" she repeated. \"ýHe wasn't thero wben I eutered the bouse-at least 1 don't think be was. I heard hlm below, afterý I had gone uP-staIrs. I came down then'and saw him. He was golng tbrough Mr. Cor- vet's fhîngs--not the silver and ail that, but fhrough bis dosks and files and cases. He was iooklng for some- thling-somethlng whlcb lie seemed to wýant, very mucli; *lien I luferfered, it greatly oeclted'him.\" T HEY liad turued back from thie b ridge and were returnlng aioug the way that thoy lad come; but now she stopped aud Iooked up at hlm. \"What bappened when you 'Inter- fered'?\" \"A queer fhing.\" \"I frlghtened hlm.\", \"Frîghtened bhl=?\" She lxad appre- ciated'lu bis toue more siguificance flan the casual xneaning of thie words. \"Ho thouglit I was a gliost.\" \"A ghost., Wliose gbosf?\" Ho slirugged. -\"I don't lvnow; somne oue wiiomi lie seemed to bave known pretty welI-and wbom Mr. Corvef kneW, lie thouglit.\" ý\"Why didu'f you fell us Ibis before?\" \"At least-I aum telling' you now, Miss Sherrîli. 1 frigbtened buxu, and lie got away.' But I baid seen hlm plaluly. I eau describe -hlm. You've talked wlfh yourfaflier of the possibllty fIat soxuetling miglit 'lisp- peu' to me sucli as, perbaps, bappened to Mr. Corvet. If auytblng does lisp- peu to me, aý description o! fIe man may . . . prove useful.\" Ho sa-w the color leave bier face, and ber eyes brigliten; lie accepted tlhis for agreement on ber part. Thon clesriy and defilftely as lie could, le descrlhed Spearman to lier. She did not rocogplze tIe description; lie hadl known she would not. Bad flot Spear- mn bon in Duluthb? Beyond fliat, was flot conuection o! Spearman wlth the prowler iu Corvet's bouse tlie ono connection of ail most difficuit for bier to make? But lie saw lier fixing aud rocording the description iun ber mind. Tbey were sil1et as tliey went ou Woward lier lome,. He liil said ail lie could , or dared te say; to te.ll lier thof thie man lad beau Spearman would not merely have'awaitened bier lu- credullty; if wouid have destroyed credence utterly. A dellnlte change lu their relation~ to one another had talion place dur iug thir walk. The fuliness, the fraulineas of tlie sympatby there liac liesu betw.ee thexu almost froni thefr fingt meeting, liad gone; she was quite. awaree. ho saw, that lie bad not frankly answered bèr questions; sbe was a'ware that in'some way be bad drawn bacli frux lier and shut lier ont froni ls thouglits about his owu posi- tien bore. But lie had kuown that fis must be so; if bad been lis lirCf definit. rezlis.flou after bis roturu te couselousness lu the liospital wlien, knowlng now lier relation te Spear- ma.n, lie lad found all questions 'which concerned lis relations wlth ' the -people bor~e made iwnxoasurahiy more seule l\u003ey the attac upon hlm. Six. aeioed hlm. te came in andt stay home, but she asked it wîthout urg- ing; at bhW refusai li bcoved SlOWly up.the steps; but she balted wlien she saw that lie dld nlot go on. \"'Miss Sherrili,\" lie said, looking Up at her, \"how inucli money is there lu your bouse?\" She smiled, amused and a little per- plexed; then sobered as she saw bis intentness on ber answer. \"What do you mean?\" she asked. \"I mean-how mucb is ordinarily kept tbere ?\" \"Wliy, very littie in actual cash. We pay everythlng by check-tradesmen and servants; and even if we happen nlot to have a charge account wbere we make a purcliase, they know who we are and are always willing to charge it to us.\" \"Thank you. It would be rather unusual then for you--or your neigli- bors-to bave -currency at baud ex- ceedîng the liundreds?\" \"Exceediug the hundreds? That mens Ju the thousands--or at least one thousand; yes, for us, it would be quite unusual.\" She waited for him to explain 'why lie had askod; it was not, she felt sure, for any reason which couid readlly suggest itef tober. But lie only tbanked ber agamn and 11f ted bis bat and'moved away. Lookiflg after him. from the wlndow after sbe en- tered tbe bouise, she saw hlm. turn the corner lu the direction of Astor Street. CHAPTER XI. A Caller. S the first of the mnth was ap- .proacIng, Wassaquam ba d brought bis housebold.bUils audbudget to Alan that mornlng dlTeOtly after breakfast. Th\u0026 accounts, wblch cov- ered oxpenses for the month just end- lng and a small amount of cash to be carrled for the montb begiuning, were wrltten upon a sheet of foolscap lu neat, -unsbaded wrltlng ,exactly ike tbe»models In a copybook--each letter formed as carefully 'and preciseiy as is the work doue upon an Indian bas- ket. The s tatement accounted ascur- ately for a'sum o! cash lu baud upon the firet of February, itemlzed cliarged expenses, aud totaled the bis. For Mardi, Wassaquam evideutly proposed a continuance of the establlshment upon the presont lines. To provide for that, and to furulali Alan with wbatever sums lie needed, Sherrili bad made a cousiderable deposit lu Aiau's naine lu the banli where lie carried bis owu account; and Alan bad accoux- pauled Sb.errill tu the banli to be ln- troduced and had signed the necessary cards in order to check agaluat the deposit; but, as yet, lie had drawn nothiug. Alan bad required barely haîf of the- hundred dollars wblch Benjamin Cor- vet bad sent t0 Blue Rapids, for his expenses ln Chicago; and lie had brouglit wltb him from \"homne\" a hua- dred dollars of bis own. Ile bad used that for bis personal expenses sinco. The anicunt whiehi Wassaquam now dosired to pay the bis was much more than Alan liad on baud; but that amount was aise mudi less than fthe eleven lxuadred dollars which te ser- vant listed as cash on baud. This, Waasaquam stated, was lu currency and kopt by hlm. Benjamin always lhad had hlm keep. that 4much ln theo bouse; Waesaquam would not toueli thxat sum now for the paymeut of eur-",
         "CANADIAN COURIER lhi sum of money -kept inviolate ibled Alan. Constance Sherrill's ,ornent that, for her famlly at least, keep such a sum would have been L5ual, increased this trouble; it did ,however, preclude the possibillty t others than the Sherrilîs rnight P sucli amounts of cash on hand. the tiret of the month, therefore nl drew upon bis new hank account Wassaquam's order; and in the [y- atternoon Wassaquam went to bank to cash his cbeck--one of very few occasions when Alan had il let lu the bouse alone; Wassa- m'a habit, It appeared, was to go ut on the first of the month and the tradesmen in person. Orne two bours later, and before ssaquam could ba:ve bleen expected k, Alan, lu the room, which nad Mnoe bis, was startied by a sound of l'Y poundlng, which came suddeniy [lim from a floor below. Shouts- l'y, tblck, and unintelligible-min-* wlth tbe pounding. He ran Mty down the stairs, then on and fi the service stairs Into the base- t. Tbe door to \u003ethe bouse front the Lway was shaklng to irregular, l'y biowa, wblcb stopped as Alan àbed the lower hallway; the shouts ;1lnued stili a moment more. Now the noise of poundiug did flot rfsre, Alan could niake out wbat manl was saying:. \"Ben Corvet!\" eo namne -was almost unintelligibie leu Corvet!' Ben!' Thon tbe 'tgs topped too. LAN sped to the door and turned baLck the latcb. The door bore z upenL hlm, not from a push, but 1 a welght without which had 'Il agaînst It. A big, beavy man, La rougli cap 'and macklnaw coat, Id bave fallen upon the fluor, If 1 bad flot caught hlm. Hie Welght Lin's arme was go dull, go moert if violence had'besn bis lnteiý- there was notbing to b. feared ihua now. Alan looked up,'th.ero- te ses If any 'one had'corne wltb The alley and the stroot were r.The snow lu the area-^way l'Od that the, man had corne to the alons and wlth great, dlfficuity; ilad fallent once upon the walk. 1dragged the man into the bouse wonit back and ciossd the door. ireturned and looked at hlm. The was 11k,, very 11ke the, one wbom Ihad folloed from the. bouge on ni.gbt when ho was attackod; cer- tY that thia was the. same Man e q1lickly to him. He selzsd the 'w agalu and dragged hlm up the an£fd to the ieunge lu the i- The warmth revlved hlm; he 'P, C-OughIng and breathing qulckly 'witli a loud, rasplng wbseze. The Il Of lîquor was strong iipon hlm; C-lothes reeksd with the uncîsan Il of barrel bouses. )r had boon, a vory po~ )ad and thlck through od -- aimoat distortîz lis shouidors; but bis bj fat and soft, bIs face ils eyes watery and bru haîr,. whlch waa ahot hl gray, was dirty and1 three or four days' gro [e wsas clethed as Alan lands on the steamers wer- fflth 'g- iody was ght; al mat- upon him-the other was fever whicb, burned up and sustained hlm inter- mlttentiy. \"'Lo!\" he greeted Alan. \"Where's abat damn Injin, hey? I knew Bsn Corvet was sbers knew ho was shere all time. 'Course hels shore; he got to be shore. That's shright. You get \"Who are you?\" Alan asksd. \"Say, wbo'r you? Wbat t'belle syou doin' bere? Neyer see you before... go go get Ben Corvet. Jus' aay Bon ,Corvet, Lu-luke's shere. Ben Cor- vet'hl know Lu-luke ail riglit; ai- waysb, alwaysh knows me ..I \"What's the matter witb you?\" Alan bad drawu back but now went to the man again. The fIrst idea that thîs migbt have been mersly some old sailor wbo bad served Benjamin Cor- vot or, perbapa, had been a comrad\"e lu the earlier days, had been bauished by the. confident arrogance of the man's tons--an ar rogance not to b. expiained, entlreiy, by wbiskeyor by the fever. \"How long hlave you been th\" way?\" Alan demanded. \"Wbsre did you corne from\" Ho put bis baud on the wrlat; it waa very' bot aud dry; the pulse was raclng, Irregular; at sec- onds it seemsd te stop; for other sec- onds lt was continuous. Tihe feilow cougbed 'and bont forward. -What la it-pneumona-?\" Alan tried to strafghten hlm Up. \"Gi' me drink . .. Go get Bsn Cor- vet, I tell yon! . . . Get Bsn Corvet qulck! Say-yous shear? You get mue 'Ben Corvet; you botter get Bsn Corvst; you teU him Lu-uks's boe; won't wait any mors; goin' t'have my monsy now . . . srlght away, your asar? Kick me out s'loon; I guess flot no more. Bsn Corvet glve me alI money I want or I talk!'Y \",Talk!\"I \"-Syou know It! -I ain't goin' Hs cboked up and tottered back; Alan, supporting hlm, laid. Dim do\"n and stayed beside him untîl bis cougblng and choklng coassd, and there waa oniy the ratting rasp of bise breatb- ing. When Alan spoke te hlm agalu, Lýuke's sys oened, and ho narrated recent oxperlencea bltterly; ail wsre biamed to Ben Corvet's absence; Luke, who bad bo.n drInklng beavily a few nigbts before, had been thrown out wbsn the aaloon was clossd; that was Bsn CorvoVsa fau.it; .If Ben, Cor- vet had beon around, Luke would bhave ýhad money, ail the monoy any one wanted; no -one would have thrown eut Luke thon. Luke oiept ln the sno'w, ail wet. When ho \u0026rose, the saloon was open agaî., and ho got more whuakey, but nlot eough to get hlm warm. H. hadu't been warm ince. That waa Ben Corvet'. fauît Ben Corvet botter bs 'round now; Luke wouidn't stand any more. A LAN foIt ef the pulse agin; ho opened the, coat and under-flanneis and foît the beavlng cheat. H. Went te the hall and looked Iu the téle- phono diroctory. Ho romombered the name of the drugglet on the, corner- of Clark Street and ho teiephoned hlm, giving the. nuinhur on Aster Street. bad 'I want a doctor rlght away,\" ho at- sald. \"Any good doctor; the. on. that Uan you eau get qutekest2' The druggiat es- promlsed that a physiclan would bo and thero wlthln a quarter of an hbeur. ,his- Alan went back to, Luke, who wsas .dng ailent now exc.pt for the. gaop of bie URI 1 AVSN MANAGRERCD I couiY e",
         "CANADIAN COURIER brealli; ho did net anaw*er wlien'Alan spolie te lir, except to ask ,for whis- key. Alan, gazinig \u003clown, at hlm, felt that'thê man was dying; liquor and, bie foyer had sustained hlm only to bring hlm to the door; 110W the col- lapse had coee'the doctor, even if lie arrived very soon, could do ne more than perhaps -delay, the end. Alap went up-stalrs andbrouglit down bien- kets and put them over Luke; lie cnt the knotted'laces of the soaked shoos aud pulled tbem off; lie aIe tok off the mackinaw and the underceat. The fellow, appreciating tliat care was be- ing given hlm, relaxed; lie slept deeply for short periods, stirred and started np, then slopt agaîn. Alan stood watchlig, a strange, sinking tremerý sliaking hlm. This man lad corne there te make a dlaim-a dlaim wéhich rnany time s bofore, apparently, Benjamiln Corvet liad admittod. Luko camne to Bon Corvet for rnoney which lie always got-ali lie wauted-tlie al- ternative te, glv-ng which was that L-ake would \"talk.\" Blacîrnail, tliat meant, cif course; blacklal whlcb not only Luke lad told of, but whicli Wassaquam too bad admitted. as Alan uow reallzed.' Money fer blackmrail- that was the reason for that tliousand dollars lu cash whlch Benjamin Cor- vet always kept at the lieuse. Alan turnod, wlth a sndden shiver o! rovulsien, toward bis fatlior's chair lu place before thie hoartli; thoro for heuars oaclr day lis father liad sat wvith a booki or staring Into the flre, alwsys wltli wliat thîs man kuew bang- lng over hlm, always arrnlng agaiust It with the thousand 'dollars ready for thîs man, wlienever lie carne., Meeting blackmall, paying blackmnail for as long as Wassaquarn had been lu the lieuse, for as loh as It took te malte the once muscular, pewerfnl figure of the sailor wbo tlireatened te \"talký\" into the swolen, whiskey-soak- ed bulk o! tlie m an dyingnow on the lounge. F' OR hls state that day, the man Fblanod Benjamin Corvet. Alan, forcing himself te teucli the swollen face, shuddered at theuglit ef the trnth underlying tliat accusation. Ben- jamin Cervet's att-wliatever It mîglit ho that thîs man knew-nndoibtodly lad destroyed~ fot only hlm 'wli paid the blackmall but hlm who received It;, thie effect of that act was still go- lng on, destroying, bllgliting. Its tliroat ofsiame was-Iiot onily agaînst Benjamin Corvet; It threatened aise ail wliese names muet b. connocted ib Cetyet1.ý ,, Alan had îýfused te accept any stigma ln bis relationshlp witb Cervet; but 10W lie could net refuse te accopt ItL This shanie tbreatoned Alan; it threatened aIse the Bliorrilîs. Was it net because of thîs that Benjamin Cervet lad ob- jected te Sberrill's name appearing wltl is lown in the title o! the slip- owning finm? And was It net because o! this that Corvet's lntimacy wltli Sherrill and bis comradeshlp witli Con- stance had been alternated byr Urnes la whichb li hâd frankly avoided thern b'btb? What Sherrîli liad told Alan and even Corvet's glfts te hlm had net been able te malte Alan f eel that wlthout question Corvet was his father, but new shame and herror were maklng hlm feel it; ln horrer at Cervet's act-whtever It miglit be- and lu shame at Cervet's cowardice, Alan was thiusing of -Benjamin Cor- vet as ho, fthe. 'Tuis shaine, t horrpr, were bis inhei~rtance. H1e left Luke and went to the win- dow te see if the doctor was coming. H1e bad called the doctor because in bis first siglit o! Luke lie lad net recognlzed that Luke was beyond the aid o! doctors and because to surn- mon a doctor under sncb circurn- stances was the riglit thing to do; but lie had thouglit o! the doctor also as a witness to anything Luke miglit say. l'ut now-dld lie want a wltness? H1e bad ne thouglit of conceallng any- thing for bis own sake or for lis fatber's; but lie would, at loast , want the chance te determine the circurn- stances under whicli it was to be rnade public. He burried back to Luke. \"What is it, Luke?\" lie cried te hlm. \"What can you tell? Listen! Luke-LukO, is it about the Miwaka-tlio Mlwaka? Luke!\" L UKE had sue~ into a stupor; Alan shook birn and slionted in bis ear witliout awakening response. As Alan straiglitened ad sto4~hpls looking down at him, the telephonie bell rang sharply. Tliinking it miglit be somethlng about the doctor, lie went te It and answered It. Constance Slerrill's volce carne to hlm; lier first words made Jt cloar that she was at home and lad Just corne in. \"The servants tell me sorno one was making a disturbance beside your bouse a whilo ago,\" she said, \"and shoutlng sornothlng about Mr. Corvet. Io there something wrong there? Have you discovered semethlng?\" 1He sheok excitedly whlle, holding bis liand over tlie transmitter lest Luke shonld break ont again and she %hould hear It, lie wondered wliat ho bould say to lier. He could think o! nothlng, lu bis excitement, whlcb wonld reassure lier and rnerely Put lier off; lie was not capable o! con- troillng.bis voice so as to do that. \"Please don't ask me !ust now, Miss Sherrili,\" ho' ranaged. \"I'11 tell you wliat I can-lter.\" His reply, lie recognlzed, only made ber more certain that tliere was somie- thiag the matter, -but lie could flot add anythlng te it. He found Laite, when lie went back to hlm, still in comia; the blood-shot veins stood eut against the gliastly grayness of hie face, and bis stertoerous 'breathing sounded through the roome. - - *ýConstance Sherrili had corne ln a faw-moent. .#,Ïre fromp an after- noon reception; the servants told lier at once that somethlng was happIening shouts and liad 50051 a mian pounding upen the deor there, but they liad net takou ilt upon theniselves te go over there. She liad told the chauffeur te walt wltb theO moter and had x'un at once to the. telep\u003ehone and called Alan; bIs attempt to put ber off made lier certain that wliat liad liappened was net finlshed but was stili golng on. Her anxiety and the sense of their responslbllty for Alan overrode at once aIl other thouglit. She told the servants te call lier father- at the of- fice anid tell hlm sornething was wroilg at Mr. Corvet's; thon she called lier maid and hurried eut te the motor. \"To Mr. Corvet's-quickly!\" she di- rected. Looking tbrough the front doors of lier car as it tnrned Into Aster Street, she saw a young ,man, carrying a dec- ter's case, rusi up the stops o! Cor- vet's houàei. This, quite unreasonably aince she had Just talked wlth Alan, added to lier alarrn; she put ber band on the catch of the door' and opened it a little so as to be ready to leaveë the car as 80011 as it stopped. As the car drew to the curb, she sprang out, and stopped only long enough to'tefl thie chauffeur to be attentive and to wait ready to corne -into the bouse, if lie was called. The rnan witb tbe bag-Constance recognized hlmi as a young doctor wlio wvas starting ln practice ln the neigli- borhood-was just being admitted as she and ber maid reacbed the steps. Alan stood holding the door open and ý et blocking entrance' when she carne up. The siglit of hlm, told ber that it was flot physical burt that happened to him, but bis face showed lier there liad bee-n basis for her fright. \"You rnust flot corne ln!\" he denied ber; but she followed the doctor so that Alan could not close the Idoor upon ber. He ylelded then, and she and ber rnaid went on înto the hall. She started as she saw the figure upon the coucli in the library, andl as the sound of its heavy breathing reached ber; and the wild fancy which bad corne to ber when the servants had told ber ef what was going on- a fancy that Uncle Benny had corne back-was banished lnstantly. Alan Led li-er inte the room across from the llbrary. .\"You shouldn't have corne' in,\" li sald. \"I sbouldn't have let you ln; but-you saw hlm.\" \"Do you know blrn?\" \"Know hlm?\" She sbook lier liead. \u003c\"I mean, you've nover seen hlm be- fore?\" .No.,, \"ýHis narn e i Luke-lie speaks o! hlmself by that narne. Did you over hoar my father mention a rnan named Luke?\" \"No; neyer.\" L UKE'S voice ut suddeny their conversation; the doctor probably hadl given hlm sôme stimulant. \"Where'sli Bon Corvet?\" Luke de- manded, arrogantiy o! the doctoir. \"*Yen go et Ben Corvet! Tell Ben Corvet 1 want drink riglit away. Tell Ben Corvet 1 want rny thousan' dol- lar.. Constance turned swiftly to lier rnaid. \"Go out to the car and ýwait for me;' shle commandod. Luke's muffled, heavy volco went on; moments whlle lie feuglit for \"You hear me, yon darn Injin! .. You e tell Ben Corvet 1 want rny thousan' doliIra 'r I make-,1t two nex' tirne! You bear me; you go tell Bon Corvet. ...Yen lot me go, you damn Injîn! \" Througli the doorway te the llbrary tliey could see the doctor force Lue bacl\u003c upon th~e couçli; Luke feuglit hlmn furionsly; then, mnddonly as lie had stirreil te strengtli and fury, Luke col- lapsed agaîn. .His voice went on a moment more, rapldly growlng weaker: \"You tell Ben Corvet 1 want my morney, or l'Il tell. He knows wliat l'il teill. . . . Yeu don't know, yen Injin devil . . . . Ben Corvet knows, and I know . . . . Tell hm M'I tell . . . 1,1\u003e tell . . . M'I tell!\" The tlireatenlng -voice stopped suddeiily. Constance, very pale, again faced Alan. \"0f course, I underatand,\" she said. \"lincle Benny lias been paying blackmiU te this man. For years, perliaps. . . . She repeated the word National Directory of- Standard Products handling the varlous el asses of goods In- dIcated. The Courier recommends thlesO concerne as leaders ln their classes arnd every prospective purchaser can rellY upon getting honest wares from thern. Most of them have years of reputatin behind them. Moreover, they are \"a tional\" and a constant reminder of the steady, growth In Canadian industres Buyers unable to flnd the deslred Ir- formation ln this dlrectory are Invited t0 write to thîs office for Information, whldh will be furnlshed free of charge. APPLES, \u003cEvaporated\u003e: Graham Co. Limiteýd, Belleville, Ont. BABBITT AND SOLDER. Hoyt Motal Ce., Toronto. BRICKS AND TERRA COTTA. Don Valley Brick Works, Tor=ItO. CARPETS AND RUGS. Toronto Carpot Mfg. Co., Ltd.,TO rente. CAR WHEELS- AND CASTINGS. Dominion Wheel \u0026 FeuudreO Limited, Toronto. CI GARS. Andrew Wilson \u0026 Ce., \"BacheOe\" Cigars,' Toronto. ELEVATORS. Otis.iFenson Elovator Ce., Toronlto GLOVEÈS AND MITTS. Týhe Craig-Cowan Company, 1,10 ited, Teronto. HARDWARE. Hardware Company et~ TorontO Llinited, Toronto. PAINTS AND VARNISHES. International Varnlsb Co., Llflult9d Torento. PIANOS. Heintzman \u0026Ce., l'Ye 014e FifM,' Toronto. PIANOS \u0026 PLAVER PIANOS The, Newcombe Piano Ce., iLtdý Toronto. PRINTING INKS. Sinclair Valentine Ce. of Canfi4O Llmlted, Toronto. REFRIGERATORS: ~Eureka Rofnigorator Ce., Lim1ite Toronto. SORAP IRON, STEEL \u0026 METAI- F'rankel Bros., Toronto. TI NWARE Soren' Bros., Manufacturers,V rente, Ont. UNIFORM$S. Beaucliamp \u0026How, Liited, rente. VEGETABLES, (Desiccated): Graham Ce., Llmlted, Belvil Ont. WASHING MACHINES. Nineteen Rundrod Wasber C013 tany, Toronto. WATCH CASES. Ameriçan Wateh Case Co., L0 lted, !Toronto. WINDOW LETTERS ANDsiNS J. E. Rlihardson \u0026 Co. Trnt Ont.",
         "CANADIAN COURIER ,r au Ins'tant, lu a frigbtened voice, Lckmall!\" 7ýVon't you pleaso go, Miss Sher- 1Alan urged bier. \"Lt was good ou to corne; but you mustn't stay . He's-he's dying,ý of course.\" le- seatoil bersoîf upon a chair. L going to stay witb you,\" she said PlY. It was not, she knew, to share waitiug for the man lu the next nl to die; lu that, of itef, thore d be nothing for hlma to feel. Lt to be wlth hlm wbile roalization 21hbad corne-to bier was sottlîug i hlm too-realization of wbat this Ilt.to hlm. Ho was rouuizing tbat, tbought; hoe bai realizedi t; it ~e him, at moments, forgot bier e, listeuiug for sounils fromt the r room,.ho paceil back and forth le thle table or stood staring'away, 'i.ng to the portioros. Ho left bier Ofltly, and went across the hall to loctor. The man on the coucb bail eil as tbough to start Up again; volce began once more, but now ïWords wore wholly indistinguisb- Xlioaingloss, incohoront. They LPOd, and Luke lay stili; the doc- -Alan was helping hlm now-ar- nil a quite inort form upon the h. The iloctor bout over him. I ho deail?\" Constance boardl Alan IOt yot,\" the doctor answered; it won't be long,,now.\" bere's uotbing you can do for Le doctor sbook bis beail. 'Ilre's nothlng you can do te e hi-m talk-bring hlm to baimsef 80 s that hoe wlll tell what hoe 8 threatenlng tW teil?\" It doctor sbruggod. \"How muny Unieos, do you suppose, be's been k a.nd still not tolil? ConcealV Is bis establisheil habit now. L inhibition; even In wanderiug, tops short of actually teiliug-any- -e Oaine here --\" Alan told brlefly, ho doctor the ýcircumstunces, of \"R''s comlng. The'doctor moved from the couch to a chair and ~lwait, of course,\" hoe salil, \"un-' aven. Ho seemed to want to 8Olllthing else, end ufter a ma- ý lio camle out wlth it. ,youi I't be afrulid of Mny talklng out- ,..prof osslonal secrecy, o! e buck to Constance. Ont-, 'ay o! dusk was sproadlng, the bouse It bail grown Lance heard the doctor turu andl the~ sbadowy glow of a camne from the llbrury. d te anil fro with uneven lid niot speak to ber, nor Lt w-us very quiet in the ho coulil not even heur eathlng now. Thon she bCt or moving; Alan wont .t and swltcbed it onr, as camne ont ta thom. ,\" 1e said to Alan. \"Tbere's Sthese cases; you may not Wbth it. l'Il nuke out the lficate-pneumonia andl a Wlth aicohollsm, But the te be notlfied ut once; la cholce us te that, l'Il those things for you, if ber muif andl collar from the chair wbore she bail thrown them, andl lild thora out to ber, \"You'll go now, Miss Sherrill,\" hoe said. \"Indeed, you mustn't stay bore -your car's stili waiting, anil-you mustn't stay bore . . . in this bouse! \" Ho was standing, waiting to open the door for ber, almost whero hoe bai halteil ou that morning, a fow wceks ago, wbon hoebail first come to the bouse lu answer to Benjamin Corvot's summons; and she was wbero sho bail stood to rocoive hlm. Memory of bow hoebail lookeilý thon-eager, trembling a little with excitemnent, expectîng oniy to flild bis fathor andl bappinoss-camo to bier; and as it coutrastoil witb the way she saw- hlm now, sho chokoil queorly as she trieil to speak. Ho was very white, but quito coutrolleil; linos not upon bis face boforo bail corne there. \"Won't you corne ovor homo with' me,\" she sail, \"andl wait for father thoro tubl we eau thlnk this tbing out togothor?\" Hor sweotuoss almost broke hlm dowu. \"This . .. togethor! Tbink this out! Oh, it's plain enougb, Isu't it? For yoars-for as long as Wassa- ouam bas been bore, my fathor bas boon soeing that man andl paying blackmaii te hlm twico» a year, at ieast! Ho livoil lu that man's power. He kept money lu the bouse for him always! Lt wasn't anything imagin- ary that buug over my father-or any- thlng createdin lu is own mind. It was 'sometbing roal-real; it was dis- gruce-disgraco anil worse-something ho deserveil; andl that ho fougbt with biackmall monoy, Ilb a coward! Dis- bouor--cowardlco--blackmall! \" Sho drow a ttbe noaror to hlm. \"You dlilu't ý%ant me te know,\" she salid. \"You trlod Wo put me off wbou 1 calleil you *ou the telephone; andl- wben I came bore, you wanted me, to go away beforo I hoard, Wby idn'tý you want me te know? If ho was your father, wasn't ho our-frienil? Mine anud my father's? You muetlot us hoip y\u003côn.\" As'she approacheil, hoebail ilrawn back from ber. \"No; this is mine!\"ý hoe denieillier. ,\"Not- yours or your father's. You have nothing to do wlth this. Didn't be try in littie cowardly ways to keep you out of it? But hoý couldn't do that; your friendshlp mesant too much to hlm; he couldn't keep away from you. But I can-l can do that! Yon must go 'out of tbis bouse; you muet nover corne in hors agalu!\" H ER eyes fllled, as she watcbed hlm; neyer badl she likedoinal so much as now, as ho moved to open the door for bier. \"I thougbt,\" hie sajid almost wlst- fu1ly, \"it seemed to me that, what- ever ho bail done, it must have been mosUly against me. His leaving every- tblng to me seemed to mean that 1 was the one tirai he had wronged, and that hoe was trying to make it up ta me. But it isn't that; It can't bo that! It is something mucb worse than tbat! *... Oh, I'mi glail I haven't used much of hais money! Hardly any flot more than I can give back! It wasn't the money and the bouse hoe left me that rnatterod what bie really left me was just this . . . dishonor, sbame . .. The doorbeil rang, andl Alan turneil to thbe door and threw it open. In the dumk the figure of the man outaldo was flot at ail recognIzable; but as hoe enterod wlth hoavy and deliberate stops, passing Alan witbout greeting and going stralght to Constance, Alan saw by t.he llght lu the hall tiTat It was Spearman. \"What's up?\" Spearmait asked. \"They trled to get your father at the office and thon me, but noîther of us was thore. They got me after- wards at the club. They sald you'd corne over'bore; but that must ha4 been more than two hours ago.\" His gaze wont on past ber tW the drawn hangings of the room te the rlght; and'ho seolmoi to appreclate their slgnificance; for bis face whlten- od under 1Ws tan, andl an odil hush, came suddenly apon hlm. \"Io It Bon, Connteo?\" ho whlsperod. \u003cBon' ... coule back?\" H 9 drew the crtaîns partly open. The ligbt ln the lbrary bail beon oxtinguisheil, andl tbe lbght that'came from the hall swayed about the room, with the movemont of the curtains and gave a momentury semblanceo f life Wa the face of the man upon the couch. Spoarman drew the curtains quickly togother again, stili holding to tbemt and seemlng for an ius tant to dling to tbom; thon hoe shook blmsoilf togetber, -throw the curtains wlde apart, and strode into the room. He switchod on the light ana wont di- rectiy to the couch; Aklan followod hîm. 'He's--dead?\" \"Who is hoe?\" Alan demandeil. Spoarman seemeil to satisfy himselt first as to the answor to bis question. 'How should I kuow who hie is?\" ho askod. ;\"Thero usod to be a wheels- man on the Martba Corvet years aga wbo lookeil lîke bim; or lookeil liko wh-at this fellow may have lookeil liko once. I cau't bo sure.\" Ho turnod to Constance. \"'You'ro go- ing home, Connie? l'il see you over thore. l'il corne back about this after- waril, Conradl.\" Alan foliowed thein to the dloor and ciosoil it after thern. Hoe spread the biankets ovor Luke. Luke's coats, whlch Alan had romovod, iay upou a chair, and hoe lookeil them over for marks of identification; the muckinaw bore the label of a dealer lu Manltowoc -whorovor tbae mlgbt be; Alan illi not know. A side pockot produceil an olil briar: thore was uotbing else. Thon Alan walked rostiossly about, awalting Spearman. Spourman, ho be- levoil, knew this man; Spearman bad not ovon ventureilrupon modîfloil de- niai untîl ho was certain tbat the man was doad; and thon hoe bai ans wored sa as not to commit bimef, pouding learnlug from, Constance what Luke had toid. But Luko had sald notbing about Spearmian. Lt had been Corývet, andl Corvet alono. of whom Luko bail spoken; It was, Corvot whom he bail accusod; It was Corvot who had givon hlm mo.uey. Was It concoîvablo, thon. that there had boon two sncb evonts- lu Corvot's itfs? That oneO of tbesfi events concernod the Miwaka andl Spearman and sorti one-somo one 'wlth a buliet boie above bis eyoe\"-",
         "CANADIAN COURIIER HOW UCHDOES YOUR. FOOD, COST' Food values are measured ini units of calories. To-day, when foodcosts are soaring, the careful hop.sekeeper will find out how mucli per 1,000 'calories her food costs. If she buys: Butter at 50e. per 1b..,1,000 Bacon at'55e. per lb.. Mil at 13c. per qt.. Roast Beef ut 26e. pet lb'.. Lamb Chopsaut 38c. per lb..\" Chicken ut 32c. per Mb. Eggs at 45c. per doz., Beefsteak at 34c. per lb., Kellogg'# Toasted Com Flak\"e. (redy to aetv) calories will cost 13 ceiits 19 18.5 23.4, 32.7 44.7 \"45.6 *. 11.7- So Kellogg's Toasted Corn Flakes is the most economical food to buy. You- get more food value for your money than ix any of the above foods. Kellogg'-s Toasted Cojrn Flakes is a thýree-times-a-day food'- just as bread. or potatoes are. \u003cGet the Kellogg es Toasted Corn Flake habit. It'pays. It saves meut and wheat Nourlshing for growing children. Sustaining and satisfying for working adults. Sold onlp In m te original red, whiée and ,greenpackage. ew - For TOASTE CORN FLAKES LICEN$ED B9Y THE FOOD CONTROILLER LJNDER NUN18ER 2-055l -Northern Ontario, A,8 vast new land of promise and freedomn now open for settiemient at 50e an acre ini soIme dis- tricts-lu others Pree. Thousands of farmers are responding to the' cail. Ilere, right at the door of Southeru Ontairio, at home awaits you. For information as to terms, reguiations and railway rates to settiers, write to HION. G. IIOWARD FERGUSON, Minister of Landis, Forests and Mines. Il. A. MACDONELL, Direetor of Colonizatien, Pax'Iiament Buildings, TORONTO, C.ANADA. who had got\"l Corvet; and that the other event liad concerncd Luke and somethlng else? Lt was not concciv- able, Alan was sure; it was ail one thlng. ,if Corvet had had te do with the Miwaka, then Luit, had liad tp do wltli it too. And Sp earman? But if Spearman lad been involved in that gullty thlng, liad not Lulie known it? Then wby had netLuke menitloned Spearman? Or had Spearman not been really involved?, lad it been, pcrbaps, only evidence of' knowledgc of wbat.Corvet had. donc that Spear- man had tried to 'dîscover apd\" de- stroy? Alan went to the door and opened It, as lie lieard Spearman upon the steps again. Spearman waîtcd only until the door liad been reclosed be- hlnd hlm. \"Weil, Conrad, wbat was the idea of briniglng Miss Sherrli nto thîs?\", 1,I dldn't bring lier lu; I tried the best I could to kecp lier out.\" \"Out of ýwhat-exactly?\" \"You k-now better than 1 do. You know exactly wliat it- is. You know that man, Spearman; you know what lie came liere for. 1 don't mean money; 1 mean you know wliy lie came here for money, and why lic get It. 1 trled, as well as 1 could, to malte hlm tell me; but lie wouldn't do It. There's dlsgrace o! some sort licre, of course dsgrace that involves mY fatber and, I thlnk, yon toc. If you're not gullty witli my father, you'll lielp me now; if you are gullty, then, at least, your refusalto. belp wll let me know tihat.\" llI don't know what you're ýtalking about.\" \"-Then why dld you come, back bere? Yo 'u came bacli bere to protect your- self - I some way.\" llI came back, you youùàg fool, to say Somnetblng to you whlch, 1 didn't want :Miss Sherrili te hear. I didn't-know, ~vlien 1 took lier away, liow .complctely you'd taken -lier into--your fatlier's laffairs. I tolil you this man. May bave been a whrlsman on the Corvet; I don't kno-. more about hlmn than, tbat; 1 don't evern know that certaluly. 0f course, I lunew Ben Corvet was pay- inig blaclimiail; I'vc knowrL for years tbat lie was givlng up inoney te some one. 1 don't k noëv wo lie paid it to; or for wlihat.\" T 1E straini o! the ast few lourÈ ,was telling upon Alan; lits sklr flushed hiot iind cold by~ turns. H1E 1paced up and down while lie controlled himself. '\"That's not enough, Spearman,\" lié s3ald finally. 'I--'-ve felt you, some liow; underneatli all these t.hîngs. Th( first t4mie I saw you, you were In ti bouse doing sometblng you ouglit no to bave been dolng; you fouglit ni t'ien; you would have killed me rathe: than not get away. Two wceks ago somre one attacked me on the st reet- for robbery, thcy sald;, but I know I .wasn't robbery-\" \"You're not s0 crazy as te be tryini to involve mie in that-\" There came a sound to tbcm from the ball, e sound unmistakably denol lng sonie presence. Spearmnan jerke suddenly up; Alan, going to the.doo awl Ilooking into the hall, sa-% Wass, quamn. The Inda evidently had ré turned te the.lbouse some time before lie hELd been bringing to Alan now th accounts whlch lie had settled. H seemned te bave. been standing lu tb ball for some time, llstening; but h came In now, looking ilnluiringlY frc one -to the other of themi. \"Not friends?\" hie lnquired. \"Y and Henry?\" Alan's pa3sion broke out suddefl '*We're anythi.ng but that, Judali. found hlm, the flrst niliht I got h and while you were away, g01 througb mY father' things. 1 f\u003c\u003eI with hlm, and -lie ran away. He m the one that broke lnto, my fathe desks; maybe you'll believe that, el îf no one else will.\" '«Yes ?\" the Indian questioni ' ie ? t Was -p1ain that lie net 0 believed but that belleving gave immense satisfaction. He too\u003c -AIO arm--and led hlm into the simaller brary. H1e knelt before one Of drawers under the. bookshelves- drawer, Alanrecalled, which lie b self had been examiningwhen lie found WYassaquam watching hlm. clrew.out the drawer and dumnPed contents out upon the floor; lie tur the drawer about then, and pulled bottom out of it. Beneath the boti wbIcb lie hall removed appeared 1 another bottom and a few sheetl paper scrawled ln an uneven band with different colored lnks. At siglit of them, 'Spearmal, bad followed themn Into the roOlu, tered an oath and sprang forward, Ilndian's smali darli han.d gra, Spearman's wrlst, and bis facetl ed itself Into a fierce grin whlch si ed how llttle civilîzatîcu had Mud: lu hlm. the aborîginal passions. Spearman did not try 4e force bis instead, hie drew bacli suddenlY- Alan stooped and plcked Up tbA pers and put them lu bis pochet the Indlan had not been there, It w net bave been so easy for hlm V that, lie thouglit. (To be contlnucd.\u003e Shipboard SketcieE (Concludcd frein page 1. tainly, on shipboard a commlssl\u003c an advantage. The belle of the sbip Is Pal a pink-cWjeekedý_ golden bhaired of two, wlio is, crosslng the 0ceý bc wltli a father she lias plever Wlietbcr, It 15 the pretty Mothé th!s small repîlca of lier cliar\"\"'S draws so many large kliaki-clad iii around tbem wbhencver thcy aPPcý deck, wc cannot tell, but PatsY P ried off flrst by one burly figuI'O' 1by another, and tbere 18 not a ý officer on board 'who will not rell a game f bridge for tbe Prvle rùmplng up and dow'n the dock, ing or being drivign by this mlle In lber big fur coat wlth a ti1 wbip and Jlngle-bell reins. Ys 3 P atsy w as 111, th e litt e go1d en i t i ay inert on ber plllow. The\"U the doctor's 'turnto bie surround r pa t y's admirers, asking for the bulletins of bier bealth. The papers that come on board e t less eagcrly recclved. Patsys indIsposition ecie 9 fromn the, life-belt drill, whui3h W1o only excitpent thîs afterflQ01 the rc't cf u sseb by lf h.No, i andi werc sbown lovX te our belts and warncd to Xeep r 'ne r us in case o! ci(et L-steerage had thelr drill first thé crewv, then the passengers. made us feel hopeful that sein e beforevery long we sbafl be 'w! le by the pund of tbe erigiYiP and1 e rnornlng bhe shores of Cnd e dim1y se4è bebind u5S.",
         "CANADIAN COURIER THE GREAT CANADIAN CHOIR here boforo, -a first rendoring by k some yoars ago, when Debussy esslouism was at its height. Mr. Owski gave it a blg readlng. but id nlot convoy the superficial mys- Of the piece. The intention of score was te convey a \"moruing- -\" impression of what happonod âfteruoon before to a slimple :fawn forest.' The Polovetskbl Dances LPrince Igor were much more to Stokowskl's liking. Thoso -Poil da'fces are blazoningly bruliant, larle and super-nolsy, and the Iseemed to revel lu thom Por- thie final programme will elim- (ConcludAd from page 23.) inate this type of pioco and rise to a helght of sublimity-of whlch the coniductor Is nlot by any means in- capable. In the Valse Triste oi S- belius hoe created a littie gem of pure seductive suggestion with an element of ultimate sadness in the form of a fantasia., SStokowski will be looked for again in this country. He -bas the qualitie.s o! a really great conductor. No man evor came here who mnade a: botter first impression. Ho understands the tuner life of music and ho knows how to make good music interesting to common people, Withýout descending to gallery tricks hQ \"1gets\"l the gallery, and at the same time satisfies the \"talent.\" This le a' combination achieved only by really great artists. And It is a sign of tho times that good music is boing made human by such mon as Stokowski who nder- stand that the great masters did not write for podants and critios, but ma inly for the masses of the people. It is time musicians dropped their masks and 'stoppod being pedants. And It is equally timo that people ln genoral found out that they can get more thrills from good music than from poor music. George B ernar,.,,,.d Shaw \u003eand Rastus Minstrelsy and mordant wit on two stages in the same room DMEWHERE in a certain Cana- dian city thero is a strange, big. room, once ýa criminal court, whero a few days ugo e Bernard Shaw played at one 1 the.atternoon and ln, the even- t the other, and the matinee lu as thero was 'a glorifying LI of Rastus, Snowball and Co. engsor forblds us to mentionthe ,of this place. In the atornoon came lu by the north door and d over to the gallery stage built le chorus, o!, the mInstrol show. saw a stage up agaînst the big Ive whlch was part of the set for Slarkably clever presentation Of. Df Destiny, by professional ruena- Of the Oversoas Training CorPrQi satire on Napoloon was slmply iwith no properties whatover t a table, a candlestlck and a Sbuilt of stage boxes roped to- r. The big fireplaco was its ai backtground. This, as may be ed from Its adaptabillt3', was a' of art.le1% MIptY at 6 o'clocl\u003c the room was id Of ail but a few club memuber3 Pe90Ppe--who turned aIl the face- about, carried tlte stage etl0fl5 to the other'end of the shlfted *the - stage' llgbts,\" g 11P the curtains and made ready he ininstrel show schedulod to On at 8.15. Iu this presontation t1atic contrasts the entertainers Pl exampl ,e of playlng both ends' 8t the mniddle, perhaps.nover be- \"e~n lu any other theatre., The 11 It 'Was Possible being, that as Ooln -as once a cýourt lt bas un n'at each end. Sbiii'it cork end o! the mînstrel teCk possession of a county court across the hall for a dress- Â'- fter five men 'fad juggled tle electrlc connections, blowing \"the entire company\" got ta'e The planlat used a stand 11les in one corner. T4bp chorus Lltr Put over a hummIng vergec Id1Vfrgiuny behind, the curtain, 4 '17a Pulled back by baud for the Ilg lOrus, D)Ixie Land. 'tI b na table -back by the tire- tePresi\u003cdent of the Can .adiali (ý ommrce dangled lits boots ýtfa pilie o! cordwood and for betpart of three irnurs laifghed t, On another tabl1e nearby, forgot that there ever wore such folk us the Troubadours and the Minne- singors. At loet ten univorsity pro- fossors were present. Up near the ring of'darkies on the improvised stage, John Ross Robertson, proprietor of the Toronto Telegram, toit bimself getting merrior every moment until just about the end of the olle as the cathedral dlock was chiming 11.30 ho went home. For many years noue of thoe A.n atctnai photograph of ThoinaS halimer o! thseMetropolitan opera Company singKing In direct comparison wlth the New Edison. This is tie,Îf.mous toue test wltiÉhproves, that the volces of artiât and IfLtrumEieltare Indlqtlngulishable. over 30 great artists bave condueted these ,tests; more than 20,000W PeOOle have at- tended thefu. Andin] no n nsane bas a listener bten able tu note a shade of differeneb, between the two renditione. Net one has succeeded In detecting vwhen the living volce ceseed and the Instrumient continaued alone. Mfr. (Ibalmers, one of the worii' greatest baritones bas scored at tremendous succe\u0026% lu hie roles thLivlwnter, Ris interpre tion o! Valentine ini Faust is acclalmed b h critiesasonexhich Nvlloccupya promnt page in the history ol operati music, ordinarily serions mon bad seon a minstrel show. And this, show bad never been ou tho road. \"The bost minstrelsy I've heard. since 1 was a youth,\" sald Sir Edmund Walker, who the day before hadbeen chairman at the Board of Govornors o! Toronto University, and next weok mlght proside ut a meeting of the Coin- mittee on Fine Arts in Ottawa. \"In the old duys I seidom missed a good minstrol show. Purely American art? Yes, but it's universal.' Th1e stage held fifty- men, chorus, ring ýand ollo. Only the ring wore burnt-corked. Above the chorus was a camoufiagic poster of a large negro chorus palnted that afternoon by some of the mon on stage The ring con- tained fourteen blacks. Sambo on the right was Ruthven McDonald, vocalist and genoral entortainer, opposed by a vory refulgent Bones, iD the person of one Arthur Beemer, who has neyer been on a professional 'stage. The next most conspicuous \"4coon\" was a mnnwho for years bas made a hobby of painting the best negro studios lu Canada, If not America--Curtis Wil- Ilamsou, R.C.A., juggling with a tambo and\"lu the ollo playlng banjo and guitar. Other men lu the ring who have more or less -to do with other forms of art than minstrelsy were Fergus Kyle, late cartoonlst of the Globe and Saturday Night; W. W. Alexander, engraver and etcher; Raiph Eden Smith, archltect, J. Harry Smith, editor of the Sunday World; T. C. Greene, painter and teacher of art; Henry Button, Canadian manager o! J. M. Dent and Sons. Interlocutor and minstrelsy producer. Eugene Beau- pro, amateur artist, versatile amateur musIian, and pageantlst, manager of advertlslng for the T. Eaton Co. The chorus containod tour painters and about a dozen professional singers, I inasl response te, a strongly feit demand that7We recently concluded ta offer the Officiai Laboratory MÔàdel in a wa1nut cabinet in addi- tion to the popular Chippendale. To tell yoù, howi we developed the cabinet, which is pictured an this page, may throw samne light on the rnethods of the Edison Laboratorles., Weý began 1b \u003cy asking the country's leading Imakers ta submit designs. Forty different sketches were offered. After a careful inspection we rjcced wcny-fve.That left fifteen; every one of them a ha'ndsomce model. But we wante d the best, th 1c most beautiful cabinet possible ta sâecure. Seo.wc had fifteen différent models actu- ally constructed, ane fr,ý each sketch. A jury theri' weigrhed-théir respective claimns and finally the model you'sec was selected. Thus thirty- laine desîgns were rejeoted that thc most beauti- fully proportioned cabinet af its petiod might grace yaur drawing room. Thiis process of elimlflation characterizes eveiry stop ln thÎ ma4nufactuire of our instruments. 2,400 different mate- riais,,for example, were trieti and rejecteti beforc we finally founti the beet material for the diamost4 stylils reproducer. Se the new William andi Mary Model at your dealer's. price $35o. Bond for our -Magazine \"Along Broadway.- It's packeti with interesting musical information, in addi- tion te data aboult \u003c'The Phonograph wilh a Soni\" THOMAS A. EDISON, INC., Orange, N.J. EdIsçsi Ie-Creations should not be x\u003eIayed snd esnnot be ployed properly on sny other instrument Il they coni4I be, the mantue- UrerS Who seek to profittiw Mr. Ydiea's research) wôrk wvould be able te m~ake toue test compatisns, snob a we bave mnade with the New Edison before twoiillonmiuslovem .",
         "V,*NÂDIÂ,N COURIER JÙ$T JUJBLISHFD-1918 NEW REVISED, RESET AND MUGI- ENLARGED EDITI 1ON, WITH 500 NEW ENGRÏAVINGS ADDED T H E Modern- Gasoline Automobile By VICTOR W. PAGE, M. S. A. E., Author cf. -Autoinobile Rkepamning Madle Easy,ý\" Automobile Starting. Lighting am Ignit~ion Systemi, et\u003cc., etc. 1,011,OCTAVO PAGES--1,000 SPECIALLY MADE ENGRAVINGS WITK TWELVEýF.OLDING PLATES. PRICE $3,00. ----.MMMMBý This la the most complete, practical and up-to- date tresatise un gasoline -automobiles and their component, parts ever published. ,In the new reviaed and entargecl 1918 ledition ail phases of automobile 'construction, operation and mainten- ance are fuily and completely described, and in language-anyone eau understand. Every part ofI al] types of automobiles, from ligbt cycle-cars to heavy motor trucks and tractors, are described in a thorougli marner, net only the automobile, but every' itemn «J t; equipment, aCcessories, tools needed, supplies and spare -parts necessary for ita upkeep, are fully discussed. It le clearly and concisely written by an expert famiiHar with-every branch of the automobile indutry and the origin- ator of the practical syetem of 'seIf-education on technicalsubjects. It ie a liberal education in ,the automobile art, useful, te.ali who motor for either business or pleasure. Anyone reading the Incomparable treatise le lu toucb witb ahi li- provements that have been made iu motor-car construction. AIl latest developments, such as higb speed aiuminum motors and multiple' valve and eleeve-valve englunes, are cousidered lu detail. The lateet' ignition, uarburetor andi lubrication practice le eutlined. New forme o! change speed gears, and final power transmission systems, and ail hateet chassie improvements are ebewn andi describeti. This book lu useti in all leading automobile schools, and isl coucedeti te be the Standard Treatise. The clhapter en Starting and Lighting Systenis bas bleu great'i, enlarged, and many auto- mobile engineering 'features that have long puzzled laymeu are ex- plalned so0 clearly that the-underly- iug principles can be underetooti bY anyone. This book was. firet pub- liehed six years ago, andi so much new matter has been atdoti that it le niearly twice its original size. The only treatise coverlng varlous fermi of war automobiles andi re- cent developmeuts lu moter-trtick design as well as Pleasure cars. This, book le flot too technical for the laymfan nor toc elementary for the moe expert. It ie an incompar, able work of referencè for' home or echool. WHAT WAS SAID 0F PREVIQUS EDITION 0F THIS BOOK \"It le the best book on the Auto. mobile seen up te tiate.\"--J. H. Pile, Aseociate. Editor Automobile Trade Journal. 'Everrý Automobile Owuer bas use fer a book o! this character.\" -The Tradesmn \"This book le superior to any treatise beretofore publisbed on the subject.\"-The Inv'entive Age. \"We kunow o! ne other volume that le se cemplete iu aIl its de- partments and lu whlcb the wide fieldi o! auitomçiliile -'construction, witb its inechaukcal lu4 ricacies, le and in the muatter o! iIlustrationsý\" -The Motoriet. \"The book - l very thorough, ýa careful examinatien faillng te dis- close any peint lu connection witb the automobile, its care andi repair, to have been oveloked.\"-Iron Age.- \"Mir. Page bas doue a great work and benefit to the automobile field.\" -W. C. sford, Mgr. Y. M. C. A Automsobile Scitool, Boston, Mass. \"It le just the kind of a book a motorlet iteets if he wants te un- dersta'.jd his car.\" - American Thrrsh ,iman. UNWVERSTIY -BOOK COMPANYI 181 SIMCOE STREET, TORONTOj ou\u0026 te me mue' for )b. AU thseboydoc il the boy Corer two architecte, one. pe\u003cIagogue, one editor and twice as many others wbo muay bie more useful. to practical civili- ato.Noue of them had ever beu on the rond. The olii0 inciud ed- Boris Hambourg, 'ceilist, who played Mas- cagnls Intermezzo on a cigar-box- 25-celioette accompanied by Broadus Fariner on a clgar-box--50-fiddîe. Just before they weut on stage the bridge of the celioette lost itself and the player hadl to Improvise one out o! a fag-cnd o! linoleum. Dunington Grubb, landscape artist, did a strong- man burlesque. Frank Johnstonl painter and designer, did a street minetrel turn., Gladstone Brown, McLean Borthwick, Jimmie Manson and Rtuth'ven McDonald sang \"Mr3. Winslow's Soothlng Syrup.\" Wllilam- son, Beemer, Beaupre and R. L. Defries, lawyer, did maudolin- and gultar quartettes. Beaupre did a troubadour accordeon tur~n. And -fial- number was Henry Buttoa di\u003c 'a Hula dance Ilu Honolulu tog ia fil of a Hawaiian quartette. With ail its resurrectedl patrar, jokes, its rather disjointe\u0026 techniC its reminiscent flavor of Lew D stader and Co. it w as potentiali bigger exposition of minstrelsy t any of the old hune companies, wil chorus worthy.0f grand opera. Acc ing to, the Christian Science Mon: there là now.a revival of minstrel. timent ina the Uniteil States. almost i mpromptu and neyer hearsed-in-the aitogether coalition varlouskinds of artists is perhaPs first serious effort, -tu re-stage. streisy, ln America. ,According symptoms it promises te biossoin this season Into something undeni big-for theatre performance. THE- MUSIC EDITOR ONTRIAI B ECAUSE we beleve, that music le a popular s.ubject as Pnuch en- tltled-to indignation, entbusiasmn and argument as finance or basebali, we take great pheasure lu publishlng two letters, botb of themn vigorous on- slaughts uponý the man wbo bas charge of the music departinent of the Canadian Courier. The Music Edîtor ls not quite se, sensitive as Vanco uver, B.C., Feb. 12, 191L8. Editor, Canadian Corier: A anative Canadian teattempt- ed national character of your paper bas' interested me, and having had to do witb musical mat- ters for sometblug ever thirty years lu Ontario and ou the Coat, your musical page bas attracted my atten- tion. Let me say at once that If your preserit Musical Editor le supposedl to lui any seuse represent or embody the musical status and aspirations of Canada, 1 consider hlm a.-hopelees failure. I siould regret exceedIngly If lu any quarter hie should bie regard- ed as a measure e! my musical ideas or ideals. About two months ago there was an article headed, \"How Broadway Lis- tens te Wagner,\" or sorne such cap- tion, which rnight get by as an effort lu the style of. \"Fariner Cernitossel'1s tiret visit te a Shakespeare play\" o! blessed memory at the back conces- sion çcturch socia.l. As intelligent com ment on Wagner, Heaven save us! 'ýÉow te nationalize music\" mnigbt serve as a formula for developiug na- tionallty ilu boliers o! the Scotch marine type, say, or tweed sultinge. 1 have before nme a sensibiy 'wrltten con- structive article on the samne subject from the Sydney (Aus.) Dally Tels- graph. Between the two la a chasmi. The \"Messlah\" effusion le too crass ,for words. Surely it is a waste et good ink, net te mention space and paper, for thse Courier te begin find- ing fault wlth the musical design and construction o! a work whlch bas been before the world and has held Uts place. without question for 176 years. Dur- lng the' laet Christmnas season there were two !uil-liedged Messeb perform- ances ln \u003cVancouver, both te large audi- ences, wlslch stayed te the end. On Christmtas Sunday hall the churches lu towu gave Meselah numbers. There were aIse performances o! the Ora- torio at New Westminster, Nanainie, Victoria and deubtsess ail over Cant- ada as well. lu Sy'dney (Aus.) the MVessiàb was giren' five different tixnes wltb the thermemetor at arpnnd 95 soine of the musical profession, Or should besitate tu have other Peo expose bis weaknesses iu print. if music le ever to become a natie fact: lu Canada, critics 0f music, ieged or otherwise, will have tO the gauntlet of -other critics wholi a perfect rigbt to speak out On t subject fromn Halifax te, Victori2 Editor. The, \"Sex\" article-is puire i Tbere ls just as much.sex lu music tbere is lu sculpture, 'painting, lit' ture, or as, tbere wlll hereafter be poitics. Let me suggest, If you wish Y, musical page to escape becomijig a word, that you secure a writer b3 Iug at ieast a glimmer of musical slgbt and a medicuin ofý authoritat information,. Having paid my subseriptiou te Y' valuéd publication, 1 should lilce obtalii ln worth la7 creditable O dianlem, musical and otherwise- A. E. WHITI Editor,*Canadian Courier: Dear Sir,-I have juet finlshed ri ingý your \"Musir\" Departmneft- I'my goodn ess-~ was.there auyt.i1ti the Iast two weeks that the editOl that departinent was eatisfied wit of course tbis paper le read by Otl' -than Canadians-and what % they think o! \"the music worid. Of routo?\" The Symphony- Orchestra, or \"baud,\" as the editor says, plaiS beautiful, Tchalkowsky Patheie whiie hoe wattches \"the bot air ', ing up te get away.\" 1 am sorrY, if we eacbi bave to imagine oIiu . story, 1 do hope mine was a Il more beautiful and aise a littie r fittlng than tbe \"dance o! the el light bulbe.\" Ir 1 do like te %way bie says- of interestiug stuif migbt~ be -rtt etc. As to Navarrete-or Ada as li millarly addresses lier- hier 9 which \"was ail teo short,\"I hiàPP te be a berrowed one, as bl r hadu't arrived. Wby ahl tis 8 \"sex ?\" Can oue not enjoy m.II out the \"sex\" appeal-or dld hOe9 that mlxed up wlth personalt-- Then Mrs. H. A. Beach, Or t wise \"mother la the kitchen fl dlougbiiuts.7 Now imagine al describlng a guest lu that way, o Is our gust. Then off hie str5 lier playing-\"Without a tillge emetien\"-\"e! any sorts\"!..hat lie leoking for, \"HawaiiaU lIni Y n I-I tn pjinnlni' SO. t local",
         "CANADIAN COURIER IM L8MNo. 173, by John McG (Tarnworth. Ont.) [aliY, Compo\u003esed for the \"'Cour BIack.-F ive Pieces. Whit - i Pics lite to play and mate in thr blemn No. -174, by C. W. Shepp d Pflize, Good Companions' Dec., 1917.» lie: R at QRsq: Q at KKt5; Bs aý QRtsq and Q8; Kie ai ý.3. àk: X at Q5;, R at KR2; B at 't Q4 and K4, P at QB5. White mates in two. SOLUTIONS. blemn No. 170, by L. B. Salki \u003e-144 P-.B4;' 2. Q-12, R-J Kt2 nmate. .\u003e.ý,B-K6; 2. Q-KBsq, ~Q or Rt mates. Kt--IB4; .2. Q--K4,ch, mate. .theat; 2. Q--Q3ch, B: S3. Rt or Q mates. blemn No. 171, by F. E. Godi P_2 1 3 ch; 2. QKt-R6 *..:P14 ch; 2. RKt-K6 .R-Q5; 2. Rt.-.B5 mate. .R-1,5 ; 2. KtxIB mate. K-B2l; 2. RtXB mate. P--QB4; 2. Rt-Rt5 mas B ýmoves; 2. QKt-K8 tamn No. 172, by Dr. J. J. O'lK ý-Q5. Bý-B4; 2. Q--4R6 mate. B-B6; 2. Qx.Kt mate. .threat; 2. Q--B6 mate. To Correspondent. Acton West.-Your afte h170 ia Incorrect. (J.McG.), 1-OU latest thrbe-mover a] ý. Ail Particulars re correstuny ir r ikk rlect solutions of Probiemis No t11 172 received fromn John CHESS IN TORONTO. 'C'fl)licated game piayed fi 'it flfl5naleft at the Toronto 3etwéèen 'Messrs. *J. Boas and beli, King's Blshop's Gambit. oat. A. W. Campb -4 1. P-K4 -KB4 2. PXP 134 3. P-KB4 (a -Ilsq5. 1'xP --IK2 ~ 6. rK t-RB3 7. Q-R4 (c) -4RRt4 (di) 8. Q-R4l (e) _Q2 9. Q-Rt3 t-Rt5 10Xt-KR3 t-..913 11. 1'..(i ) -Ks12 ýQxQP t-B3 13. Q-Kt3 ~Rt514. Rt-B4 (g L.-4C5 (h) 15. 1-.Q4 (i) __i 16. _PxRB (j) 17. Q--Qsci t--B6ch (k\u003e 18. IK-R2 X~t4ch 19. Rt-Q3 t 5ch (1) 20. R-Rsq ( S(a) 24. Rt--QRB --Q4ch 29. R-Bsq R4Qh30. B-.Q2 cal defe.nce. It careful hs.ndll goýod continuat 2. 4. P---QS mna lt ex t-move p2 imidable arrang ,aï5 preferable. .m open to 8. -B2; 10. QxP, troublesomne. icharacteristic In this case, D (f) il QxQP could have Ïoeen Play- d tonce, 11. QxKtI' is tmtrg 'out Black'e better policy is to, attend te, his backward development. (h) 'This is a flurther swindile. lb t White is committed tô an -unsound .policy. (1) It would have been preferable to, regor. play 15. PxB. If 16. Kt-B7 dis, ch, ,then 16. Kt-K6,ch. If 16. Q-R5ch, Ier.\"1 then simply 16..,P-iRKt3. (j) Again PxQB would be our choice. (k) A desperate sacrifi-ce, which Black .shouid have accepteci readiiy. j, (1) Now White demolishes the ad- vanced Pawns and a dangerous attack against the exposed Blackc Ring resuits. ( m) If 20.....,..K-R3, then 21. KtxBPch. KxKt; 22. QxPch, K-34; 23. Q-KR3ch, RaP; 24. Q--Ràch, and mates. (n) It is difflicuit to, enaintain the at- tack. 24. Q-B4 la adequately met by ,24. ..; 2. 4.Kt--Q2 instead would lose the l3laek Queen, whilst i 24. . t---QR3 would sunrender the pleces ahead, by %.5. Q-ýB7-ch, K--9sq; ,26. R--Qsqeh, R-B2; 25. Kt-4)5ch, etc. The text-move seeme right. (o) Here however White goes astraY and the attack filters out. The win-niflg ,continuation was 25. Rt-IB3. (p) The -final mtstakte 27. Rt-CB4 in- - stead was the best at his command. The resulting position la unfathomable though Black's extra, piece should tell ee. eventually. a rd. club, R at Romance of the Ocean t QR4 (Concluded from page 21.) KR; attention to the tides, as Hugo ad- vises, he would realize that in their ln. mighty power and the volume of their 33 3 urrents, lies the answer to the sub- marine menace. any From another point of vlew, as »a RxQ; so'urce of food supply, the ocean Is xQ or -proving its worth. The scarcity o! e Y. cattie, as well as that of other meat- mate., producIng animais In Canada at the Spresent time, as well as the soaring prices' of what Is available, should .î. cause the housekeepers to study the Late. value of fish as a food. It compares :eafe. most favorably with manv far more costly edlIbies, but the greatest trouble Is to acquire the knack of really pal- atable cooking o! this foodi, Which rPlay eminent specIalists have told us s0 ~Pears often, Is healthful for the body, and ipondi- whichi stimulates the brain, because s. 170,, belng easiiY asslmilated; It Causes mc- none of the false energy or fatal lethargy, whIch Is an after effect of nthse two heavy a doet. Chess A. W. Our Reserves of Stocks eil. (Concluded froml page 21.) nursery etock which we, should pre- pare to meet. -Thestock of youang trees which will be needed for the re- forestation o! the areas laid waste by and for war, may be best obtained from countries negx the scene o! re- forestation, but whether done there or bore the interested Governments should at once provide for thse estab- lishment or support of the necessary nurser.ies, A -possible procédure o\u003e would be to have certain nurseries or coxupanlos authorIzed to, go ahead under a scheme that ilhall secure the kind of trees wanted, and guaranteed a certkain per cent. per annuim gn the market value of the stock under êul- tivation, the count to be based upon a yearly census made by a Government leacis agent. The longer the time before ng by the trees are to ho used, the blggor iobn at they wifl be, and the nurseries will y' al have received a certain per cent. o! ormlits ement the dost for each year of the tree's The 11f e. This inducement should secure Bzxt, the necessary' producers . which sport- la flot chemes outiined will go a long tard providing a stock of agri- material ample to meet a de- àleh will becoino Insistent the peace is declaroci, and its in some f orm is essential. In. the, Oreat War are using WRIGLEY regularly. Il steadies stomach and nerves., aliays tbirs, Puts \"pep\" IMo tired bodiles. 'Aids digestion. Lastin refreshment at smail cost. Chew \u003ct after ever' meal The Flavour Get. Earlier Crops-- Better Crops By Using Hot Bed-' Give your vegetables six weeks' head-start. by settîng them out in Hot Beds. Get Lord \u0026 Burnham 'Hot Bed Sasb. They coreinue strong and solid rtor years. joints are tight * and STAY tight. Sa¶h are made from high grade Cypresa I '\"thick. Standard Sash mneasures 3 r 6 feet. Prices on Standard Hot Bed.Sash Single Light Saah, Unpain zed and'Unglazed, 5 for $6.90, 10 for $13.40, 25 for $33. Prices f.o.b. Factory. We also, janufactur: a complete lie of greenhouse materials. .IrDrnam6. Limnited of Canada Two : Roysi Bank 1141. Fatry: St. Cathauines, Camada Muteoal Transpotatio»lldg. TRAVELLERS KNOWuv THAT SERVICE COUINT S, DAY TRAINS traverse most interesting route, Con venient rich ini soil, rich in timber, minerais. clirnate and scenery. timne, and NIGHT TRAINS have sleeping cars with wîde. high, long and comfrtabe a\u0026y berths and restful easy-running coach«s. comir tble ASK FOR C.N.R. ROUTING-any Agent-or wrhLe General welI ventil- Passenger Department. ated cars. Monitr.aI, Que. Toronto, Ont. Winnipeg, Man..",
         "CýANADiAN COURIER. Short'Story Classics Telling Tales To Read by the 'Evening Lamp and Promising ail the Happiness In- spired by the Beut Literature GrenCItk List of -Countries and 25 Cents G~it Stamping Hi A rings Yen a 2*O agesAiItor~Handy Volume 25 Cents Onc Volume toEach Country Claisie ENGLAND AEC Anthony Hope A. Conan Doyle Thomas Hardy H. Rider Haggard Charles Reade J. Landers ,'Wilkie Collins W. C. Seully Amnelia B. Edwards IPerey Hemingway Angelo Lewis F. W., Robinson ITÀLY \u003eIRELAND James Paya Sainuel Lover W. E. Norris G-eorge H. Jessop Laurence Oliphant Jane Barlom- Anthony Trollope John Barnim «A. Mary P. Robîinson William Carl eton FRANCE SCOTLAND R. L. Stevenson J. M. Barrie Ouida S. R. Crockett WVil1ki1e Collins Ian MacLareni Hesha Stretton Sir Walter Scott Stanley J. Wpymnan ?rofessor Aytoun LON'DON R: L. Stevenson, J. M. Býarrie GRRMANY F. Ànstey Arthur M1orrison Beatrice Harraden 1. Zangwill John Strange Winter Beatriee Harrade'n Onida é1Q1ýR. L. Stevenson * Marie Corelli Williami Black THE SEA W. Clark Russell G. B. O 'Hallbran Sir Walter Besant Grant Allen A Series of the Great Stories of the World by £minent A utho Ta ARE YOU A Book Qoflector, A Story Reader? Do You Buy Books to While Diii] Hours Away? Note that this Set Rlas Been Compiled and Published by a FIrm of Eminent Publishmr and You Are G.tting all the Advan- tage of Buyiiig at Low Price What Ceet Thoiisands of Dollars Orizunally to Produce. Bo-while they Last-at 25e' each post. THN ( Ce., De St., THE TRAIL TO THE SKIES \u003cConcluded from page 8.) day. Now it was always niglit. His ouly danger lay lu receut wiudfalls, strewu luto It, but lie kept well to mid- stiream, wliere sucli possibilities were less. Wlth ail the grace and skill o! the old days lie squattcd lu the steru. guldlng the fragile craf t that swePt downward aud onward like a thing possessed o! lfe. The river grew broader, more swift o! curreut. Tributaries swelled Its head of water. Past heavily-wooded sliores it swept for hours. In late afternoon it carried the canoe and Usa loue passenger into a wild, barren couutry-lfeless, ghostly wastes wliere scraggly rocks reared their hos- tile helghts to elther side. 1 The stream grew tumultuous lu a gorge. Old Machova stiffeued at bis eaddle as a distant boom of thunder reaclied bis ears, now rlsing, uow faîl- ing, now fading almost to, nothiugness, but ever lucreabsing ln volume after succeeding internIisslons. He was iu the rapids. Fonming,, swirliug, lasli- iug waters raced with hlm. But their mood sang no angry, tbreat.eniug song. to hlm. Their mood was bis mood. How well lie kuew ail their hidden dangers! Times lnunerable he liad fluug dellance at their worst. To-day tliey were his brothers. He joiued lu their paeans. Wlld tbiugs ,ashore stared. lu fascinated wouder as lie passed. But old Machova saw not, materlal thlugs. ,He saw only.smillug joyous faces from the long ago, beard only the sougs of joy and triumph about lim. The thunders ahead boomed 10111 and louder, merged Into a miglity rc The waters suddenly grew vell smooth, but swifter and swifter. 'i canoe fairly hissed -through space. \u003cOld Machnva saw flot the ascend clouds of vapor ahead, where raiubow played in the dyiugi rays thle sun. He saw only the Mist Mai( tlat haunts that ralnbow wîth ar outstretclied to receive him. The canoe was poised for one stant out over the brluk of the catari whlcli drowued all semblance of old warrior's -last triumpbant whc then it descended the chasma likf slver of light and ail was aË lt before. Back at the reservation next day agent remembered bis promise to old Indian. Before lie sealed up letter that carried It lie scauued odd-looklng diagram on the bir'cl b quizzically. \"I'd glve two cents know. wliat that fool picture meai lie poudered. \"Oh well, miglit as'v send It auyway, even If the ceD doea throw Itaway. Likely as lt's only a touch for more tobacco. But over In France, back ln resl dusky-skiuned Canadian private si ed as lie opeued the letter and t, the film of bark from ItL .\"What 'gmatter, Pete ?\" asked a cernIng white comrade. \"Get auY news ?\" The Indian soldier turued awaY bide the moIsture lu bis eyes. \"Yes,\" lie sald. \"Old Maul 0W father-gone up.the t rail of the sk\u003ci, againet it. And this is precisely tlie dlaim defiuitely made by Lloyd-George and General Maurice. If the Allies can play the first card lu the 'west.. and compel a great battie there at two or three points, It will be greatly to their advantage to do so. ýBut Ger- many le hardly lkely to choose the western line, aud to throw hersel! with an inferior force againSt lmnpreg- nable fortifications. This le th-i view taken by Lazare Welller, wlio wrltes lu the Paris L'Homme Libre, aud who lias won much distinction as a war cratic. He says 'that the war muet, of course, be ultlmately' won or lost in the weet, but that the time lias not yet come for the final struggle. He says that there is no louger any secret about Germany's Intentiou te brlug an of- senelve lu the eat, because thue la the ground that must be dleared Up bofore anything can lie douc ele- wbere. 'Geruîany muet get lier hauds free here as a prelimlnary to what- ever elie may lutend te do auywhere else. 3Vhatever the ultîmate outoome may lie se, far as the west le con- cerned, It le o! preemînent Import- ance to her te lie the \"man lu pos- session\" lu the Balkans and lu As Miner. The whole Mittel Europa echeme hangs upon this, aud ehe le certainIv flot dominant ln the Bal- îug to essentials. Slie lias an patlietic veneration for the in professes to bave. Aud the xuap a satisfactory one so long as liE tel Europa cliain la broken, least threatened, lu' the Baîka long as the end o! the clialu a dad and the %PersIan Gulf le w~ lu British bauds. This, of course, le the nia planation of Germauy's uuwilli: to say auythIug deflulte abou gium. She does not wisli to re, a card until ahe kuowe !tg 1 value for trading purposes. HI made hei'self secure lu Polan Lithuania it would liaye been a mnatter. If sbe were safe lu tl kaus it would be another matte ehe lias been dlsappoiuted, at le' the present, lu Rusela; the J link la so precarlous that eb hardly be eald te posese it I whlle the terminal linke at 1 have actually been lest. If eliE sweep ever Greece lt would Put different complexion on the Bit Belglum would net then lie Rec as a trading card, and ehe.need more than trade off BeliuMl turu for a guaranty of repose Balkans. If Germauy could es herself uuchallenged ln the E ehe would have won the war y la go E F Drove RUSSIA THO' DEAD YET SPEAKETHÎ \u003cConcluded frein page 16.)",
         "CANADIAN COURIER FOR SALE R ELEASE D MACHINERY CONSISTING 0F 2-1186 cu. fi. Compressors 225 H. P. Motor. Aftercoolers. Air Re-heaters. Air-Receivers. Woodwoing Machinery. Round and Square Ore Buckets. Rock Sand Dump Cars. Cernent Guns .and, Grout Machine. Rock Crushers. Drille (Sullivan \u0026 Hardy). Transformers (50K.V.A.). Generatore. Derricks.\u003c Electiic Hoists and Hoisting Engines. Concrete Mixers. 25 Motors. Dresser Joints. 10 Centrifugal Pumps. 37,000 Crucif orm Jessop ' s Dril Steel in. sizes 1 inch to 2 1-2 inch. The above constitutes: few only of the various articles for sale. Apply or write to H. G. JACKSON, P.A. MOUNT ROYAL 1UNNEL \u0026- TERMINAL £0., LIO. 411 DORCHESTER SI. W., IMONTREAL, QUEBEC California Offers 1~ Unsipas»d Attractions fer-- TH4E Wlnter Tourisi WARM, SEA BATHING - GOLF- TARPON FISHINO,, ETC. Hfomelile, Moderate-pric.d ]Resoti as w.II as The. More Palatial ilote!. cbolce of Routes S.e That At Iint One P'ortion of Yqmw Il\" R..de idVia Particul 0in to Ma yOU are yeung. Pacilic Roddes.\" 1 PacinecTf e.t Amuts,ý or Paneag6r Agent. Toroneto. brift that will malte you rlch I malte the 'I ,tbeue5n~ asW57ý tel the 38ftof 7h air oasrs Uch \u0026r Ides tM Unvra .' Ie PMWsture ateir e er %jtires b IL ouhce *11 Manufacturerau mmr. Gargsd, A.ý OCIRADE$R'8 SON la. 1CP4 . T £ ICRONTO, ONT.: BDbrader mroucta wsra Awarde\u0026 a IA trn hrae sMd tW! O=. UMxposion. \"Thome ta a Re\u0026- l 9",
         "EMý ip tr EMr sé sel ML Sp ïM ý: 311 MM11 ïlipul, A pssxueml NU Qn à cw NOS wMN \u003em- 4.. sis C.à.MW Pu- 2à.. M A t es solisocNest Z sci tri Ah- Wî est!\u003e\" QCwj,,ý \"M % lit îe %Q0§4 album\" J. ïm, 017 ma .7 î; Mon 'Wý z lu-lu . . . . . . . . . . ................. . . . . . . . . . . . . Àr - à7"
      ]
   },
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06911_585/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1"
}
{
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06911_388/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1",
   "version" : "0.4",
   "doc" : {
      "title" : [
         "The Canadian courier. : Vol. XV. No. 22 (May 2nd, 1914)"
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Toronto : Courier Press, Limited, [1914]"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Biweekly Feb. 2, 1918-Oct. 15, 1920"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "May 2nd, 1914 Price 10 Cents VOL XV. No. 22",
         "2 CANADIAN COURIEIt» Elevate Profits and LowverAN Costs, 0 0~j T HE volume of prftîn any. buaines4, alone mairks that business s success or a efailr. j This requires no argument. The. fac isl seif-evident. it.us~ And profita clepend upon two tings--the ability to seil your gooâs ýat a CI.FlFIM NA TO 1 sufficient advance over cost to U-Ih 7UUM cover the expense' of handling and leave a surplus and the ~..t abiiity to placeé that soiling price at a figure which enables, your customner torecognize the value____ you offer. Now, it is impossible to sel1 goods continuously uniess the price is right. It is, likewise, impossible to get the price down to the right figureTHESE NAMEPL TES unless the cost of haridling goods is reduced to a minimum.M PL TE An Otis-Fensoin Freight Elevator enabies the manufacturer, or the merchant, to economnize time, On Your Bicycle àL labor and floor-space. All the floora of the building are macle Stand 1 or the liii instantiy available. The top floor Is E r p, is practicaiiy placed on a level with the basement, giving, in-.B st B jt i ~ e creased storagé capacity. élimina- - e -.B it B e É é \u003e ~ting wear and tear on gooda, and, saving time in cbecking ,andW l - shipping. In ITe World Just stop a moment and consider-- what this means 1 An Otis-Fensom Freight Elevator can be bougbt for as little as $70.00, while the prevailing low rates for electricity now make an 4 k eiectric elevator possible to those CA A A CYCLE who prefer tg use pwer.M TO CO, td ':~iiiiilUI{ WEST TORONTO ELE.VATORS SLER. Our free bookiet \"Freight Eleva- a tors and Their Uses,\" will tell you ll bou anelevator intend- edaeîfcly to meet the re- Tc quirements of YOUR business.\u0026TO~ Write for it to-dayl Don't putit' off until another time aiimpy filin this coupon and mail NOW, whîle the though is fresh in Your mid. OTIS-FEN*SOM ELEVATOR GO., \u003eLIMITED 50 BAY STREET, TORONTO. COUPON Send me your*,DooketA*'...,QnFreight Elevators. Naine.........,..,.............. -.......... ...................... ......... ...... Addresa ........... - . ...................... ................... ............... __________________________________M_ \" y k.ingdom for a horse,' CANADIAN PACIFIC ATLANITIC FLEET PACIFIC FLEET- HO\u003cTEL SYSTEN FAST TRAINS FR\u003c*g COAST TO COAST ARE AT YOUR SERVICE Tho.. esst.aplatint a trip of any nature may receive fuR pas'. isulas ad literature froni any C.P.R. Ticket Agent. or write M. G. MURPHY, District Passenge Agent TORONTO",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. Cosgyraves Mild (Chili-proof) Pale .Aie The beer whÎch proves its quai- ity for îtself. BrewerY bottled only and sold Z at ail good hoteis and deaiers. Famnous for haif 90(v a century. Theq ONLY 94-O Chili-proof Boer The Canadian C our ie r A National Weekly Published ai 12 Wellington SI. Eaist, by the Courier Press, Limiied VO.X.TORONTO NO. 22 CONT ENTS Among Broadway Playhouses ........By Fred Jacob. The Living Wage ........ ....... , By W. W. SwansoU. The Irishi Situation, Cartoon .........By N. McOonnell. The Senator's Horse Trade, Story .... By Olement Bancroft. The War, \"Short of War\" ....... ..By James Johnston. \"When Ghost Meets Ghost\" .........By the Monocle Man. Water Gardens................... By B. T. Cook. Utilize the Back Yard .............By Hugh S. Bayrs. News of a Week.................. Recent Photograplis. WOMAN 'S SUPPLEVENT. \"Erin\" contributes an appreciation of the recently puh1irshed volume of verse, by Virna Sheard, the Cana- dian author and poet; \"The Lady of Shalott\" resumes lier department, \"The Mirror and the Webb,\" and writes brightly on sundry timely topics; \"The Down- Town Girls' Noon Hlour\" is the titie of a practical article by Edith Lang, a trained economist, who ie furnishing a series on \"Women in Industrial Life.\" \"A Canadianized Babylon.\" is an illustrated feature, showing the spring fashion pageant in New York City. \"A Pair Lecturer fromn Queen 's,\"t and \" An Interpreter of Brahms,\" nuinerous pictures and items of news complete an especially attractive fortnigit 's output. Demi-Tasse ........................By Staff Writers. Money and Magnts..............By the Financîi Editor. His Place in the World, Serial ....... By Mns. Bilsborough. Reflections .........................By the Editor. -a warm, substantial home of handsome design. These are points that every thoughtful home-builder in- sists upon-if you build by the Sovereign system youl w111 get them, ail, at a saving of z/3. becii- cat Portable MO10MES -are designed by master architects. AIl inaterial for their construction is accu- rately eut, fltted, bundled and ready for erection. The best lumber, hardware, paints and other materials, are ail sup- plied at manufacturers' prices. Very little and very inex- pensive labor is required for erecting them. WEM ARE SPUCIAIISTS IN 1{OMe-BUITLDIN(b Our FREE, bookiet No. E showing loo beautiful Sovereign Homnes explains the Sovereign system fully-write for Ît to-day. ib SOVEREIGN CONSTRUCTION CO-- LIMITED 1317 C.P.R. Bldg., Toronto. Let me talk to you about Anaemia ZOur blood îs composed of red andwht N or pusc es-the red to nourîsh the body, the white to fight disease. In Anaemia, the red corpuscles are more or less deficient. Thus the blood cannot properly sustain and nourish the body. The eyes become duli, the face white, and a feeling of intense weariness pervades the whole system. There is nothing so effective in AnSrmia as 'Wincar-nis.' - Because ' Wincarnis' floods the body with new, rich, red blood, which gives a sparkle to the eyes, brings the roses into the cbeeks, and gives new vigour, new vitality and new life to the whole body. Will you try it ? Begin te get well FREIE -. Send for a liberal free trial bottle of E Wincarnis.' Enclose six cents stamps for postage. COLEMAN~ \u0026 Co.. Ltd., Wincarnis Works, Norwich, England. You can obtain regular supplies from ail leaoi Stores Chemists, a-i, Wine Merchants. r ver1,000 DoctorsJ inic\u003en of Canada: Mr. Frank S. Ball, 101 La!. 'Phone No., Main 3079. Tolegranis,",
         "CANADIAN- COURIER. 011 CQk-St0V No fires to kinde-no wood or coal tu muas wîth. Just touch a match to the wick-then you have all the heat you want, when you want it Lessens the labor ini the kitchen. 1, 2Z 3 and 4 humer sites, and a new stove with Fireless Cooking Oven. Ail hardware and generai stores. Ua. Rovalite Oi for Sat Reaultât OIL THE IMPERIAL OIL CO., Limited OIL Toronto Montreal Winnipeg Vancouver Ottawa Quebec Calgary Edmonton Halifax St. John Regina Saskatoon '10117t.9 IN ANSWERING ADVERTISEMENTS ME\\TION \"TIIE (:AN-,ýDIAN COURIER.- *imiituuuuuuiiiuuuuimauginnnguinuiuuhiiiiniuiuoehiunnuiiiiiiinini~n In Lighter Vein \"The Most Unkindest Cut.\"ý- Cholly-'Wben I was a. boy, you know, the doctor.said if I dldn't stop smoking cigarettes I would become feeble-minded.\" Miss Keen-\"WelI, why didn't you stop ?\"-Boston Transcript. A Matter of Sclection.-\"Doesn't it give you a terrible feeling wben you run over a man?\" they asked him. \"«Well, if he's a large man,\" replied the automobiiist, \"it does give one a pretty rough jolt.\"ý-Ladies' Home Journal. A Mînd ln the Balance.-\"Is your client going to plead insanlty?\" I haven't declded,\" repied the lawyer. \"'He wants to look the ground over and ses whioh is the easlest to escape from, the prison or the asylum.\"- Birmingham Age-Herald. No Timne for Trrifles.-\"Gent up- town telephones for an officer at once. Burgiar la the bouse.\" *'Let me see,\" said the captain, re- flectively. \"I've got four men censor- ing plays, two inspecting the gowns at a society function, and 'two more supervising a tango tea. Tell hlm I can send him. an officer in about two hoDurs.\"-Kan-sas City Journal. The Reaeon Why.-Teacher\u003e of Hy- giene---\"Why must we always be care- fui to keep our rooms dlean and neat?\" Little Gir1-\"Because com- pany may walk in at any moment.\"- The Weekiy Scotsman. A Question of Grit.-Officer- \"What's the matter witb that soup you're turnlng up your nose at?\" PrIvate.....It's full of sand and grit, I sir.\" Officer-'JNow look bere, my man, dld you come to camp to grum- ble or to serve your country?\" Pri- vate-\"Weli, I dld comne to serve my country, sir; but not to eat 1t.\"ý- Brooklyn Bagle. A Paradox.-\"What's the matter wltb your wlfe ?\" '\"She ban fretted herseif Into a sick headache over her paper fur the 'Don't Worry' Club.\"- BaltImore American. Faulty Premises.-The Vicar- \"Why don't you comb your hair be- fore coming to achool?\" The Boy- \"Haven't got no comb, sir.\" The Vicar-'wWby dont you use your father's comb ?\" The Boy-\"Father basn't got no comb, sir.\" The Vicar --\"Wel, how doe your father Icomb bis hair, then?\" The Boy-'Tather hasn't got no hair.\"I-Sketch. Song Againat Grocers. GOD made the wicked grocer For a mystery and a aigu, Tbat man mlgbt sbun the awful shops And go to mase to dine,' Where the bacon's on tbe rafter And the wlne In the wood, And God 'that made good laugbter Has seen that It In good. HIls propa are not bis cbIldren, But pert lads underpaid, Who cali out \"Casb\" and bang about To work bis wIcked trade. Ho keeps a lady ln a cage Most crueily ail day, And makes ber count and cals ber Until she fades away. The rlghteous mInd of Innkeepers Induce them now and then To crack a bottle wlth a friend, Or treat unmoneyed men. But who bath seen the grocer Treat bousemaids to bis teas, Or crack a bottie of lsh sauce, Or stand a man to a eheese. ~Gilbert K. ýChesterton, In The Fiy- lng Inn. Canadian Northern Steamships LIMITED R.M.S. Rayal Edward RAMS. Royal Georgeà Next Sailing from Montreal, Que., May 5th. I the modern interlor finish. It a produces the soft beautiful effects ié sought by artistic decorators, and is admirabiy adapted to stencan and free-hand decoration. I Mellotone is wasliable, absoiutcly fadeless, and does flot easily scrtc or mnar. You will be delighted with I Mellotone. Send for color carda. Aik your local \"lligh Standard\" déaler-agent to give you paint i- f #omation and color combinationa * E= for exterîors, interior wafls, floors, * M woodwork, etc. Also get these M Valuahi. Books -Froe Hav the buitlookdng buinzsn rour neiîgh- M \u0026wh.d-our bookiets wili teil yon ow- *1esAttractive Prorn Gate to CarwtS *and -Meilotone Ecur Watts.\"l sont free ta M teaders of tii magazine. H le Write today. Also let as 2 help you with your egokim LOWE BROS. Sorarea AVe.u TORONTO, CAMA Sade for Simplicity It distributes the heat evenly and steadiiy from every legister. Extrnets and uses the greatest quantity of heat from the fuel used. Spe- cially construeted eup jointsi absolutely prevent dust getting into the bouse. Lasts a life- timne with a inimirum of re- pairs. The easiest to bandie and the cheapest to use. ,,pays/for itself Iby Mhe CbaZ ii laves\" PEASE FOUNOftY COMPANY -LgmITuo 11 TORONTO 125 Cabins de Luxe - Suites and Rooms With Prtpate Bats, ai Raies Tisai AppeaL. For àl information appiy to Steamshi Agents or 52 Kins Steet Eat Toronto, Ontaro; 226 St. James Street Mont- \"oa. Quebec; 583 Main Street Winnipeg, Manitoba.* iIHave beautiful wallal _ you can wash IYou will neyer.use paper or = calcimines for \"decorating\" Iyour walls and ceilings after you Jearn the exceptional * beautifying possibilities and HIecononiical advantages of",
         "May 2, 1914 No. 22 Among the Broadway Playhouses Impressions of the Wanîng Season and the Trend of the A merican Stage T-E plays that New York approves this season, Canada will ses next year. That Is still the rule of theo theatre in this country, evea though efforts are being made to bring other Influences Into our pînyhouso.s. British companies are making all-Canadian tours, giving a tore-taste of the day whon wo wihl not be absolutely dependent upon the United States for our dramatic tare, wbile some of the mon most intixnately iuterestedl ln this great art are preachlng the noed et repertoire theatres te. foster the spirit that seuld ultimately lead to the toundation. et anational theatre. But while thesA move- mente areý stilli ln their infancy, a -v'ist to Broadway during t'le, days, of the waning theatrical season wil give an Idea ot the forces that -have been loosed by the mana- gers during the present wintor to affect our theatres \"for several months to corne. During the past few years a great deal bas been told us by people coming tr om Europe of the changes that the teachinge of Professer Max Peinbardt and Gordon Cralg are making ln the art et produclng. While whole book would not'serve to give a com- plote idea et their theories, it may be stated, briefly that they stand for more simpliclty and a new fora ef naturalness, ln staging. They want to do away with the present system of highting, with the glare comlng trom the footlights and othor traditional places. TbOy argue that an effort ebould be made to have the llgbts ts.ll as tbey do la reaity, making even the sbadeows appear natural. The reformera aise want te banieb the unnecessary detale ef the scenery, claiming that the more'you patat pletures on the walls to suggest surroundinga, the more you do away witb Illusion. So tbey advocate flat backgrounIds, lett unadorned as much as possible, but relieved by the use of draperies and more simple painting tbat will stimulate the Imagination and appeal to the soase of the beautiful. The visiter te, New York boobs la vain for disciples of the new soboole, but thero la one production in which the ideas have been adapted, commercahized, 50111e migbt sa.y, witb very striking results. \"A Tbousand Years Âge\" takes n place among the meut interestIng pînys of the yoar, for It le eut etf the ordinary in every particular. Perey Ma)cl\u003caye, the one Amxericai dramatiet who nover fergets that hle i a literary man, wrote the plaY and took fer bis plot the old tale et Turandet, the Chinese Princese, wbo set bier loyers three riddlos and cnet them jute a dungeon if tbey tailed te guese the answers. into the Chînese background, Mr, Mackaye bas Introduced Scaramouche, Pua- chinele, Pantaloon and Hlarlequin, wlth Capoceflico thelr leader, whe have been ex- pelledl frem Europe becaus1e of the deatb e! The r the age ot romance. Hew Capocomico be- pe came enmperor for a day and bow hoe belped fled th a noble prince te win the band et Turandot miake a divertiuig tale, especially wlth Henry Fi. Dlxey as the chiot ef the merry felIowa, lu wblcb rele hoe acta wlth an unction and a rlcb humour that -v . vounz comedian et recent famne might envy. By FRED JACOB and colours. Scarcely anytbing le done la the con. ventional. manner. When Turandot dreame, the figures ef bier vislon move hike silhouettes againet the sky-line, without Meature or detail, only torm and voice. The conception contaIned real beauty. Yet there are moments that would horrify the tollowers LAURETTE TAYLOR, eignilng daring of New York theatre audiences. Over fIve hi rances In her rots et Peg in \"dpeg 01 My Heart\"O have flot e. public demand, and the Gort Theatre continues to hold a houae at every performance. of Gordon Cralg, sncb al$ tbe o Wheon the bated spot-ligbt talle upon the sleeping Chiasse Prince, but thon it muet bo rememberod that the producors ef \"A Tbeusand Yeara Âge\" are net pretending te tellow the new theerlos la their entlrety. They only avalled themeelves et snob ldeas as auited tbem, but these have beon utibized la making a aoveity that posseeses the outstanding merit et beillg differeut from anytbing else te hoe seen on the American stage at the present time. Thero la an Impression abroad ln Canada that the distinctive tenture et the present seasoil la New York bas been the success et the muek dramea. The vogue et this peculiar tenu ef play started about a year ago, wbon people feocked te ses a UIttle orie-aot thriller entitled \"Any Niglit,\" wbicll was supposed to give a \"stark and unafraid\" picture of lite In the depths. Other dramatists saw the possIbilities of the thome, and there came a rush of long plays con- taInlng brothel scenes. \"The Lure\" and \"The Attack\" were the most notorlous of these efforts, but they disappeared from Broadway months ago, and the only play of the type to achieve an ail Beason run was \"To-day.\" W ITIH Rev. John Cobura and other reformers watching the border, it la not probable that \"To-day\" will over sneak across into Canada, at least net in the East. A Canadian In New York wlll con- sequently find curiosity a strong force draw- ing him to the theatre where the little drama le running. When the last curtain goes down upon the play, hoe will be wondoring how stupld the others must have been If tbey could nlot rua as long as \"To-day.\" It takes three long acte Ia \"To-day\" to lend up to one short, sharp shock. One act is required to show that Young Wife la very gay and frivolous, while Young Husbnnd has to work bard to make the money that she requires. Young Husband wenrs sncb a grim expression when hoe makes bis frest appearance that everyone knows ho ie about to f ail. Atter proloaging the suspense until it threatens to last inte the second net, he tells the famlly, which Includes hia mether and father, and Young Wife ozes the oppor- tunity to prove herseif calleus and selfisb by mourning over the loss of ber 3oWelz. Two acte follow la a flat that la unneces- sarlly bare and comfortless, with, everybody working except Young Wife; wbo, spends ber Urne complainlng. Enter the temptreae. There are desorte of talk durlng whleh se InsInuates that she knows a lady who caa lntroduce Young Wlfe to, rIch gentlemen. Later Young Wlfe appears wearing gorgeous clothes and a deflant expression, and every- body In the audience and on the stage, wltb the exception of the husband, growe sus- picious. Tho big scenie cornes at lnst. Young Husband has to colleot the reut of the \"'Madam\"' and hoe fInds bis wife's picture ln bier parlour. Even a denser man would bave guessed thon where bier fine clothee wero coming from. Ho arranges a meeting witb is wifo and the \"Madam\" sonde for bier.' Young Wlfe entera tbe room, wbere ho awaits ber eager to avenge bis bonour. \"*You will net kIli me,\" she cries. But bier firstguess was wrong and she got no second one. She rushes Into the bay window at the back of the stage, and waving curtalas, a single scream and a moan tell what hoe hie dons. The murder supplies the one tbril of borror beforo the curtain falla. Llndred ~-A'\" la supposed to be reallsm, but sati- jne one could posaIbly fel that It wuS 'moud\"unveiling actual conditions. In the firet place, the characters did nlot leave the Impression of being mon and women sncb as may be met anywhere ln actual lte, and that belng the case there could bardly be mucb conviction ln the Incidente. Soarchers for renllsmi muet bave been disappointed evoni ln the endIng. To pereons who bave nover sooný a busband choke, hie wif e, the heavy curtains waving 80 omiuuly seomed to be bbocking ont the one sceno that migbt have been a revelatIon of domestic relations. If \"To-day\"'may be takon s an exemple, there ba been a groat deal of unnecessary fua about the brothel plays. Tbey can bardly be ealled immoral, that is, If an Immoral play le one calculated te bave an lujurious moral,' effeot upon the pbilosophy or con- duet et the person seoing it. One can hiardly imagine Vol. XV.",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. \"To-day\" maktng an impression even upon the weakest of mtnds. The taste of a persan wbo would eajoy It migbt be morbid and unhealthy, but those who see it merely out of curiasity, and they are prab- ably the majorlty of the patrons, will not regret any- tblng except the tume wasted. Altbough the play serves no good purpase on the stage, it la hàrdly llkely to pervert any marais that are nlot already tbaroughly unsettlad. Indeed, the most immoral tlxing about It is the assumptian that the women of to-day, wltb the possible exception of the suffragettes, who are nat mentianed, have been allowed to go un- develaped ln their minds until tbey are willing ta sail their bodies for a few luxurles. Every few years ln theatrical bistory, somes ex- traordinary type of entertatnmant bacomes popular. It la like a bail on the face o! the drama, and will pass away naturally witbaut laavlng aay Injurious affects If the sufferer watts patientiy'and rofrains froin irritatIng It. The brothel plays are a phono- manon of this sort. Rav'ng about tbem will nat da any gaod, but la anather yaar ar sa. dramas of the saine type wtll flot draw waIl enougb to pay for the laading lady's bairpIns. Befara vary long, they are golng ta be fargottea as campletely as the Salomne dances, and in the meantime, Canadians are flot misslng very -much If the productions fati te cross the border. IT Io folly ta assert, as so many, writers do, that the presonce of \"To-day\" among the successas o! the yaar IndIcates a dectdodly vicious tendency la the taste af thaatre-gaers. That Impression bas gane abroad, although tacts do nat warrant it, for thora have neyer been mare dlean and wholesomo ploa enjoylng large patronage la New York than. at the presant time. Indead,,the general air af the thoatras ls choery and sweet rather than sardld and murky. Ona bas anly ta visit a !ew o! the camadlas naw an the list of hits la order ta realiza that the publlty givea ta the brathel plays has, mlsrepresented the prasent tendency af tha American stage. \"Grumpy,\" la whtch CyrIl Maude bas bean drawing crawds ta a very out-at-the-way theatre for many menths, may be classed as a comady, even though it paissasses a thrilling plot of crime and detection. Grumpy, the aid criminel lawyar who proves la a orisls that bis brain has not grawn aId with bis body, ls a very humouraus character study, which bas carrIed the play ta Its'great succeas. Nathing cauld be clonner and smarter than \"Tao Many Caaks,\" the first effort of Frank Craven, the Young actar-dramatIst. It tells a very simple story o! the building of a hause by a Youag couple about ta be married, and shows haw lnterfering relatives aearly spoil thelr happiness. Mr. Crayon bas îll the treshness and observation of George M. Caban, with a great deal mare refinemeat than the author of 'Tarty-fiva Minutes tram Broadway\" bas ever shawn. Witb only ana play ta bis credit, it ts nat passible ta taretaîl Mr. Craven's future, but if ha develaps aloag the saine lines as \"Tao Many Caoks,\" hae may became the autstandiag writer af camedias af American life. Evan if bis first comedy connot be calied a big achievement, it centaine an unusual amount of human nature, furaishes rafresbing on- tertaiameat and gives promise of botter tbings ta cames. \"Kitty Mackay\" ls drawlng crowds to the -saine theatra ta whicb \"B1unty ]Pulls tbe Strings\" made is great bit. The aew comedy of Scotch ilfe ls by no mens another \"Bunty.~ Sanie of its wit doas not sound as though it really belanged ta the laad of the heather, but it centains la Mag Duncan, played by a very claver Young actress, Maigaret Nyblac, a charactor of a canny lassie with a dry sease of humour who wauld carry aven a play of lesa menlt ta popuiarlty. .A rural comedy of Ille ta Maine Is \"Along Came Ruth.\"' It tells. a pleasant tala af haw a girl witb advaaced business Ideas wakened np a quiet aid town, and the flavaur that bas made the play popular cames fram the maay broadly drawn character typas that It centaine. There ara haîf a dazan ather entertainiag and wholosome dramnas that might be manttoned, but* thase ara enough to furnisb a reply ta anyana who asserts that the Amerîcan thoatra caters cbiefiy ta depravad tastes at the prasent time. Whla i the most papular star Ia New York? Ia the light of recent theatrical history, tha ana answer must be \"Miss Laurette Taylor.\" She won tbat posi- tion after showlng bier abiity la savoral parts, and ber popularity came ta Its hetgbt wbea sha appaarad ln \"Tbe Bird af Paradisa.\" Those who ware for- tunata eaaugb ta sea bier ln that part will not -soon torget the rarely moving quality af ber acting. Thea tallowed \"Peg 0' My Heart,\" Ia wbIch, sha acbiaved stardani. Mtss Taylor ts aat oaa o! thosa stars who ara con- tant ta rest ber wbola success upon a pleastng par- sonalîty. Sha prefers to be fIrst of ail an actress. Whan she cames upon the stage, lt is not Mtss Taylar wltb a brogue or Miss Taylor with an olive com- plexion, called by differeat names ta fit the play. la every rale she attempts ta coavey a clearly deflned character drawa without aay tbought of bier own best trlcks. It mlgbt be sald that bier brie! stage experience, that reachad Its climax In the phenomenal rua of \"Peg,\" can scarcely have given anyone a chance to credit ber with versattlity, but Miss Taylor recognized for hersai! the danger of becomlag toa closely tdeatified with the charactor of the Irish girl. Early la Marcb sha startad a sertes of spaclal matinees, presenttng a group of ane-act plays by hier husbaad, J. Hartley Manners, and theso matineas have servad as an indication of ber versatility and bier papularity. Everyoae knows that special mattaees are as a rule abomiaated by theatra-goars, and the crowded houses that greet Miss Taylor at eacb o! theni indicata ber hold on the affections af the Broadway public. IT la mare Important, however, that thay sbould have given Miss Taylor a chance ta show bar powers as an actress. Ia \"Just as Weil,\" sha is a spoiled child of the Eaglisb uppar classes, a yauing lady witb all the affections o! the bachelor girl la saclety. The second pînylet bears the titla \"'Happi- aess,\" and In lt Miss Taylor appears as a young.gtrl working la a New York mllilnery establishmaat. This raie passasses ahl the teaderaass that givas sucb cbarm ta tbe comedy o! the actrass, and oae a! the rumeurs o! Broadway at the preseat ime bas it that Mr. Mannars will buuld the playlet Up Into a thrae-act drama for bis wlfe. The matinea closes with \"Dupas,\" ta whicb the chie! part us that a! a courtasan, who, havlag suddenly inbarited a fortune, treats alI ber dlscarded admirea ta a tirade agaînat the Ironies o! llfe. Ia the last place, Miss Taylor can, hardly rîse ta the chie! demands o! character, whlle baer capabilities do not find scopa, but la the othars shie ls Inimitable. As a camedlenna, she bas sama- thing o! pathos ta ber acting that adds zest ta ber funa. She nover strains a point ta get a laugh, but sha dose make overybady smile and love bar. It ls unusual for a comadlanne to possess such wtst!ul eyes, and Miss Taylor muet tbank nature for theni, but ber brains have beon the btggast factor ln bar success la New York. Miss Laurette Taylor ls ana a! the very !ew Youag stars for whom It ls passible ta pradîct a notable career on the stage. Living W a ge A Simple Study in Economics, of Great Interest Both to Labour and Capital IN the midst o! prasant discussion and argument as ta who ls respansibla for the hlgh cost of living, tbe taterests a! the workiagman are apt ta be ovonlaaked. Altbaugh the worktngman comprise the bulk of the population a! Canada they bave had no adequate voice bitherta ta the manage- ment o! the affairs o! the nation. And yet it la sale ta say tbat the true prasperity o! a people ls te ba gauged rathar by the economie position of the average citizen than by the weaitb and power o! any particuiar clase. At presant a maievoient attempt ls beingl made by certain domagagues ta stîr up atrife betwean the manufacturea and the tanmers a! thus country. la the long run, hawavar much evIl may be wrougbt by pursuing thia policy, It wMi be abundantly proved tbat only by mutual sympathy and co-operatian betweaa the various classas o! producana can true prasparity be acbieved. It Is evidant ta ail those who taka mare than a suporficial view a! pra- sent conditions that the Manufacturer, the marchant and the farner must combine ta secure permanent prosparity. But sucb au' undarstanding must Include aise a prapar conslderation o! the weifare et the working classes. Most Canadians, Irraspectiva ef party polltics, are canvincad that the industries ot this nation sbauld be protected; and the conviction la aIse growlng that such protection sbould Include a due consideratian o! the intarasta o! tbe working- man'. Ia brie!, it la batnig forcad home with cumula- tive farce tbat the nation, if it i. ta achiave trua pro- gress and prospanity, must guarantea te 'the worker a living wage. However trite the problani e! the btgb cost a! living bas become ta some a! us, It yet romains a mattar et surpassing importance te the average worken. Na more vital blow ceuid b. struck agalnst Canada's national lita thon te permit the standard o! living, ta which Canadians have risen after years et Intense offert and sacrifice, ta par- manently fail. We need not apelogize, thenefare, ln once mare raislng the question o! the cost of lving la the fonni o! a living wage. ACLEAR undenstanding ot wbat the standard of PIling ta permuta sanie appreclation et Its sig- nificance. la the first place, unleus the standard Includas adequate food, clatblng and sheiter, bealtb will ievitably suifer, and the race will de- ganerate pbyslcaliy. If, on the ether band, men obtain a propen satisfaction ot these tundamental wats a foundatien will be laid, net only for good By W, W. SWANSON Department of Political and Economie Science, Queen'a UniVontity health, but fer Intellectuel prograsa. Moreaver, un- lasa a decent standard o! living can b. maIatalned, the future of the nation will ba meaaced tramn another quarter. la an effort ta maltaat the cuatemary statua, parents wiil sacrifice familles and will choose ta bava fawer hbldran, for wbom they can properly provîde, rather than risk loaiag their position by, rearing a langer tamily. Ta make up the deflieacy la the native population we shall bave ta depend upon Immigration tramn abroad. Haro thora ta a rai danger that the bamogeaatty o! the- race wili ba de- stroyed by the Influx of people allen la birth, la out- look and In national Ideala, Wa muet insist, tao, upan a decent standard o! wagea betng maintaiaed, because la mast cases taIr wages bave meant the gratification o! the intellectuel and artistic sense o! tihe warkena; have meant bookb and pictures; have meant a tew extra mooms la the bouse, and mare decent surroundings generally; bave meant a tew years' extra scbooling for the cbildren; have meant, finally, a general upliftlag o! the wbole, worklng cîas It la 1dle ta expect, for exemple, that tbe taste e! the Canadian people for music, for litera- tura and for art, can ha Improved If the wonkens are overwbelmad by tbe battia o! providing for thepi- salves and thain familles. M UCHl bas been sald o! tbe extravagance et the workiag classes and a! thair wastetui methoda o! laying out their Income. But It muet not ha forgatten that they buy everything at retail anxd are, thenefare, greatly bandIcapped ta secuning full value tan thain monay. Take, ton example, the matter o! renta. The following table shows that the renta changed te the paon are exonbttantly higb la cansideration bath et the resources 0f the people and o! the worth of tbe rentad pnopenty. It la genenaliy admttted tbat 10 per cent. is a tain ratura upon the full value o! prapenty ton a yean; yat the firat bouge on the list ylalds Its ownen 24 pan cent. The figures la tbls table were obtatned by Dr. Formai', for the city e! Washington, but they are net unnepresenta- tive et olties et similar size la Canada and, the United States: Mantbly Rents Actually Paid by Flfteen Familles Comparod wtb Re6nts Necessary te Secure a Tan Par Cent. Raturaf on Full Valua o! Praparty. Family Market Valua Reat Rant îcxcess Praperty. Value. Paid. Paid. No. 1 ...$420 $3.50 $8.50 $5.00 No. 2--------30 2.75 5.00 2.25 No. 3 ........360 3.00 7.00 4.00 Na. 4 ........390 3.25 5.00 1.75 No. 5 ........600 5.00 6.00 1.00 No. 6------- 1,284 10.70 12.50 1.80 Na. 7-------300 2.50 5.00 2.50 No. 8 ........357 2.98 4.00 1.02 No. 9 ........900 7.50 8.50 1.00 No. 10 ........600 5.00 7.30 2.30 No. Il........375 3.13 5.00 1.87 NO. 12r... 900 7.50 7.50 nana No. 13--------750 6.25 9.00 2.75 No. 14....... 1,500 12.50 14.00 1.50 No. 15 ...... .650 5.42 .10.00 4.58 Anather source o! Ibas ta the average wonktng- man's !amlly Is taund un the ratail purcbaslng et supplies.. The houaewî!e kaowa what goad bargains are, but otteatîmes the moniey at hand prevants ban tramn purcbasing goada axcept la small quantities. She may buy at the grocery store a single bar o! soap tor five cents, knowlng very woll that she could get sIx bars for a quarter and thus save live cents; but t! s0 much la spent for soap thora will nat be enough loft for food. The saine bolds truie ln the buyiag o! patatoas by the peck or by tha bag. A can o! vegatables may be bought for tan cents, and tbrae cana ton twanty-flve cents. The bausewlta knaws perfectly well that for every fIva cana pur- cbaaed alngly thora ta a dlean lasa! ar ne can; and the sane may ha sald o! the wbola grocery liat, et butter, siugar, coife, sait, etc. TakIng ail these tacts ltat coasideratlan, it la tain to conclude that the average werkinginan's tamllY lases ton par cent. by. reason a! bad bargains la paylng rant and meeting living expenses. If, theretore, we wlsh ta fanm a just conception~ o! wbat a man la earnIng we muet subtract tramn his nominal aruingî3 ta. ona-tanth whicb ho loses because o! tbe conditions undar wbich hae livea. Add ta this the upkeep, rapaîr and depreciation e! furaltune. The wonking classes buy bauaehold goada, as a mIle, on the Instalment plan. A dollar or more may ba lest ta this way la buylng a blan*et, two or tbree dollars on a rug, and t.wenty A",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. or thirty dollars on a sowing machine. But bad as this le !rom an econemlc standpolnt, it Is werse frem r' a moral standpelnt. Te ho always In debt for somo- tbing is net wholesome; neithor Is it elevating te feel that one doos net own aIl the furniture In the bouse, and that, unless payments are made premptly, the goods wlll be forfeitod and ail that bas been paid fer tbem utterly lest. T HIS Is a more hasty sketch e! actual conditions, but it Is Impossible te estimate what le a living wage witheut koeping these facts In mind. Mr. Gompers lias defined a living wage as \"a wage which, when expended in the most economical manner, shal be sufficient te maintain tbe average sized famlly In a manner consistent with whatevor the local con- tomporary civilization recognizes as Indispensable te physical and mental health, or, as being roquIrod by the rational self-respect of buman belngs.- But it Is an undeniable fact that the 11mest oconemical\" ex- pendititre cannot ho expected e! the bousewlfe la the typIcal Industrial !amily. To spend most ecen- omically requiros far more knowlodge than le pos- sessed, by the average woman. It sheuld ho borne in mmnd, moreover, that tbe \"rational self-respect of human beinge\" would require the saving of enough te previde fer an indepondent old ago. Unless the living wage Is paid te ail mon, the married mon, wbo most need regular work, will be at a disadvantage In competing wîtb single mon fer employmeflt. Therefere, the living wage should ho the minimum wage fer ail adult males. Sucli a minimum lias heen variously estimated. John Mit- chell bas fixed It at six bundred dollars fer cities e! less than 100,000 population. A preminent officiaI la one of the largest charitios of New York thInke that $2 a day or about $624 a year Is necessary for a family of five la that city. It ,ças a surprise te many when the committeeo0f the New York State Cenferenco o! Charities and Corrections docided that $825 was a necessary Incoe te allow a family of fivo te maIntain a fairly proper standard e! living la New York City. If that bo true, probahly $700 weuld ho a minimum wage la such citios as Montreal, Toronto, Winnipeg and Vancouver, for a famlly o! five. This sum would merely suffice te maintain physIcal and mental efficiency. The fellewing figures indicate in a genoral way the minimum expondîture o! a working class family e! five, In an average Cana- dian clty, althougli the exponditures would probably bo much higber In cities o! over 100,000 population: Minimum Cost o! Living for One Year In Average Canadian City for Family of Five. Rent.................. ........... $120 00 Fuel, 5 tons coal .......................... 35 00 One cord wood........................... 5 00 Food, grocerios.......................... 168 00 Milk, one quart per day at 8 cents ........... 29 20 Vegetablos............................... 24 00 Meat and fish ............................ 96 00 Clotbîng ................................ 140 00 Church and other organizations ............ 20 00 Pleasure................................. 20 00 Doctor.................................. 12 00 Miscellaneous............................ 40 00 Total............................. $709 20 Surely this Is net a high estimate for a living wage. yet the average Income of a working family will range frem $500 to $600 per yoar. T O return to the position from wbich we started: In present political and oconomlc discussion the welfare of the average Canadian Is net ado- quately considered. If we are te build up a great Canadian nation the interests o! every class and of every individual In each class must be regarded. It is time te drop petty party quarrels ever acadeie questions and mako a survey, nation-wlde In Its scope, of the social and economic conditions of oach class in the community. Wben that Is done It will be realized that sympathy, mutual confidence, and co-eperation between ahl the classes ahone wlll mako for permanent progross and prosperity. Lot the manufacturer, the merchant and the farmer bo ado- quately protected so that oach class shahl receivo a fair reward on its Industry, but lot It net ho eover- looked that the economic status of the worklngman is equally Important; for the true touchstone of a nation's progress lis found in the peace, contontmont and happinoss of oach humble borne. Another Clark Bon Mot Tr HEY were talking In Numnber Sixteon about Chateauguay and the Liberal charges o! cor- ruption, in with which it Is the playful party habit always to couple the name of the Hon. Bob Rogers. He Is the arch villain of the piece as staged at Ottawa by the Opposition. \"Rogers wasn't thore at ail,\" said one of the mem- bers in the group talking over the bye-electlon of Morris in Chateauguay. \"He had nothing to do with it.\" \"No,\" said Col. Hugli Clark earnestly. \"And another thing! Ho had nothing to do with the Kîn- rade murder. Ho wasn't there at all; lie was la Manitoba.\" Never a smille broke the sad expression on the face of the member for North Bruce. An Honest Mistake M ANY mon make honest mistakos. A promin- ent business man In Toronto toulsof one ho made. He got on a street car and asked the conductor for a dollar's worth o! tickets, and gave hlm a bill to change. The conductor gave him a dollar in silver. \"What is this for?\" asked the passonger. \"That b your change. You gave me a two-dollar \"You can't put that over, young man, 1 gave you a five-dollar 1\u003e111. Thon the dispute began. The business man ex- plained that ho knew It was a fIve-dollar 'ill, be- cause ho bad carried it for two or three days, and had no other. The conductor protested that It was a two-dollar bill, land produced Just sucli a bill. Fln- ally, the now wrathy passenger tcok the conductor' number and promised to report the matter. That niglit when ho got home, ho told bis family at the dinner-table how lie had been swIndled out of three dollars by a rascally conductor, and ex- plained how -certain ho was under the eircumstances. His son listened to, the story until lt was finishod and thon ho remarked: \"Father, do you remember my going to you yos- ,terday and tolling you that I wanted a pair o! boots? I told you 1 had only two dollars and could flot get what I wantod for that amount. So you gave me a five-dollar bill and I gave you the two-deilar 'bill.\" The cocksuroness ýfaded out of tho business man's face, and next day ho visited the complaint office ef 'the street rallway and duly made a humble apology to one of the inspectors, asking hlm to explain to -the conductor.",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. The Senator' s Horse Trade Invol-ving a Wilkes Mare that Was Not Guaranteed to \"îStand W ilho ut Hitching \" but Certaini» Cou id Pass HON.- ROBERT BEATON st on is verandai, smoking an after-dlnner cigar. HMs stock farm stretclied before liim, down te the beautiful river. Ho was a bittle, leatbery old bacbelr-ýa geed deal of the David Harum type, and of the same rugged lionesty and firmness of purpos3e;,qualities wliicl liad landed lim first in thie House 0f Commonse and afterwards ln tbat hayon of refuge, théo Sonate, wbere tbey \"seldomt die snd neyer resiglL\"1 Wle lie was surveying thie landscape peacefully, lie was aroused by the volceo0f bis twin sister, Ruth, wlio was evldently in conversation witli some visitera. Ruthi and lie-had llved together ln thie old liomestead for nearly fifty years, and by Young and eld sbe, was revered as mucli asber pelitical brotlier. \"Cerne rIglit abong, gentlemen,\" lie beard lier say; \"Bob, is out on -the verandali.\" Tlie'screen deor opened and tliree gentlemen ap- peared.ý The Senator arose and greeted tbem. \" IHello, dèacen. H-ow'dy, Jlm,; good-day, dector. Wliat's tbis; a delegation of thie Metliodist Board?\" \"ýIWe11l, net exactly, Senator,\" replied Deacon Has- kins, a taîl, angubar man, clieerily; \"abtliougb. It's sàometbing like It.\" Tbey took seats and tlie deacon w ent on: \"'Senator, we're a sfub-cormittee of tlie churcli board. We've been commlssioned te purcliaso a liorse for our new paster, and we've cerne to you for advice.\" 1 Senator Boaton was a borseman witb a national reputation. For many years lie baad been one of the jiudges' at the New Yorkc Herse Shiow, wbere lie rubbed elbows witb the rnultl-millionaires, and wbere lie was a conspiecus figure In tlie ring from thie fact tliat lie was the onby person present wlie dared te appear witbout tlie conventienal evenlng drese. Ho liad been raisIng thorouglibreds fer overý tlirty years, many of wbici lie liad seld. te cabinet ministers and even te thie ropresentatives of royalty at Rideau Hall-fer prices exceeding four figures per pair. Consequently, lie was somewliat lniwardly amused at tbe avowed mission of the tbree gentlemen. Ho removed bis cigar and gazed refiectively toward the river, as lie said: l'Wel, I don't know as I've got anything tliat would 3ust suit yen, gentlemen. Heow bigli did you want te go?\" \"Oh, we didn't expect te toucli any of your stock, Senator,\" said Dqcter Barker, laughing. \"Sometbing modest ls ail we want. We've collected exactly oee hundred dollars. We just want a nice, quiet, respect- able ministerial nag.\" \"I1 don't know of anything around Arrowdale that wouid answer,\" replied the old man; \"but to-morrew's market day over te Pert Despard, and as I'vo got te go over anyway, I may be able te fix yen up.\" After a littie further frlendly conversation, the \"delegatien\" departed. Next mornlng the Senator drove ever te the slifre town, which appeared quite lively as lie passed up the main street te bis usual stoppiing place. Having put np bis herse and lad bis own dinner, the stock- ralser was seated on the liotel verandali smoking, wben a large, red-faced man went down the steps and climbed inte a neat littbe buggy te wbicli was bitclied a smart-leoklng little black mare. Witlient using wblp or voice lie was wblsked away, followed by the eld man's gaze. A. few minutes inter the herse and buggy appeared around the corner and passed the botel at a llvely clip. Several timos wlthln the next ten minutes herse, man and buggy paseed and re- passed tlie botel. Finally, tbey drew up and stopped, dfreetly ln front of the Senator. T HEpoltican ws nthiglf not friendly.Th lie prided bimoef that lie knew every man', woman ami cbuld ln the cennty. Ho opened the conversation by remarklng that the herse and buggy A nything on the Road Without Seeing By CLEMENT BANCROFT constituted about as neat an entourage as ho liad ever ceeu ln Port Despard. \"Sure thing,\" remarked the stranger, pleasantly. \"That's a Wilkes mare and I raised ber myself-on the other side,\" indlcatlng the Stateo f New York, with a nod of bis bead. \"Her mether liad a mark \"Weil,\" sald the stranger to the Senator, \"I'1m golng to give her away. l'1l let her go for $150 cash.\"p ef '12, and ber sires get twenty in the '15 elass. Would yen lîke te get up beblnd lier?\" Tis Senator acqniesced, and soon lie and tlie stranger were bowling down the main street. \"This ls ne beast for a preaclier,\"1 tbe oid man' thouglit to himsèlf, \"and besides, I ,ceuidn't laud lier fer anything Ilke the money tbey gave me.\" The stranger was communicative, and seon the obd man iearned that lie was a druggist over ln New York State wle liad recently corne acrvile the river and purcliased an 'orcliard. However, lie liad ne sooner settied down than lie was overcome by the bure of the Canadian prairie and had determined te soul ont and go West. Yes, the mare was for sale, and clieap, to-dirt clieap. \"Wbat would tbat lie?\"I the Senater asked, eau- tieusiy. \"Well,\" replied bis new acquaintance, 111 find that 1 won't bave any particular use fer the mare lu the West, and I'm going to give lier away. l'il let lier go for $150 cash.\" Tbey bad by this time arrlved back at the hotel. \"Drive into thie yard and lot me lok at lier,\" eld Bob suggested. \"I'm net needin' auy herses, but seeing as yon'ro letting lier go se cbeap, I'd like te look lier ever.\" The stranger turned the rig Inte the hotel yard aud beth mon get eut. The Senator opeued the marels meuth, which seemed a little sensitive, but ho didn't apparently notice ItL \"Slie's ne kid,\" lie rqmarked; 1\"risin' twelve, 1 slionld judge.\" \"Yes,\" repbied the strauger; i\"tweive lust spring. De Yen suppose I'd sol lier fer tli figures if she wae yeung?\" Thon foilowed a minute examInati on. The old mn' went over the herse fer fully twenty minutes. Every boe ln ber body was preddod. Mier foot wero suli- jocted te a meat rlgid, inspection. The resuit was that the Senater bouglit the mare for $125, as shie stood lu lier balter. Ho added $25 te the ameunt lianded hMm by the churcli commttee-as lie hadl doue te many charity purses bofore. Tlien lie ordered bis own herse ami buggy, aud tyiug hie new purcliase socureiy behiud hlm, was on bis way back te Arrewdale wlthln a hlf an hour-Juat glvlug bimself tixne te transact hie own private business at the market town. He cbuckled to himself as lie drove 'along the country road. \"The new preacher will certalnly be some, class wlien he goes kitin' round wItb a 'Wilkes mare,\" lie thouglit. \"Stili, be's a Young man, and lie cana bold ber.\" W HEN lie reacbed bis own farm on the outskîrts of the village lie drove into the Yard and lianded the mare over to bis bired manl. \"'Take ber, Seth,\" he said; \"ýtlere's a littie Wilkes mare I bougbt for the new Metliodist preacher. Give ber a good feed and a ruli down. I guess w\u0026'iI keep ber tili Mýonday.\" The old man clImbed down and went 'into the bouse, stili feeling elated at bis find. An bour later lie was seated at supper wltb bis sister, wben bis man Seth entered the bouse, wltli a looki of concern on bis face. He gazed at his employer for two or tliree seconds as tbougb lie tlioiglit sometbing was wrong witb the old man. Then lie sald: \"Say, Senator; did you look tliat mare ever, 'fore yon bouglit ber?\" \"Sure, Setb*\" replied the latter. Always do, as yen know. Wliy?\" \"Oh, nothin',\" said thie blred man, witli as mucb unconcern as lie could simulate; \"enly shlm ýstone blind.\" \"The devil,\" ejaculated the Senator. \"You're crazy.\"1 \"Weil, come eut te tbe barn and look at ber- for yerself. I fiasbed tlie lantern ln lier face fer five minutes and It dldn't fiz on ber a bIt.\"' Witbout walting te don bis cap or coat the old man rusbed eut of the lieuse toward bis stable. The- new mare was in the first loase box. 'The old man entered. A lantern was lianging on a booli; tbis lie took and began wavlng it up and down, acrose and back. befere the liorse's eyes. Net a tremor did slie exbibit, but went on mnuncbing lier bay. Tlie Senator laid the lantern on the fleor. \"Weil, I'm damned.\" was ail lie'said, and those that knew old Bob Beaton realized tbat tbat was the most strenueus remark lie ever made. It was a full minute before lie could utter anether word; then be turned te Sethi and sald: \"Seth Hucklns, liow long bave you worked fer me ?\" \"1Nigli ente tblrty year, Senator-boy and man.\" \"Dld Yen ever knew me te get feoled In a herse trade ?\" \u003c INary a time; but I've seen .yen put some good. ones ovor on the ether feller.\"1 The eld man glancedl nervously around, as tbougli lie feared soe one was.wlthin earsbot. \"Net a word of tbis, Seth, te- anyone; yen bear me ?\" ne said, almest fiercely. \"On Monday, PUi give yen $100 te go over te Cebunk and buy some kind of a nag fer the churcli. Meantime we'll keep-tbis blind skate in the leose box, until 1I decîde wliat we'll de witb ber. Prebably we'1l shoot bier, fer there ain't ne drones 'round H,'atborda1e Stock Farm.\" Sadly the Senater went into the bouse; there seemedý te bo a decided stoop ln bis shonîdors, as tliongb oemeone bad deait bim a grievous montai blow. Hardly a word escaped hlm next day. Hoe let bis sister go te cburcli siene, whilo lie sat horne fuming te bimseif. Misls Ruthi was at a boss te fatbem bis taclturn meod. On Menday morning lie extracted twe fIfty dollar bills from bis wallet and banded tliem te Seth, as lie bitched one of tbe drlvlng berses. \"It aln't thie lose of the money 1 mind, Seth. Yen know tbýat. But te tbink that that Yankee pIll-pueber ceuld liand It te me and get away witb lt-it's flerce.\" About five e'clock Seth retnrned from Cebunk loading bobind hlm a Quiot-loeklng Ilttie bay horse; emlnentiy respectable, and mest the animal for a clerical oquipage. 11I boat Dec Jakes, the vet., dewn te tbe even buxi- dred,\" lie said, as lie ellmbed down frem the buggy. \"He's only nino and sound as a bell ln wlnd and Ilmb,\" and tben added, with a twInkle ln bis oye; \"and ll gamble lie ain't blind.\" N EXT moruing the Souater hltclied up the new herse te a rnbber-tired buggy ef bis own and drove hlm over te the preaelier's bouse. \"Mr. SýtiIes, ho sald te the doliglited Yeung ministor, 'Il got Yen the boat herse I ceuld, aud 1 hope you'l accept tht, buggy frem me, aithougli I den't bebong te yeur fieck.\" The Souater was a black-mouthed Presbyterlan, wliese father had emlgrated freux Scotland. 7\u003e \"Souator,\" gald the Young preacher, \"any herse sobocted by Yeu must lie as near perfect as It la pos- sible te be; sud thon addod, 'lwlat briglit, Intelligent eyes ho'. got.\" It was the last straw. It was proverbial that old Bob Boston nover gilet ln ail hi. years of fast drlvina",
         "CANADIAN COUTRIER. Gain, Huerta i. aima a thoughtfut mian, whose intellcCt rufla very largeiy to Mexîcafi cunnîfa., He has handed Presiçleft' Wilson ane of the puzzle IlroblemIs of the twentieth1 century ta Bolve. Up to the' presentý It looka, as thoýugh the American Premîdent has the best chance of maklng a gacci next move. Loading sheils an the battieÎhlp New York fer the 14 and 16 Inch guns at the Navy Yard. Presadent Wilson was always a thoughtfui man. Since thls photo- graph was taken he ha. been the most thaughtful man ln America. At present he has the most perpiex. Ing American prablem an hlm hands mince the days of, Abraham Lincoln. The offer of mediation by Argentina and Chili I. not llkeiy ta help hlm much. The War \"-Sh-ort of War Which May be a Serlous Business, But Has Considerable Comic Opera in its Plot H OW to be ln a state of war wthut declaring war ls the problem President Wilson. and Secretary Bryan have propounded to the world and propose ta solve if possible be- fore the experiment coats the United States more than it. can afford. The American fleet, under Rear- Admnirai Badger, hbas blockaded the port -of 'Vera, Cruz, sej;zed the customs bouses and docks and in- tercepted a big H-amnburg-Amierican liner supposed ta contali 8,000,000 rounds of ammunItion,, and 800 =achine guns for Huerta. It was the ,phantomi carg of the Ypiraniga that led to'the sending of A\u0026dmiral Badger'5 fleet to blockade Vera Cruz before ,oýngres had endorsed the policy of the President. The. cargo was supposed ta be intended by Huerta te- siaughter a f ew thousand mort of Villa's men after the horrible whacklng the Federal forces got at 'Torreon. Varions theories were advanced as to 'what Admirai Badger would do with the cargo which vas not contraband o! war. He was advised by news- paper experts ta send It back ta Germany. ,But when ti. marines searched the Ypiranga she *as found te have ýa dummy load of empty shrapnel'sheils, and emzpty ammuliltion chests. Whereupon .Huerta iaugbed with sardonlo mirtb. Sa f ar, serions comtc opera seexna to have taken the stage; as it normally does whencver the Latin countries near the Gul! af Mexico get into, states of war. The United States has been cast for the po.The eue Is at least a bit ef, burlesque. The affair over the V. S. marines at Tampico was prctty wseUl settled up by the arrest of the officer wbo had arrested the. marines andl an, plg freni Huerta for thir arrest. Presidellt Wilson demanded that \u003c\u003e14 (lory be saluted as an epilogue to the piece. The CrIafty Huerta, amiling down the streets o! Mexico City froni bis administration headquartcrs, conceded the sainte of 21 guns-if the shlps flying Gld Glory w.uld roturli gun for gun. The Presldent objected ta thc number o! guns. Huerta stnck te bis guns. jmmediately the. Uni'ted States, whieb up te the pro- sent bad spent a year ln refuslng te recognize the goerlXIlnt of Huerta agaiflat Villa and Carrauza, recegnlzed Huerta the ludividual by sending a fleet ta bloekade snd sufflclently bombard Vera Cruz and Taico, and to cffect a bloacade ef the entîre Mexican coast. qflat le, so far as military amateurs can sec into this affair, thaugh Uhe United States refused te sup- port any anc of the three chiots in the Mexican Civil 'War, even wlen that war had cost Àmerlcan citizeus ln Mcexico millions of dollars, the Moment Huerta refused te back down from bis \"gun for gun\" ackuQw- leidgment of the salute, Uhc United States (3evern- ment proeeeds agalnst hlm as thaugh Uic !United States itself were one of the factions ln Mexico. A state of 'war la precltated te the boomlng cf artillery and thc shelling cf positions ln Vera Cruz. Mexican sharpabeoters nud Ainerican marines engage ln actuel guu ceiict, They come as nearthe8gunfor, gun ratio as possible. A numrber are killda' woudedonbath aides. Yet no war la dèlared. The manient Vera Cruz and Tampio and a feu' alier MexIca1i ports arc suffIiintly blocku4ed te keep the lun Mexicespe ally uerta, the .S.Gvrmn itend te sit tlg-t and let the Mexicans finish the. Job o the best oft ilelr ablty. Tbis la probably the most cunningly cernplicated By JAMES JOHNSTON Senatar Root wanted war, not with Huerta aver the gun for gun epîsade, but wlth Mexico on behaif of American property and citizens. imbroglio that ever happened outside of Turkey. It la' Inflnitely more involved than Uic causes of Uic Spanish-Amerlcan War. The results are much more dlfflcult to forecast. Yellow newspapers foreed Uic United States inta a war wlth Spain at Cuba and the Philippines. The result is that Cuba ls 110w under American protecterate, and the Filipinas, given self-government by Uic United States, are now be- glnning te oust Amerlcaus froni the civil service. HY.I. TAFT, once Governor of Uic Philippines, Ros ot spe nough ln Uic resuit to warrant the United States golng to war wiUi Spain. It is cjulte probable that President Wilson secs teo Uitile ln the utmate result to warrant a declaration of war wit Mcxico. The Ulnited States doe net want to annex Mexico any more than it dld Cuba or the Philippines; any more than it would desire te annex Canada. The price of amiexatian lu moedern timues is always tee, great for any nation to be willing to pay. War lu the twentieth century costa five Urnes what It dld in the carly part of the. nlneteenth. A country like Mexica is difficult te conqucr; just as South Africa was dIlificuit. .Any war of conquest muet be a long one. It must practically rulu Uic country- before conquering lt The couutry's oredit draps te Uic lowest level. Its commerce la crlppled. Its lnvestments are depreclated. Fire, dynamite, idleness o! warkors, ruta o! raiways and of shlpping, wiiolesale decimation et the. people, depletion of Uic exabequer, the spoia~tion ot property-all combine te Inae a conquered cou~ntry ultimately net wortii the price of couquest, at leait In Uic sanie- geucration. All these torces have been going on at a falrly good Pao. ln Mexico afready. Four years age civil war-began 'w1ti the Diasés and Madero. It has ci.- tlnued ever aluce. The. country le now split up int three factions. It le a matter of fine discrimination to determine which is the worst. Ail belleve iln fighting tire witb fire. Desperadoes are In the rank and file of each camp because desperate measures by an excitable Latin race are the order of the day in a condition of ruinous civil war. Befora the war American and Canadian and foreign capital flowed Into Mexico asf freely as Britishi capital slutccd -Into Canada for the building'of great railways. There was unllxnited natural wealth. Capital was eager to exploit It. Hundreds of milions werc invested by haîf a dozen countries. Mexico cea8ed to, be a purely Latin country, lving a bal! aboriginal, bal! decadent- civilIzed tiJfs. It became a land of commercial ad- venture and of great industries, o! great ports and railways and mines. When the Latin republic appetite for revolutIon got the better of commercial conquest and started Mexico on a career of gunning and dynamite and lire, the millions of foreign capital Invcsted In Mexico were jcopardized. Investors would have been glad ta wlthdraw. They coutl not. Foreign citizens would hafée beon glad to came out. Their property Major Smediey utler, comm\u003eandlng th~e 'American mares at Vara Cruz.",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. Interests made It Impossible. Money contInued to go Into Mexico; but it was no longer for mines and railways and ranches and fruit farms-it was for rifles and powder and balse, sheils and dynamite and artillery, ail for the purpose of destruction to pro- perty and human ilfe. It was part of the absurd price that, civilization is wiliing to pay for destroy- ing ItseIl The rloe of Huerta after the sliooting of Madero tlirew the so-called government of Mexico into his biands. It was a government by shotguns; because the rebels and the constitutionallsts were operated by sliotguns. Huerta may have been the ieast of three evils; or lie may not. The powers abroad wlio hail lnterests la Mexico were net supposed to know, thougli eacli of tliem had an ambassador In Mexico. The United States, most heavily Interested In Mexico and divided from It by the Rio Grande, were supposed te know. If the United States did not choose to know and te act on its knowiedge, it wouid be immenseiy more difficult, If not impertinent for Great Britain or Germany or Japan to Intervene. When President Wilson came into office, lie was appealed to by Huerta for recognition. Other gov- ernments-Great Britain, Japan, Spain, Germany, Russia and Austro-Hungary-all recognIzed Huerta as provisional President of Mexico. The United States refused recognition. The Powers became Im- patient. Clearly somebody la Mexico muet be recog- nized or else ther country must be conceded to be Iný a state of absolute anarcliy based upon civil war. Huerta professed to be anxious for law and order. President Wilson and Secretary Bryan evldently baal *WHEN GHOST MEETS GHOST\" IT is, net eften'that I take my \"monocle\"\"Into a ill- rary;, but I am venturing te do se tliis 'week, mast for fear some of yen may be missing oe of thie Most delicate and yet elaborate creations of literary tracery that the language 'contains. I hardly kuow whether te cail \"Wlien Glost Meets Ghost\" the masterpiece of Its author; for It la too long stace I enJeyed \"Josephi Vance\" and \"Alice-for- Short\" for me te be sure of comparative menit. But nndouibtedly It ls by far the best thlng De Morgan lias done recently;,and-as an exampie of wliat can lie dene Iu ivory-carving and miniature-paintîng-lt launnequalled, se far as I know, ta Engliali fiction. 0 PF course, I sliould net advise any one to buy De .JMorgan for tlie story. De Morgan dees tell a story-that ls lis concession te the ruies of fiction. And It Is possible to bie mildiy Interested ta most of bis stories If you do net forget how they run whule reveiling ln the rosi beeuty of bis books-their microscopic psydhological portrait work. But bis story could, as a mule, be told lu aine hundred sen- tences Instead of aine liundred pages. Theme ls a story ta \"Gheat Meets Ghost.\" I arn trying te take a polite Interest ln It ont of complient te the de- liglitful De Morgan who seems te set coasiderabie store by ItL But, frenkly-between yen and me-I den't came a \"hoot\" about It. In fact, there are two steries--come to thial ef lt; perliaps twe-and-a-lialf, countlag the tepid love episede between two adinir- abiy-dmawa elderly conventlenallties as \"a hli.\" But evea the chie! love stery lu an exasperating sort of affair, in whlch a blid an la ln love with a beeuty, and tuler. seems te be ne good reeson wliy the beauty sliouid le In love et ail. ,%''T .. , T f f little or no faith ln Huerta. Bryan is a peace advo- cate. RIe lias probably influenced the President in lis policy of non-intervention; on the principle that if you leave two dogs alone the fight will be settied one way or tlie other witliout the neiglibours rushing to the rescue. Tlie longer Washington ln tlie teetli of a strong war element persisted ln watching and waiting, tlie more Huerta exercised lis own natural cunning In the case. He probabiy understood Washington very well. Hoe believed tliat Washington desired to keep ont of trouble by letting fighting dogs flglit. It would be mudli cheaper for the United States, even thongli snch a policy miglit be absoiutely ruinous to Mexico. If Washington resorted to a policy 0f waiting to seo how the cat wonld jump, wliy sliould not Huerta, representIng Mexico, resort to a policy of making a possible cat jump at Washington? If it was becoming too expensive and difficult for Huerta to keep tlie victors of Torreon out of the Capital City, why sliould not Washington be forced to intervene on a pretext of saving lier own national lionour? If the affair at Tampico could be sufficiently staged up for a pre- text, why shonld not Washington be compelled to deciare war upon Huerta In the namne of Mexico? Why wouid It not lie possible to unite ail the factions of Mexico against a common enemy; to resist United States aggression and trust te tlie exigencies of a long and costly war to settle the score In some sucli pot-l, brute force style as It did In Bulgaria and Roumania? Wlietlier or net this was the counter plot of Huerta against what lie considered the passive plot of Wash- his knowledge--tle fact that these were bis \"1sdhool- books.\" But bis Uncle and Aunt took the grown-up view of a conversation- \"'Didn't yen say your was Davy?' said 'Uncle Mo. And Aunt M'rier slie actnally said, 'Wall, I nover! - net te tell the lady who yon was!' \"Dave was perplexed, looking witli blue-eyed gravlty from one te tlie other. 'The loydy said I was Doyvy,' said lie, ta .a sllglitly lnjured toue. He did not at ail 111e the suggestion of disconrtesy.1\" Wbhen photographes lke, this flash from the pages ene after another, 'with their marvellons tasiglit Into character, what do we care If Gliost ever Meet Gliost? T I-EN D Moran l alinmonrist. In thlB serious and sexul\" ae, t is a great thing tefinda humonrist wltli bis peu ln hand. De Morgan not only phetograplis for you the peeple lie sees, but lie gently pokes tunaet tliem as you and lie sit chat- tlng about thefr usnally quite unimportant comIngs and goinge. There ls nothing bittag about his \"u. Geueraily, Yeu would lie quite willlng that tliey sliouid overlear him-that is, wlien they have suffi- clent Intelligence to nnderstaud h0w genial and lngton lias neyer been proved. Probably President Wilson understands the game mudli better than any One else. Wlien lie sent Rear-Admiral Badger te Vera* Cruz on a plan of war \"short of war,\" to blockade the ports ef Mexico and to bombard tlie coast cities as mucli as necessary, lie probabiy Intended tliat sucli an act sliould be a continuation 0f ls policy to let Mexico âight the thing ont to a finish witliout aid from any other contry in the world. Again lie may calculate, if sudh a policy does not settie Huerta and force hlm to withdraw is gun-for-gun ultimnatum, tliat ln the event of a land war becoming necessary, Panche Villa, victorious at Torreon, and Carranza ln the far north, may decide to become allies of tlie United States and so force Huerta to abandon lt claim to recognition as tlie administrator 0f Mexico. Meanwhule Mexican papers pnblislied ln Huerta's territory appeal to tlie people ln the name of a com- mon Mexico to resist the armed Invasion of tlie United States. At Washington, Senator Root drame- ticaliy contends in tlie Sonate that tlie resolution of the Foreign Relations Committee lie so dlianged ln Its 'wording tliat tlie United States may not go on record as figliting against tlie Individuai Huerta un- rocognized as tlie lioad of Mexico, but against ail of Mexico ln a state of anardliy Imperilling tlie lves and proporty of American citizens. The House of Representativos sends the report on witli thunderous ayes and no qulîblo about tlie wordlng. And the slips of Admirai Badger liaving biockaded Vera Cruz are now proceeding to Tampico. But se far as Prost- dent Wilson is concerned, there is at, present to be no siogan-\"-ýOn to Mexico City.,, klndiy the, \"tan\" ls. But It keeps a smile on your lips as you read-not a snigger or a smirl. RIglit at the ontset of lis boo, lie tells yon about a yonng lady who brings him tea, ln \"la new-born toa-shop.\"' Slie was \"callous te me and mine becanse yen pay at tlie desL\" Tlius you are to understand she lied ne hope of a \"tip.\" \"But she was an ordorly soul,\" goes on De Morgan, \"for slie turnod over the lump of' sugar that liad a littie butter on it, so as to lie on the buttery aide and look more tidy-llle.\" TF yen will take my recommendation, you wîll read iDe Morgan slowly, and as if lie were being pub- Iislied serially ln a tardy \"weekly.\" Put lis book: at your elbow on your reading-table, and only pick hlm up when you feel liungry for tliis later and more delicate Dickens. Don't botlier about bis \"plot.\" You know liow It is coming ont just as soon as yon get the first ontlinos 0f It. But wliat yon do not know is exactly liow eacli of tlie cliaracters ls going to act as lie or she plays a part ln Its development. That la wliore De Morgan's art ls supreme. Wlien you read 10w tliey do act, you know that tliey coul! not have acted otlierwise-and be tliemselves. Per- sonally, I do not know any writer of modemn fiction wlio se Impresses yon witli tlie reality of his people as does De Morgan. Tliey, live and move and have their belng. Tliey are a1waýys the as'ame people wlien- ever they appear ln lis pages--even If they lie snp- pressedl for a score of chapters. You feel that yon could not fail to recognize tliem, on the street. De Morgan is, In sliort, a more artistic Dickens, a more esoteric Eliot, a truer satirist than Tliackeray. I marvel there Is net more 0f a furere over lis books. THE MONOCLE MAN. HANDS ACROSS THE SEA",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. A Spectacular Mayoralty Inaugural in Montreal Mayor Mederlc Martin Inaugurates. hUa regîme U 1n Montreal. At the end of the table, Chlef City Clerk Senator L. O. DavId; at hla left Jules Crepeau, hUa assistant. A Modern Caesar W ITI- the popular acclamations of a Roman con- queror, Mayor Mederic Martin started is term of office in Montreal lat week by issuing a proclamation that ail men tu Montrea1 out of a job sahould apply at the City Hall and work wou1l be guarafteed There was a grand rally of Coxey's Army. They besieged the City Hall and swarmed over the Champ de Mars ta the rear. They came apaing sEven languages, but ail wanting work from th. it of Montreal at the banda of the opulént tribune of the plebs, Mayor Mederie Martin. On MoiidaY, last week, 2,176 men were added ta the corporationi squad of Montreal, making a grand total of 6,026 men engaged on public works. Like the rats in the \"Piedi Piper of Hamelin,\" they came up fromn ail -tbe streets of Montreal, from ail the suburbs, and from, towns and cities near enougb for the apPlicants to afford the price o! a railway ticket. The controllers trIed to adidress tbe mob, but could do se only tbrough Interpreters. The Mayor assured the crowd that If they would have a little'-patience, not a sinigle ratepayer ln Montreal sbould b. out of a job. The Mý,yor ls very popular. He thinks that - a great -cjtY exists to, find work for unemployed. -Never ti Canada bas there been such a Mayor as MýedfiriC Martirn. He has made bis grand entry into public life withthe swagger of a Roman gen- eraI. He bas prociaimed a public holiday for al lveemployees ln order to, oelebrate the coming of tiiis economlhc Messiab, Mederlo Martin. At the firat meeting of the Board o! Control be proved, beyond a shadOW of a doubt, that be la and Intends to remain the big stickin administration. He bolda the balance Of power In tbe casting vote. Two of the new controllers, Cote and Hébert, arestraîght Mar- tUn meni. The other two., Ainey, the Labour repre- sentative for tiie \u003cpast, four years, and McDonaid, the new controiler, are antis. It is therefore a case of tiixee against 'two. By the operation of this mnachine~ it was decid-ed tbat ail Oity officiais and ,eappoyees shouid be under the direct control o! the M4ayor. The. City' Attorney' contended tbat under the law, which b. read, the board could net delegate ,such powers to anl1 one meniber. 1i respect tbe opinion of the City' Attorney, but I amn chairman o! this body' and I will be respected,\" answered the Mayor., Singei'S' Visit to the Old Land yN returu for the hundreds of thousands o! British j j-migrafltg and the visits of British bands, Shef- fild Choirsandit London Symphiony' Orchestras, Cainadian musical organizations are beginning tui vislt the Oit! Coiuntry. Tihe greatest of tiiese art piigrI.fl\u0026ges wiil, of course, be that of the. Men- deisSohn Choir in June, 1915, when an itinerar\u003e' cov- erlng FEngla11d and! Scotiand, France and Germany wili be carniet out b\u003e' 215 singers, maiiY o! whom were boni n Great Bnitaln. A few years ago the Winnipeg Citizens' Band! made a musical tour o! England,! and! the Calgary Llght Horse followed suit. The Queen's Own Bugle Bland! went over several year, mgo. Whey wene foiiowed three years ago b\u003e' the entire neginient of the Queen's Own Rifles, ac- compaiet! b\u003e' the negii'nntal band. Some time ago a viit o! the National Chorus was mootet!, pmrtly organlzed, and! then abandonet!. Now the Victoria Cailege Giee Club, under th-e batonship o! Mr. Ernest Bowles, ta to do a tour in Engiand anri Scotland. Thuey wiii sali froni Montreai on June 14, ant! wll give concerta ln London, Bristol, Glasgow, Edinburgh, and! somel othen places. Enelish Cujp Final 0 N Saturt!ay Iast, the flial soccer garne for the, Engllsh CUP~ was playot! at the. CryBtal Palace, Lonidon, between Burniey and! Liverpool. Burni- lywon~ b\u003e a scone of 1 goal te none. Over 100,000 spectators were prese't and the King wOa thore for the first tlme ln the history of the, Cup. Mayor Martin issued a proclamation for ail men out of a lob to apply at the CltY Hall. This picture shows a few of the thousands who were on hand the first day. Canadian Singers to Visit the Land of Song The fîrat Canadian choral organIzation to crosa the Atlan t1c for the purpose of glvlng concerta ln Great BrItain la the Victoria Coilege GI.. Club, who Witt sali by the. Royal George on June l4th, 1914. A Commemnoration and a Memorial On Saturday, Aprli llth, the, Independent Labour Party of Great Britain Memorlal dlolter erected ne..' celebrated ts 11comlng of age\" tri a conferonco at St. George's Hall, Brad- Goldalming Parleh Churctu Eng. ford. In the. front row, left to rlght, are seen: Mr. Ramsay MacDonald, M.P., land, to the m.mnory of Jack Phil Mra. F. W. Jowett, Mr F. W. Jowett, M.P., Mr. S. Foulger, Mr. Kerman lips, wlreless operator on the. Mul1ler, M.P. (Gerniany\u003e, M. Camille Huysmans, M.P. \u003cBelalum). Mr. J. Tltanlc. Whio went down wlth the Keir Hardie, M.P. (Chalrman), Mrs. J. Keir Hardie, Mr. Arthur Honderson, alilp on AprIl 15th, 1912. M. P.. Mr. J. 14111., M. Camelont (Parla).",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. A Wicked Preacher WICKEDNESS lI hlgh places la a constant theme o! the journalistlc world, and thore It can- net bo amis te point eut the wickediqess o! the Rov. S. Wesley Dean, o! Toronto. In an addross befere the religious congresa at Ottawa, recently, which congress was masquerading under the titie of \"Social Service,\" thla Mr. Dean Indicated, ths.t Canada sheuld dlean up Its own alunis before it essayed te perforin a simîlar office lni the, alumes o! China, and IndIa.ý xI thor worda, ho slapped the 'wists o! -the !oreign-misen, onthusiaste. Now, thia la wicked. The editen o! the Canadian Courier can produce mauy .letters li proof o! this, for ho, tee, bas been guilty on several occasions o! uttorng simllar sentiments. It bas o!ten 1boon pelnted eut that the \"foreigu\"' quartera o! Montreal, Teronth and Winnipeg are lni as great nood o! edu- cation and, Cbristianizlng Influence as any district where, British ami Canadian fereigu misinaries *work. Aise, It bas been suggoated that there are numerous diatnIits on tbe Canadian frontior tato wbicb the Christian missionary never gees, because thýe mission funds, are used te, support mon and women li foreign'landa. But theo goodlest-goodlest readens o! this journal have always protested agalnist such 'wickedness. 'It la thenefone with considenable feeiling, that the edior Indicatos that Mr. Dean la preachlng doubtË il doctrine. The editor alIse warns other Intelligent persona against thInking theso sane and, helpful thoughts aloud. Hiigh Finance in Toronto A SPLENDID example o! a batly ipanaged busi- ness niay be found lu tbe mnlipality of To- ronte. Wbat every busixeie conco'rn tries te akvoid la paylng iteront. The legs intenest, the more profit. Toronto will pay eut for tateroat and ainking fund ln 1914 the huge smn o! $3,965,663. This la equal te, a five per cent. dividend on $73,913,260. Therefore, Toronto la bornowlng to-day thîs huge suni e! money-more than sevonty milliona e! dol- lars. And yet the Council gees along blitholy, keep- Ing down the tax-rate and beestlng the public debt, jugt as If money was ne ebject. There wiUl bo a great awakening in that city some day, and thero will be weeping and wailing and gnashing e! teeth. The business mon, as lni Montreal and elaewhere, are asleep, and the city government la le!t ln the bands o! a few mon who cannot counit up te one million, mucb ions aeventy million. Toronto collecta about eleven and a bal! millons ini taxes this year, se that noarly ono4thfr4 ls used up lxi paying for \"dead herse.\" Totaily oblivieus, the financiers o! the city propose te add anether ton or flteon million te the public debt this yeat. Thon Toronto will have the highest debt per capita li Ameriea. bas littie or no appreciation of International law and international courtesy was a profound and disastrous errer. Bryan is a faddist, an unconsequential trillor ln national affaira. le bas somethlng of alncerlty and picturesquenesa to recommend hlm, but his very wordlness ls an Indication of the shallow waters of bis'mmd. Ho neyver should have bean made the Foreign Ministor of thoý United States, and ho would net bave received the appointinont bad President Wilson been free te cheose for hlmsel!. lui every government, under our party systom, there are mon who bave notbing te commend tbem except long Party service. There are mon In the present Do- minion Govornment wbe, represent only that prI-- ciple. lI the Ontanlo Governmeënt there are striklng examplos. Bryan la the dlstingulshed exemplar of this unfortunate political weaknoss li the United States. The leason for the Great Ropublie Io that It must, train monte take up the work of Foreign MInister. The relations of the United States with foroign coun- tries bas come te be, of as much, Importance as those of Great Britain, Gormany or France. Each of those countries muet have a. Hay- or -a Lord Grey within caîl, ne matter what administration ls ln power. The national safoty and the world's peace dopend upon the quallty and genins of the worldSs groatost diplo- mats. Western Canada Waking Up JUDGING by a circular now being sent eut by the Board o! Trade of North Battieford, the western business mon belleve that Providence helpa tbose who help theniselves. Tboy want te hold a. convention li North Battleford on May l4th ax4d 15th for the purposo o! orga.nizing \"'Tho Western Canada Colonization and Dovelopment League\"-to ensure a population o! ton million people witbin ton years. The purpose e! the League saal be te, koep before the publie o! the world tho many advantages, resources and possibilities o! Western Canada as a whole. Inx other wends, these people propose te, do for thomselvos what bas hitherto beon done by the raliways and the Dominion Immigration Dopartmont. Instoad e! each city advertlslng Its own attractions and own province talking about Its own advantages, tbey suggest that the advertising e! Western Canada shall be centned li one organIzation. Thore la te ho no mad seramble te build mythical cities or te unduly booat some particular section. The new onganIzatIon would lay the foundations o! a vast empire In which n~o particular part sbould ho built up at the expense of any ether part, and which would be normally developed lI ail Its different parts. The scbeme la well worth the effort whicb la being put upon It, and if the people o! the West will caat aside ail local prejudices ani local ambitions and concentrate on one large canipaign, the resulis wll ne doubt bring greator rewards than oven its pro- moters anticipate. BY THE EDITORj -comparê witb the British Lion or the American. Elagle In its power of expression. Our carteonista mlght set themselves to work on this great national problem. The Decline in C.P.R. THE financial experts 'do not know how to ex- plain the recent decline of nearly one hundred points in 'the market price of the coraimon stock of the Canadian Paclc Railway. When the experts are at a logs the public le usually dumb- founded. If C. P. R. stock were the only stock to show a great decline, there mlght, be some reason to wonder if ail were flot well with Canada's greatest corporation. But C. P. R. stock has not doclined any more than some ether railway stocks; notable ex- amples which may be quotod are Rock Island and New Haven In the United States, and Brazilian In South America. Indeed, ail railway stocks through- out the western world, inciuding Great Britain, have sbown severe declInes during the past year. Even admitting this, and admittingalso that busi- ness In Canada Is not lI the boom condition that It was a year ago, or two years ago, there are special roasons why C. P. R. stock should be quoted lower than It was iast year. Sir Thomas Shaughnessy conceived the notion somo years ago that the Cana- dian Pacific Railway ought to be known as a cor- poration without bonded lndebtedness. in the lat annual report, lssued June 3Oth, 1912, It ls shown that -twenty-two millions of mortgaged bonds were redeemed and cancelled, leavlng enly about thirteen millions outstandlng. There was a -sllgbt increase lI the amount of preference stock and dobenture stock. It'was.undoübtedliy the Intention to elimin ate the mortgage bonds ontIrely, and replace them, with common stock. ThIs pollcy has been critlcized by certain people wbo point eut that it- la bad, flnancing te cancel bonds paying five per cent. and issue com- mon! stock 'caing-.for ton per, cent. dividende. Whotber Sir Themas and the directors o! the. C. P. R. were right or whether thé critios are rlght ls a ques- tion: which It ls very dlfficult te decîde. The CanadIan Pacifie Railway 18 still the greatest corporation in Canada, and one of 'the greatest In the world. Europoan Investors may loso 'confidence in C. P. R., but Canadians have ne right 'to do se. If C. P. R. \u003ecan make the success wbich it bas made when the country bad soven millions population, Its succes muet be much greater when the country ba tbe twenty millions of people which it eught to bave in'the year 1925. Hands Across the Sea_ UNTIL recently cable messages'froni Toronto, te Great Britain were sent. by tolegraph te ,the cable station In.Nova Scotia, there repeated by opieraitora on the cables and again repeated by tele- graph op.erators on the other aide. Last week, by means o! the Gott. Invention,. a message wau sent direct lI ,the Morse dot and dash signala froni To- rente, te Fermoy,' freland. The occasion was.the annual dinner of the offIcera of the Queen's Own Rifles of Toronto, and a simllar mess dinner o! the Buifs, a British regiment now stationed at Feoney. These two regiments were recently allled by a British militia order and they declded te hold a simultaneous banquet. The one lI Toronto began early lI the evening and the one In freland late on the marne evenlng. At nine o'clock an operator lIn the Militar Institute, Toronto, was cennected diroét wtth an operater In the Barracks at Fermoy, iad mnesqafes were excbanged. It requlred about, Ififën seclonds for a signal to pasa freni Toeronto te Fermoy, and messages were sent and answe'rs recelved lI logs than ton mninutes. This notable achievement was made.\u003epossIble by spoclal arrangements w1th Mr. Clarence H. Mackay, o! New York, head o! the company wbich controls the cables. As an acknowledgment of the courtesy of Mr. Mackay, ho was made an bonorary member o! the two mllitary messes. The messages froni the Toronto aide were sent by General Otter, the oldeat living cemmanding efficor of the Queen's Own; Sir Henry Peliatt, bonorary lieutenant-colonel, and Colonel Mercer, the commandant. Seventy-two offi- cors and ex-efficers o! the Queen's Own were present on tbis notable occasion. Second Cadet Tournament NPriday and Saturday o! this week the second ON annual Canadian Cadet Tournament will be beld at the Anena Gardons, Toronto. It prom- ises to emphasize further the success being attained by the cadet and physical training moement lIn the scbools and aniong the youths of Canada.- The flrst attempt of the kind, beld at the Toronto Armourios last year, proved te b. a ploasurable sur- prise and an education te a large portion of the publie. Schools, colIeges, and Independent corps bave entored toamis lIn drill, physical training, rifle shoot- ing, slgnalllûg, and first aid competitions. Thoe wiil !urnlah some larze and attractive dismnlivg Nor",
         "CANADIAN COURIIER. Water Gardens Finding Favour A Type of Garden, Novel and Attractive, and a RelietfJrom the Ordinary Flower LODn By E. T. COOK T HE illustration shows an attractive type of wbat le popularly descrlbed as \"water gar- dening.\" The water gardon sbown here le natural. It ts set forth .with sufi- dient clearnese to make a reproduction afi Inl the garden perfectly simple, and it le evident that the more \"natural,\" tbougb 'requing a greater varlety of plants, is lees worthy than the noble de- sign which ls one of the features of the Roobampton polo Club la England. This seems appropriate to, surroundinge that are not la themeelves format. A complote realization le aeon o! marrying beauty to, one may say, utllity, creatlag an atmospbere of ex- qulsite, surrouadings Ini places where one may reason- ably expect sometbing artistic, something to serve as aa incentîve, an example for those wha possses the means to reproduce la a way la their home sur- thie, avoid compllcated echemes. Prepare the soil well by the undersîde, and plant not only flowers from other countries, but those native, too-the Cana- dian Iris, Willow Herb, Marsh Marlgold (Caîtha), and many another wilding that one has seen la wan- dering into the country, where streams abound. But as planting time ls rapidly approaching, the names of a few beautIful kinds may be enumerated, besides those mentioned: Our Lady's Sllppers, Cypripedium spectabile or Moccasin flower, and C. pubescene, Japanese Irises or I. Kaempferl, wbicb were in luxuriant bloom In this Grimsby garden last year, the Loosestrifes, of which. Lythrum roseum. super- bum and virgatum. are the richeet la colour, the pure white Lysîmachia cletbroides, Bee Balm or Oswego Tea (Monarda didyma), massed over for many weeks ia sumrmer witb scarlet flowers; the Golden Rod (Solidage), though*sparingly, and a few hardy feras that delight in moisture, such as Lady-fera (Athy- rium felix-foemIna), Osmuadas (Royal ferlas), hard and soft shield feras (Polystichums aculeatum and angulare), and Ostrich Feather ferna or Strutbiop- texis germanica). It le a mietake to over-plant. ,Almost every plant that requires a moist and, thore- fore, as a rule, \"fat\"' soil for îts maintenance, la of exceptionally strong growth, spreadlng raply and wben overdone simply creating a forest of growth which, through want of space, therefore air and sunshine, fail to assert their own individuality. Two plants the wrlter had almost forgotten ta namne, the Cardinal flower (Lobella cardinalis) and the her- baceous Phlox in one or other of its many forme. The former muet have moisture, tbough not actual contact with water, and the Phlox le neyer more leafy and flower-bedecked than in moiet soil and partial shade. A group was planted by waterside and where the sbadow of trees alhone tbroiigh a grateful sbelter from the sua, thougb nlot Ia dense shade, and the joy of the Phlox, s0 ta say, was shown In a growth that would ney:er be attained under less sympathetic surroundinge. Perbape the namnes of a few of the most desirable may be wised for, and tbey are BrIdesmaid, white and carmine Ia the centre of the flower; Elaireur, brlght rose; Eugene Danzan- villier, llac and wbite; Jeanne d'Arc, pure white; Pantheon, soft pînk; and Coquelicot, vermillon. Utilize the B3ack Yard Save Money, Find a Hobboy and Brighten Up the Neighbourbood By FIUGH S. EAYRS A waiter- garder' [i Qrlmby, Ontarla. Nature has dane much and mri a little mare ta make Ut the beautiful th Ing Tt la. bo we up ta Co: roI ha Pl eh ap rij Pa la, fia ho of 'Ve lx nc ig W ta roundings. Rare la a polo club, whlch la naturally b the meetIng-place o! thoso who are rleh la titis re world's treasures, or sbauld ho, and la the lay-out 80 ai sncb places ai recrestion and resart la aur country Ie one abject, we are grataful ta write, la 'becoimlng 8 more decidedly so, that le ta make evorythlng as l _beantîful as art caa make it, not In the design oaly T of the club-bouse itsel, but lu its ea'viranmeat. e Clubs for the resoi't af those who eau aiford expansive h luxurles are sringlng Up lu aIl parts of the Domion, devated, perbape, ta golf, polo or other games and, pursuits, and wbOa these are deslgaed witb the idea of not only a meeting-place for soe epecifle pur- pose, but ta be sometbing that represeuts tbe pro- grass of artIstic conceptions ta aur country, then two noble ideals bave been acbloved. A vieltar ta the Roohamptoil Polo Club goos away ,,lth the impression o! bavlag llved a few heurs net only In the tourll5fleft grond af an exhilarating pastime, but la a gardon af noble design la wblch 111e££nt f-Mao-we andL the mic of playing watfwf - bring a seaso of laiigioraus refinement wlthout ostentations extravagance. The slmpllclty of the formai gardon, Its exQulelte proportions sud massIng ot hardy fioweri, ail are possible a! acblevernt, but a caniplete wbole in wbich the commouplace andi near do not exlet. Snch a gardon as this may well farn the foregrouiid ta a home.o ai emilar outline to prevent clashes af severely opposlag deslgns. -Then the \"natural,\" so-called for the obviaus roeau the beautîful wsys o! nature are followed, the frInge o! meaderlng brook and placîi lake, wlth the native flow'ers flung ironi ber bountiful lap haro, thoreand evérywlwre, spiashos af calaur moltlng one Inta the other ln glorlous harmonies witbout a jarrlng note ta dletnrb tbo wonderful picture tbat puzzles the mînti of man te paint. 1!, The Illustration af the more lint4ralI water gardon rends the writer af a lîttle scone lm~ Grimsby, On- taria, the. town sot lu the Niagara fruit bit, wbere a love of gaVdOllig là wrftten over the home sur- - » dlaga. 'lm\u0026 lIn the maluig et sucol. a garen. a EARLY every dally paper nowadays bas a de- partment dovoted to taîks on gardenlng. It wasiVt s0 a few yoars ago. There wsnt the need for ItL People la Canada did not tbor vory much about gardening. There were too Lny other thinge ta, do, of greater moment. There re rallways ta bo made, and buildings ta be put citios ta be laid out, and resourcos of the foreste bo exploitod. And so, a emaîl aiffair lîke tbe Lking of a garden bad to wait. But gardeaing le ming lato lis own nowadaye. In a city liko To- nto thora are many scores o! bousebolders who ve a lawn la front of the bouse. Evory yoar they int some seede, and have fiowers and borders snd rube maklng more and more proposessing the proach ta the bouse Itel. AIl this le slang the ~ht Uines. But It muet ho remombered that coin- ratively there are few wbo bave the chance of a l'a la front of tbolr bouse, made beaut1ful by ýwors and ebrube and bordors. Tbe average bouse- Ilder'bas only a very emaîl plot of grass la front hie house, and mucb as be would like be cannot ry woll m ake a gardon ont of that. Sa tbe average iseholder, the worklng MaM If you, liko, says hie bas chbace ta do any gardealng. Hoe forgote, or be nores the fact tbat be bas at aay rate a back yard. bat le wrong wlth the Idea af msklag the back Lrd into, a gardien? Why not mako It lese o! an oesore and more of an assot? Why not utîlizo the Lck yard? Have you ever notlced that the newspspere 7ery xeîy coatain a report of a mnarket gardener or a sery man gotting loto trouble? Csst your mimd tek, and thiak of tbe police court news you have ad la your newspaper. A tinker or a tallor, or a Idder or a sallor le otten the culprît, but for somoe sn or other the market gardener hardly evor ýems ta get into trouble. You don't boar o! hlm lng bis petîtion, or beiag sued la the county court. hore le a reason for It. If be le worth an) thing ail, ho can make enough out of bais gardon ta savo Le wlfe a good deal o! ber housekeeplng money, ad ebie doesn't aood ta rua up bile. Every man bais s'a provider oould become a tact ta a considorable ctent. The only tbing that tbe'average back yard le ueed for la a sort of dumping grouad for such odd thIngs as cannot, find a place Insîde tbe bouse. It ls a fenced-ln wllderaess. Truc, It serves îts purpose as a drylng ground for the clothos, but thon, se it would If it wero turnod into a gardea. Apart from that, It serves no useful purpose wbatevor. It is just se miÎch of the bouse and lot wasted. It could be made to be productive. Take the average city lot, which covers a twenty- flftb of an acre, and turc it Into a kitchen garden. Two dollars' worth of seed, and caro and attention and bard work wIll make that twenty-fiftb of an acre produco enough summner vegotables to keep an ordinary f amlly of flve or six. For an expeuditure of two dollars la money, and many heure of spare tîme, enougb potatoos, pose, radishes, lettuce, corn, boane and so on can bo grown to make the house- wife Indopendent o! the green-grocor. Truc, the green-grocer migbt suifer for a little white if a lot of people began to grow tbelr owa vogetables. But he would soon adjust bis supply to bis demand, aud whllo no man livetb to bîmeelf alono, he doosa't Ulve to bis green-grocor, aayway. Presumably, the volce af thep\"eple ls clamouriag for some reforma whIlb wÎ1 Il fftW the la. o. of 1. Hore Is ono very effec- tive way. Produce a part, at aay rate, of your awn roqulsîtes. You can't dispense witb your butcher, and you can't get aloag wltbout your grocor. But You caln, for a part of the yoar at lest, be your own green-grocor. The borne gardien le worth trylng as; a business rosource. 0Pcourse, a great deal dopeads on how you deal wltb It. To begia wltb, the man wbo le golng ta tura hie barren back yard Into a source af Incarne bas ta .bave some Ideas as ta bow It can be don. effactiveIy. Thora are enough simple text- books on tbls subject ta papor the wslls of a bouse. There lsu't a lot ta learu before a start may be made. The great secret le to mako tbe gardien an economleat. One man wlll oaly got one crop frorn the same oel that another man wlll get tbree crops tram. This la lsrgoly a matter of layiag out, and plucking out; laying 'out la alternatian, and plucking out In Urne. (Coneluded on page 15.) A back yard In Toronito whlch was utlllzed. It La .a M. à -omt of a dollar's worth of Seed.",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. Courlerettes. \"g\"0 NTARId children's ignorance oi tbe Bible Is phenomenal,\" says Dr. John Seatb, Supern* tendent of Education. The, solution seems to be that the Good Book wlil bave to be fllmed and shown in the movie bouses. Out lu Oregon tbey bave dlscovered a sboplifters' syndIcate. Tbere's no denylng tbat the West Is progressive. Tbe Federals are up against It, so W speak. No, net the baseball league -we mean the Mexican cbaps. Tbe age o! berolsm. bas not passed. The other day a young man ln Iowa trled te elope wlth a girl that weigbed 334 pounds. Tbere, Is to be no fuss about the McAcioo-Wilson wedding at tbe White House. This ranks with our finest bits o! fiction. Tbe modern girl Is mucb more at home at a keyboard than a wasb- board. Governor O'Hara, o! Illinois, and his wlfe, wiil seek employmeut, in fac- tories and raills to probe conditions under wbicb youug girls work. At Ieast, they announce tbat they wlll. Tbey have a way of dolng tblngs wlth brass band accompantiment across the liue. A 19-year-old girl was kidnapped, lu the beart of Ohlcago's business dis- trict by a reWeted sultor wbo came along lu an automobile. Botter ad- ventures nowadays ln the cities thaln lu the wilds. A niovie actor lu California was kiled by a liou while poslng for a photo-play. Unexpected realism. New York man bas speut 23 years and $186,000 lu the courts to recover $48,000. Sometblng like outtlng off oue's bond to cure a toothiache. At the summer militia camps this year the Canadian troopa wlll all wear kbali, tbereby loslng their old4ime appearauce as so many Josepbs, wear Ing tbe coat of many colours. Iu Hou. Dr. PYne's new text-book on mauners, for use lu Ontario scbools, it Is laid down tbat parleur malds must use tbe back stairs. The average parlour maid bas dlscovered long ago tbat the back stairs Is the Ideal place We spoon wltb ber \"s'teady.\"1 Onitario teachere overwbelmlngly defoated a motion te abollsh Victoria Day. Imagine anly sanie man asklng teachers te 'wlpe a bollday off the calendar! Frail Woman Agaln.-News de- spatches tell us that scientiste; bave dIscovered a pecullar case lu Vir- ginia, wbere a wornan's beart and liver have changed 'sides. Juet another proof-4f that were nee1ed-of the fiebleness of woman. Lawyer-And Man.-The frieuds of James P. Haverson, K.C., are Inclined te regard hlm as a human Droblem, of the traffic. He went to Mr. Haver son to ask for Information about it He bad made up bis mmnd to accepi tbe position and devote bis energie-ý to the cause of the traffic. Tbe story goes that be .was tre mendouslfy surprised to receive an bour's lecture on the topic of a young jouruallst's folly ln taking sucb a course as a prelude to gettlng the instructions he needed. Sir Richard's Honour.-Out in Bni- tlsb Columbia tbey are said to takc their polltlcs more senlously tban do the Eastern Canadians, but frequeutly there le a gleam cf good-natured humour and badi- nage lu the de- bates of the Br*- Net long ago Sir Richard Mc- Bride, the pre- mier of the pro- vin-ce, went soutb and was the guest of a Cali- fornia universit, whicb bonoured hilm witb the de- ic gree of Doctor of Richard MeBride. Laws. He returned, took bis \u0026st lu the House, and the news of bis new degree soon became noleed abroad lu the corridors. It was not long until a Labour memt- ber of the Legislature arose and gravely drew the attention of the M.P.P.'s to a report of the honour done the premier lu a forelgu land. \"I congratulate Sir Richard,\" ho sald, \"for it cannot be galusald that be well deserves the degroe. Ho bas doctored more laws than any other man lu this province!\" And even Sir Richard smiled. Ambiguous.-Extracet from Hon. Dr. Pyne's new text-book en manners for Ontario school chldren: \"A parleur mald Is no more privi- leged to use the front stairs than tbe Cook.\" Wbat use could the parleur mald make of the cook, auyway? Are L.onga - Vita Brevls .... You brohie my beart te pass the tima away\" is the title of eue of the uew popular waltz songe. Yes, Della, art la long andtitue Is fooeting. Stili a Bit te Do.-Yesterday was \"elean up\" day lu Toronto, by order of the Fire Chief. There still romains considerable work We be doue, lu spite of tbe efforts of thse citizens. There are a few woruout poilticlaus bang- ing arouud the Clity Hall. 8 X The More the Merrier.-Toronto minister wan'ts -that clty te establlsh clvic golf links lu the parirs. WhY not? To the other excite- ments cf urban Ilfe will then bo added the whirr ef a golf bail past your nose, followed *by the golfer's wamning cry of \"Fore!\" Just a i nt.-Moscow bas a club which Insista ou silence. If a member speaks ho must pay a fine. Thsis ls merely mentioued as an item 'tlat mlgbt laterest the Canadian IJ)FM rA 1SP1 Up-to-date.-Teacber-\"ý'Wbat is the perfect tenise of the verb 'to lnvest' \" Johnny-\"To investigate.\" The Modern Way.-Èirst Thug- \"Now we must figure out our hune of d efence.\" Second Tbug-\"We baven't a great deal o! money. What are we te do?\" Third Tbug-\"-ýWould\u003elt ho cbes.per to bire a big lawyer or to buy the Jury?\" The Test. Ho loved ber. Noue could doubt IL. He proved it sure euougb. Ho llsteuted to ber poetry And called It buily 'stuff. TUrne WUiI TeiI.-«Mr. J. H. Fisher, M.P,, Is a friend of ail the -world and a goed story-teller We beet. Wbile Sir William Mackenzie was lu Ottawa recently discusslng Canadian North- emu matters wItb the Dominion Gov- eruiment, Mr. Fisher undertook to en- courage hlm with a story. \"Do you know, 9lrý William, your preseut relations witb the goverument remiud me of a ate\u003ery whlch la told o! a namesake o! my own down South? Rastus Fisher was in the wbite-wash- Ing business, aund had receutly marrlod a woman who bad been a servant at the Squlre's bouse- Zbortly after this suspicious event, the' Squire met them, and tbey beldi a littie conversa- tien wblch raul sometbing lîke this: \"Well, Rastue,\" sald the Squlre, \"frow are you?\" \"ino, Squlre, flue!\" \"Lots of whlte-waahlug Wo be done, l[Rastus 7\" \"Yes, Squire, I'se gettin! ail the~ work I eau do. Yes, SquIre, lots o! work.\" \"Aud how is Miranda, Rastus?\" \"Well, uow say, Squire, that woman dons worry me. Do you know, Squire, she's always askiug me for moue\u003e'? Every time 1 go home site asks me for Morley. Sometimes It's fifty cents, sud sometimes a quarter, and some- times ton cents. But she's always ,asklng for money.\" \"TPhat's strauge, Rastus. Always asldng ypu for money, eh! WelJ, what tioes abh do with ail the money yon givo hser \"'Well, I don't know, Squire. You see,I1 habn't given ber noue yet.\" Sir William Is sald te have enJoyed great deal about the cil fields of Mexico, and the thing that strikes us as strange is that nobody seems to have thought of pouring somne of that cil oni the troubled waters. Anybody Want the Job?-A United States Supreme Court justice bas de- clared that a lot of fiighty woýmen should he spanked instead of being liprisoned. Now we are open to receive nom- inations for the Important post of officiai chastiser. Don't ail speak at once. 8omething Real Left. The modern girl is a priceless peari- (Oh, wonderful is a woman) Ou'tside of rats and spats and bats The rest of ber Is buman. Crushed.-\"Tbat girl Is a particu- lar frlend of mine.\" \"Friend, perhaps, but nlot particu- lar.\" One Advantage.-There ls one ad- vantage the mother camnel has over the human mother-she is nlot so apt to be awakened in the night by a cry for a drink. Candid, At Least.-It is re- fresbing sometlmes to get a bit of pure, unvamni'shed. trutb ln the papers-even if one bas to go tW the advertbsing coluums. ~Here is an advertlsement fromn tbe Toronto Telegram: \"For Sale - Large family Bible, beautiful- wedding pre- sent, neyer used, ten dollars.\" .ommo Sense rmnatôr IS drIms up tbe Srcaffl andabou. Cýomm9a, $On** R61101 an~d \".d Dug Ect*PmInmtor soid under the enguaant. STAM M ER ING IovoecmeriomveIy. Our natural me\"hd perae yrsonaura spech Grade. lePpl eeywIIere. Write for free ad-. 'THE ARNOTT MNTIUTE, Berlin, Cu. THE RAVAGES OF A CLOTHES MOTH alre ubiluitous. Nothlng la sate -Furs, Carpets, Blankets or Clothes-- from this p est unleas uprinkled wth \"Keating's. Seeyour thingu are quite dry and duat with Keuatlpg' Iowder., Tins, l0e,, 25c., 85c. \"ICeat- tng's\" KIlla Mothe, But-be sura it 18- \"ICesting's.\" M il A May Day T1rreat For You Let the Knox Cooks send you eriough GELATIN to make six plates of Cherry Spouge 1 tablespoonful Knox Sparkiug Gelatitie. *cup coid water. 1 cup cherry j uice. Juice of one lernon. j cup sugar. icups cherries. WNhitesof two eggs. Soak gela tine in the cold wate- 5 minutes and dissolve in the hot cherry julce. Add Cherries \u003cstolned nu leut Iii 1alves) and lemnonjuice. M\"1 he 1el 1s co and begin. ninp ta set, add whic 0 e ggs beaten untîl stiff.e Moid aun he ray ta serve turn on ta \"erving nis aa aruish %ith whipped crealu, putting choppe cherries over the top. NOTE: This saine recipe may be used with other cauned fruits. T HIS wiIl be our treat to you fer the meuth of May. You will be so de- lighted you wilii' always have Knox Gelatine in your home. Senci us your grocer's naine, enclos- ing a 2-cent stamp and we will send you Wc want every reader of tbilpubli-. cation to know how t. .seKNO GELATINE for ail kinds ofDser, Jellies, Puddings, Ice Cream, Sherbets, Saladsand, Candes, 'W wilI send you, frea, an illustrated book of recitea with the Gelatine Chaas.BnÇoxC. 610 Knox Ave. L ohnstown, N. Y. Branch Factry m i Montreal Can.",
         "CANADIAN COURIIER. A Book'about Corsets We have prepared a taste- fully illustrated Hittie book showing manynewmodels in d/a:gdce Corsets Will gladly send you a copy free upcn request. It will help you choose the model best suited ta your figure. CROMPTON CORSET CO. Limited 78 York Street, TORONTO The erchants Bank Of Canada H-EAD OFFICE - MONTREAL presîdent, Sir H. Mantagu Allant. Vice-President, I. W. BlaclcweIL GeOneral M\u0026anager. E. P. Hlebden. PaId»up Capit~al.........$7O0O,000 Reserve Fundi and Undi. vlded Profits ..........6,911,050 218 BRANCHES IN CANADA General Baflkîfg Butines* Transacted. SÂVINGS DEPARTMENT at al branches. Deposits of $1.00 and upwards~ received, and Interest allowed aibest current rates. TORONTO OFFICES: le Wellington St. West; 1400 Queen st. West (Parkdaie); 406-408 Par- liament St.; Dundas St and Ron- cesvalles Ave. throw natui'aI light into dark roomns. thus adding ta the beauty af interiors and materiaU\u003e' reducing the cost of aýrtificis.' illurnlnation. For stores. public buildings, dweiiinga, etc. Let us figure wlth YOU on the installation you require. Thec Luifer Prui Compay Limited 100 King St. W.. Terenti. Oui. Utilize the Back Yard (Concluded from page 13.) We shall have more to say on this head in succeeding issues. There are several adivantages to be gained from- this ides, of back yard gardýening. The first is, of course, the saving that is consequent upou being your own green-grocer. This is a very real saving. In the summer time particularly, salads and green stuifs formn a great part of the diîet, and while it is true that the price of ail sorts o! vegetables is lower in the summer than in the winter, stiil, in the aggregate, the amouait of nioney which xvould be paid to, the green- grocer in the ordiuary way, and which. would be saved if the householder grew his own green stuifs, would Ibe considerable. Perhaps more important still- la the fact that the quality of the vegelables grown at home must ýbe better than that o! those sold over the counter. The reasoin is obvious. Vegetables ikept ln the store for several days are bound to deterlorate iu the keeping. Take sweet corn, for example. Lt bas been proved by experimentalists that four hours a!ter plucking, fifty per cent. of the sugar Iu the sweet corn is changed into starch. If this Is the case four hours after plucking, Istands ta reason that wheu the cobs Ihave beeu laying in the window of a store for two or three days, the corn \u003chas lost a great deal of its nutrition. The very taste is different. Go out into a field and pluck saime cobs o! corn, and toast themt over a fire there in the field. They taste very differ- ent ta corn which was brought ta the dealer on Mouday, sold on Wed- nesday, and boiled on Thursday, in the home. And corn is flot the only vegetable that suifera by keepiug. Lt is infinitely better when dinuer time comes ta go out ta the once back yard, now a garden, 'and pluck whatever is wanted for dinuer, thus having it fresh, thtan It is ta buy, say, a sack of potatoes that reached the store no- body kuows when. Then, again, turuing the ýback yard into a gardon produciug vegetables and fiowers makes the property more valuable. It Is seif-evîdent that soul improves lu quality the more It Is used. The more you tako out cf the sal the better the condition in whlch \u003e'ou leave It. And If you own your own hause, and have equipped It wlth a garden, It Is easier to seli it, for a bouse and gardoen Is worth more ta a purChaser than a hanse, with a dump- ing ground ut the back. Most people buy bouses nowadays ta titra tbem over at a profit later on. Que way ta ansura the profit [s ta add sometbing tangible ta the property. Thora shauld be no uead ta point out at leugth the pleasureo f gardon- iug. Wbon a Man la warkiug far lmself, he will feel a goad deal more 11nteet ln wbat hae la dolng than If ho were worklung for samebody aise. If the workiug man wore askad ta wark at lits ordluary job lui tho aven- lug after working hard ail day, ho would not ha yery eager. But ho la eager 'ta camte home, and after supper, 'put his time and strengtb into dlg. glng, and Plautlng, and trImmlng. ÂPart front the tact that hoe la attalu- lng a reducticu lu expense afi upkeep, ha likou ta sees the work ai his hand PrOsPerlng as a roslt af hua effort. He works ail day, it may be, at brick- laylng. When ho has finlshed he can Point ta the building u1poI whlch hoe has been, at Wark and say, \"I helped ta ma-ke that\" But ho cajinot say, \"I made that, and it la mine.\", lia the case oi his gardon Lt la different. HoIE can say ta bis frienda, \"Ses that gar- den? I made that out af an ardlinary back yard. 1 have made it look as if it belenged to samebody Instead af ILs baing dirty and unsîghtly. And 1 have made IL praduce my vegetables for the summer, and thus iîghteu my wie's housekeeping axpenses. And I have had a go-od many happy hours looking aftar IL, and watching It groW aut of nothinýg lnto somethlng.\"1 This la just the Lime of the, year ta bagIn. The outlay Isn't rnuch. The chiai Item ail the way through la olbow greasa. And there's ne denying, a City af gardons le better than a citf ai back yards. W E challenge YOU- we challengre the world---to find or create a bette r car or bette r value for your money than this four -cyli*nder Russell-Kn ight It gives you a dollar's Worth of actual value for every dollar of its purchase price. (The 35% duty you pay on foreign cars adds flot orle dollar to their actual worth.) Yet this RUSSELL-KNIGIIT \"Four' '-the superior of cheaper \"Sixes ' -the equal of the highest priced \"Six' -an be liad in 5-passenger Touring Car model for $2975 F. 0. B. Factory. Don't forget to sit lu the tonneau of the Russell- Knight. Experience the luxury of upholstery so per- fect that you cau't \"touch bottom\" on the roughest roads. Enjoy the pleasurable comfort of a seat 48\"1 wide-6\"1 to 8\"1 wider than that on most other cars. Its genuine hand-buffed leather wears botter-Iýts genuine hand-sorted hair etays softer than the cor- respondlng materls In any other car. Its 17-coat color-finIsh-highestýgrade extension Pantasote top-patented safety tire carrier-extra de- mountable rim-complete tool equipment-choîce of colors and option on tires, put the 'RUSSELL-KNIGHT \"FOUR,\" in equipment-as weil as materials and con- struction-u the $5,000 class. $2975 Cali and examine thîs great car to-day. You will get more real tacts-more personal satisfaction-tbis way than from catalogues, hearsay or \" 1free advioe.\" Russell Motor Car Co., Limited WEST TORONTO Baranches: 'Toronto, C8 19-71 Montrual, Hamilton, Vancouver, Melbourne. Winpeg, (504) Talk Correctly and You W111 Think Correctly =S'ihod EuIsh )oet aliptiiot tkought. Get it theii habit of cate1si ume qod you wiil Soms he caueleu ia tliought To t\"iu correctl snd talk co.ectly, t. M\u0026h cor.cay andi tuik cor.ecty you will id A DESK-ROOM 0F ERRORS IN ENGLIS A very sericeable little book. -Right to the. Point.\" '12m\u003e\u003c\u003e clth 240\u003e pos $1. P.P. NORMAN4 RICHARDSON, 12 F. We1gt.a St., T.r.mlle",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. Lovera of gardens and grounds shouid know that at Raynes Park, London, England, Messrs. James ýCarter \u0026 Ca. have the -inest and most complets testlng and trial grounds In the world. Their equipment and the unique methode em-ployed guarantee the quallty of their seeda. For genera- lions they have been cultivatlng, se- lectlng and perfectlffg until Carters J7ested Seeds have reached the hlgbi- est percentage of purity and germina- ation. In England, where the art ef gard- ening le meut hlghly developed, Cat- eru Soede rank firet. Ask any gard- ener wlth experlence la Great Brltain -lie wlll know Carter. '~~4In Canada, Carters Seeds have achieved a tremendougs uccess, both on large estates and ln simaller gardens. We iinort these seeds direct from Raynes Park lna carry a coniplete stock at Our - A Toronto warebouse. We issue an American Te s e d Catal tie. wîi aIl prites in, Amner .an money. T'c tinefulsesee-ted varieties of elewran %S 4U 1 planting and cultivat4on. 'A cop\u003e' of tlds Catalogue wili be malled you If yen are tntereaied lIn upkeep of Lawnt PREE. Write for ît tO-day. Tennis - Courts or Golft-Course, write for th Prcileai ( i n er.\" iey CARTERS TESTED SEEDS, Ine. làOoSy Ë4CrtursTested GnU SOM\u0026a 133 B King Street, Toronto HOME BAN-K 0F CANADA NOTICE 0F DIVIDEND. Notice la hardi\u003e' given that a Dlvldend at -the rate of SEVEN PER CENT. (7%) PER ANNUM upon the paid-up Capital ýStock o! thia Bank lias been de- clared for the THRREE MONTHS endlng the gsat o! May, 1914, and that thie samne W111 ie- payable at the He.a.a.\u0026ncison anld ailter Monday \u003etheý lot o! June, 1914. The Tranafer Books wlll lie closedl from the. 16'th to the 8011' May, 1914, botli days Inclusive. Toronto, April 20tli 1914. Ignorance Is a Crime Especilliy, Sf-XUAI 19015CC- WhIdi eu*\"P assar social III, and 80 much Unhap¶\u003eiuess. ete, yca nIt afford ta ba wîW*t sézus akame of Dr. ltaII's Sexai KNOWLEDGE By]Dr.Wintield SceittH Hiead of pbysioiegy N. W. TJal,. Medlr.i 3, hool Authorit! os B.î M atiers. Plaia TIruths of Sex LU.e eer! perton needs Io kaiow; ewýôkAit Safety la mantiase relation; ..-St IIDangers or exuUl abuse@l. f ed t. Read 'soclaîariî,\"veereal dsettes. lluadrded; 32Opame 5aaaed by sexual ignorance: ONLy$.opWpalGd *'Iakes\" on oexal weaknecg; ________secrets__ ofexul tresgth. SEX FACTS ALL NEED KNOW ISeusi Knowledeeforavewy wonan, girl, wi le\u0026 mother; assagi Kaowiedgl oi eveiy man., bey, bibsa \u0026 fa ibet Ail îa one va iii. lain ai, le,incileative language; *SexuIKowldge'\u00264 geic\"Comblaed -=AIL FOR .1.00 Postage 1e, Ceta; maltei onier Plais viappes. W. ROLLWAY, ?ubIithet'i Repressatativ, BUACK LAKE, QUFJEC By Order of the Board, JA19ES MAISON, General Manager. lOnly 2Cýylindemr 0 -wh -£ Notor mmR POWER Thse t\u003enly two cyihider dotaclai rowboat m«otor-beats an\u003e thLgo thrmsarkeat. A r.alcsgine. Poe f.,fastqulet andamootbr rssniing, vibrtionesla Stats o the first \"kick\" and reverses enaiy. KOBAN ROWIOAT NOTOR overcomne. vi. brait;on tihe big- geat obj- tion to 3HP ,owboat motori.g. %Il r.Du, aisheugine abut on. W\"dl, Rnde par oe o5 Jr. If y0u , goitsg tfb~et. Feul partloulsrs on r q-set. Agént. satedi. KOSAN MI'G. Co. IN ANSWERING ADVERTISEMENTS MENTION \"ITRE CANADIAN COURIER.\" Affa irs in 'Montreal By MONTr'.EALER T HE Vox Popuil having been board, and Mederic Martin having been sworn ln as Mayor of Montreal ln due and ancient form, hie bas started out to make is administration speC- tacular, to say the least. Let It not be understood as a fact that Mederic Martin's methodical political pyrotechnics ls madness. If, perchtance it is, there Is the simon- pure mothod in It. During bis cam- paige he promIsed to \"do tbings\"r i hoe were elected, and he bas surely started out to do tbem. He an- nounced that at ail times ho would be accessible to the bumblest citizen, and would be a very democrat a.mong derno- crats In bis officiai station, and was going to give everyofle employment, or the \"glad band\" or somethlng. Mederlc Martin, bowever, is flot tb£ man to stop at amail tblngs, and so lie la trylng to spend a couple of million dollars for pavements and otber clvlc betterments-wbere It wlll do hlm, at least, the Most good. And in order that no mistake ln that direction may be made, wlth the aid of Controllers Cote and Hebert, he bas badl hlmself made the Poo-Bah of the new admin- istration, and bie la IT wbon It cornes to dollng out positions of ail kinds under the civie government. THE members o! the Chambre de TCommerce and their friends, ta the number ot seven or eiglit hundred, lat week vislted Ottawa and made a descent an the gaverament witb. a request to hurry up, withou. more ado, and buld the Georgian B1a\u003e' Canal. Tbey are a.lready eagerly awaiting the report o! the Commis- slon, wbichbhadl aiready been appoînted ta consider -the man\u003e' very important questions referring ta this project. According ta engineers' estimates, the canal can be put tbrough at a cost o! a hundred million dollars or there- abouts. Of course, a mere bagatelle like that la notblng to prevent immedi- ate construction. But engineers' esLi mates are very uncertain factors upon whlch to figure the actuai coat of the construction of so great a canal. Un-. expected obstacles, similar ta -the fre- quently sllpping Cule bra Cut la the Panama Canal, are liable to arise at any time and many tîmes ln so lengtby a route, and greatly Increase the estlmated ceai. Ase the canal could: be af no possible use until It was entirely completed, it la but fair that the lnquiry itt Its feasiblllty -and, ail other factors should be thorougli and exhaustive before the ffrat spadj- fui o! earth la excaLvated. There la ana'ther feature about the advocacy of the Georgian Bay'route by Montreaiers and residents of the Ottawa valiey, regarding whlch lit tic or no comment lias yet been made. its prol2lQters advocate It, net as a supple. ment to the Welland Canal. Great. Lakes and St. Lawrence River deep waterway, wlIlch would benefit ever y ,port aiong the entire route, but la direct oppositionl te that; proJec , the entIre abandonuleft of which they vehemently urge. If such a plan were pursued, practicaly every city on th-, Great Lakes whlch lies south. of the \u003emoutli e! Georglan Bay or on the St. Lawrence River above Montreal woulG lie left \"higl a.nd dry,\" so far as trans- Atlantic ahipments are concerned. The question naturally arises: Why should the whole of the Dominion spend a hundred mllifon dollars or more for the sole, benefrt of a omali section, and partlcuiarly wben it la demantled . I connection witli au~ abandonmeat of the present plans, whlch course weuld worL a distinct and laating detriment to 'the remainder o! the country? ONTREAL la rIglit In the millst M o f an active campslgu for a generai . ean-up. IUnder the leadership of the Publlcity Associa- tion, an unusually comprebenaive pro- gramme lias been devied, iacluding a day -oaeh for cellar, front and reai yard cleanlng, another for removîn ,g dandellons, whth whlch the City lu over-run, one for \"lswattlng\" the Oies, and the afifli for washing up the kiddlea. .. . ..... . ............... B\u0026BCottonnsna p n atent ackage fertieser Thzig e eals ple rîighb. lanuing thks Cotton yunJoa'i, touch the roll. I stays in the package, wrapped as Ît Ieft our laboratory._____ B \u0026 B Cotton stays clean. It mîimizes risk of infection. Each fibre ils passed through 21 prccesses to give you an ideal Cotton. Then our patent package protects it. Think of this. What is the use o[ Aseptic Cotton il you handie and expose it. The B \u0026 B package is made to prevent this. Remember this in huying. 10c up-at Druggisis Ratier \u0026 Blaclc, Claicato and New Yoek Makars of Suroicisi Dra.sagm etc. Home Uses for Absorbent For dressing wounds. Absorbing di. chargea. Covering salves and poultices. Applyingantiseptics. Batling eyeas. Absorbing perspiration. Applying face powder. Filtering habysmilk. Cerking mjilk boules. Straining liquida. etc. Hotel' Directory KING EDWARD HOTEL Toronto, Canada. -Freproof- Accommodation for 760 guests. 81.50 ut,. Amnericen and European Plans. MOSSOP MOTEL S(Ljmlted) . TORONTO, ONTARIO. European Plan. Absolutely Flreproof' Rooms wlth or without bath front $1$ and up per day. PALMER HOUSE TORONTO . - CANADA H. *V. O'Connor, Proprietor. Rate--$ZOO toe 8.00. LA OORONA \u003e A FavriteMontreal Motel, 453 te 6 Faoie GUY Street. Room with .use of bath. ... $31.50 and $8 Room wlth private bath. .32, $2.50 and il Cafe the Beat. La Corona and its ser- vice acknowledged Montreal's beat bt the charges are no hlgher than, other Orat-clas hotels. THE 14EW RUSSELL Ottaya, Canada. 250 Reoms. Amercan Pln......30 tu $.00 European Plan.......1.50 to $3.60 $150.000 apent upon Improvementa. THE NEW FREEMANIS HOTEL (European Plan.) One Hundred and Flfty Rooms. Single routas, w1thoiît bath, $1.50 and $2.00 per day; rooma wlth bath, 32.00pe day and upwards. St James and Notre Dame StS., Montreal QUEEN'S MOTEL, MONTREAL. $150 te $4.00. Amerîcan Plan. 800 Roomo. THE TECUMSEH HOTEL London, Canada. Americen Plan, $3.00 per day and un. All rooma wlth runnlng bot and cold water, eaos telephonea. Grill room open 8~ to 12 P.n. Geo. H. O'Nell, Proprietor.",
         "(A,NADIAN COURIERI. Service The intending investor or one who has invest- mente, should keep in touch with financial re- ports on those securities he owns or intends buy- ing. It is Most import- ant iu determining what you should seli or what you shail buy. We will keep yen lu toucli with market conditions and report on your iuvestments. This l8 without obligation on your part. F. Bl. Deacon, \u0026 CÙ. Kembors Toronito Stock Exchange INVESTM ENTS 97 Bay Street Toronto -canada CawtLa Mulock \u0026 Co. vu\"$r of Teroctto Stock Exchange Brokers And Bankers 12 KING STREET EAST TORONTO, CANADA CASR A1\u003eDES-'CAWLOCK. TORtON PELLAIT PELLATT Toronto stock Excbange 401 Traders Bankc Buiding TO RO NTO BONDS AND STOCKS u\"s COBALT STOCKS BOUGHT AND SOLD ON COMMISSION Pzivake wire connecion wat.W. I-I. GOADBY \u0026 CO., Menibe New Yagk C-ANA-D-A aidthe CONTINENT 0F EUýROPE EsvWuux-D,.y vie. RAiH-AxTrwap Twni SVAXW STÂAXZus phlOts flin the GET EATZR AJLWÂY Agent , 261 B ray, Nt~ w ork, N.Y IMMAGNATL51i Burgain Days in Stocks CA NAD)IANS should remember that the prescrnt decline In the stock market is world-wide, and not local. These are bargain days for men who have courage. The better Canadian stocks are selllng at a level much below their intrinsic value. Two years ago the prices were too hlgh; to-day the prices are tou 10w. Of course, ouly a few of the wise unes will bey. This has always been the rule, and there ls no reaszon to believe that the present generation is much wlser than that wliicli precodoed It. The tremendous increase in savings banks deposits shows that the, av-erage ('anadian lias been very timid during the past three months. Hle will p)robably continue to bie timid until stocks have again risen to a normal level, and lie will tins miss the great opportunities at present starlug hlm ln the face. Did Toronto Lose $800,000O? THEORETICALLY every large clty ýhould bie paylng the saine rate of Interest on lis borrowings. There le no reason why Montreal should pay a different rate from Toronto or Ottawa or Winnipeg. Perhaps the newer citles In the West should pay a littIe higher rate since thelr future ls flot so fully assured. Yet the rate whlcb even these Western citles should pay should flot be materially higher than that pald by Eastern citîes. Small cities usually pay a higher rate than large clies. Any dIfference ln the rate of interest paid by cîties is due largely to the difference lu the calibre ef the men Wrho are at the head of affaire, and to, the system which these men work under. In this respect Moutreal le one of the best managed citdes, If flot the best, In Canada. This la surprlslng, consider- lng the general charges that are made that the city goverument of Montreal la very poor. Montreal may spend Its money badly, but it borrows It well. The aldermen, elected by the people, do the spendlng, but they do nlot Inter- fers wlth the borrowing. Even the C'ity Treasurer bas Ilttle to do wtth this most Important function. When Moutreal wants to borrow money or Bell bonds, It puts the whole matter ln the bauds of the general manager of one ef the largeet banke. This gentleman, flot bélng elected by the people and not auswerable te them, conducte hie business on purely business prîn- ciples. H1e gets the mnoney where and when ho can get it the cheapest. He 1s ln touch with the money markets of the world and has the very best available Information. Hence hle lu l a position to give the very best advice te hle client, the 'City of Montreal. Toronto works on a dîffereuit priniciple. The officiaIs et the Toronlto City Hall seemn te, think that they lknow mort, ihiai the leading bankers in Toronto. Perhaps they do. But the busines men of Toronto trust the bankere of To- route and go te them for financial adice. The corporatIon. controlled by the City Treasurer, the Bloard of Control and the Bloard of Aldermen, le the only Institution In that clty whtchi dIedalue toi ask Sir Edmund Walker, Sir Edmund OsIer, Mr. D. R. WIlkte and the other bank preeldents for advire ln nioney matters. lu brief. the City of Toronto selle lis debentures direct to bond coin- panties lu Toronto, New York, Boston and London witheut the aid of any par- tîcular bauk or syndicate of bankers. A Tale of Two Cilles Taking these two cilles as typ)es, their methods and the resuits obtalned make an Interesting eomiprîson. Last year lts, City o! Moutreal made thre flotatiens, each of whlehi amnounted te about seven millions of dollars. The tirat flotation was nmade lu M.Narci, the second lu Mlay, and the third lu No- vember. The firet two flotations wvere made at par, and the thîrd at ninety- elght-and-a-half. Flguring the aveýragze for the year, whenever the City of Montreel slgued a note for a huudred( dollars lest year, It got $99,50 lu cash. This le a tolerably satlsfactory resuit. Accordlng te C'anadiau practico any clty that can oel Ite securitîes se close te par le; makîng the beet kind ot finaucial record, provldlug that the rate of interest la a nominal rate. Now compare tbis wlth Toronto, and there le a different story te tell. During the year 191.3 Toronto sold forty-feur lots of bonds, as compared 'wlth the three sold by 'Montreal. Thiese lots varied, Iu sîze from $487 te $5,231,667. They were ef a varlegated serles of flotations, and thoy brought variegated prices. The total was $16,079,204, as compared witb Moiitreal's $21,300,000. Toronto's Variegated Finanding The following table gives the Toronto sales by montha: lu 1913 A mo unt. Gros Price. Rate, Per Cent. January .............. $5,280,334 $92.50 4 February................9.733 91.18 4 March................ 1,912,364 90.50 4 April............. ......607,307 90.5 4 May...................690,260 91.00 4 June................... 31,633 88.17 4 July.......................116,014 86.64 4 1,006,000 97.28 4% Auguet.................. 6,000 97.06 4% SePtember.............4,501,667 83.57 4 October............... 578,187 87.00 4 364,000 95.66 4% November ..............254,039 84.67 4 1,000 98.35 4% December...............121,666 85.00 4 700,000 91.69 4% Total..................*14,002,204 $89.00 4 Total ................. 2.077,000 95.00 4% Grand Total...........*16,079,204 It Winlibe Reen that the City of Toronto sold two classes et debentures. thoso3 paYing four per cent., and those paying four and a hait per cent. Of the former it dispOeed et a little over fourteen million dollars' werth at an aver- age prIce et somewhere about $89.0o. 0f the latter it sold a littie over t'we millions at an average price ef about $96.00. Thus fer every hundred dollars et money borrowed Toronto recely.ed $89 lin the case et the tour Per cent. bonds and $95 ln the case et the four and a half ýper cent, bonds. These prlces are much lower than those received by'Montreal, whlch obtaiued $99.50 for every $10,0 et debentures sold. Ail the Mentreal îssues were tour aud a liait per cents. Ini figuring te rate ot interest pald by any large clity It la neceissar\u003e' te \u003czen- eider net only the nominal but the actual rate. por example, a four i\u003eer cent.' 40-year bond sold at 90, or ton points less than par, means that the city selllng CORPOTATlON - LMITED VSY^\"USNEDo 890, Tom-om. MONTRE L ONDOM \" Canadian City Debentures Hamilton, Ont. Sherbrooke, Que. Vicloroa, B.C. Fort William. Ont. Calgo'y, Alla. Si. Boniface. Mon. Prince Albert,. Sa.,k. Kclowna, B.C. Income Yield 4tý% to 6% Foul portlkularil on request. Canadian Goverument Municîpîl and Corpoiration Bonds Chef Office for CMaad: TOR01NTO ALFRED WRIGHT, Manaser. IRE iIH\u0026MAULSON, Lîmîtad COied Toronto Agents. BONDS FOR $100 Many people of smail means are poss.dily net aware of thei opper- tunlty for sate investment orllered by our $100 Bonds. The email lu-. vostor bas iooked upon owning Bonds as rather beyond hinî-tliik- ing of Bonds as being onWy in de- nominations 0f $1,000, or saine other equally Impossible suin. But $100 wlI buy one of our Bonds, gilng the holder of lt precisely the' saites security as those ot the largest donomninations. They are a securlty lu whlch Executors and Trustees art, by law authorîzed to invest TRUST FUNDS Shan we send you copy of oui, Annuel Report andi fou particulars? Canada Permanent Mortgage Corporation Paid-up Capital and Reservo Fund exceed Ten Million Dollars. TORONTO STREET, TORONTO. EstabhIshed z855. The imperwa Trusts Conpany Of Can*a»a 4%AIIoed on Depornts 4,YWithdrawabe bY CheqUe 5 % Paid on Guaranteed lnvestaneflti MORTGAGES PURCHASED HRAIo OMCB*- la Rlekm.ond St West. Toeoto TeL M. 214'",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. FRONT RANK I NVESTM ENTS The unique record of Canadian Municipal Debentures prop- erly places them, for safety, ln the front rank of ai invest- ment$. The following constitute an unu8ually attractive group to select from: 1. They can b. purchased in amounts of approximately $100 and upwards. 2. They mature at practically ail perioda from one ta fifty years. 3. They are offered to yield from 4!2 ta 6%4 per cent i nterest. ONTARIO GOVT 450 OWEN SOUND, ONT. ..90 TP. BARTON, ONT. .4.90% BROCI(VILLE, ONT. _ ..5.00% HESPELER, ONT. 5.00% BRANDON, MAN. 6.0 Tp. BRUCE, ONT. 5.2 SYDNEY, N. S .......... 5.20%-/ BURLINGTON, ONT. .. . .5.20% MILTON, ONT .......... 5.25% NORTH BAY, ONT. 5.5 ELMIRA, ONT.........5.25% GRIMSBY, ONT ......... 5.25% SUDBURY, ONT ........ 5.38%0 ALBERTA SCHOOL DISTRICTS Invlt ment Bankers Yield. ST. LAURENT, Q. _-5.38% NELSON, B.C.......... 5.50% TP. RICHMOND, B.C.. 5.40%,ý MEDICINE HAT, ALTA. ...ý.............5.38% STREETSVILLE, ONT.. .5.50% DIST. N. VANCOUVER, B.C ...... .......... ..5.50% SUDBURY (SEP. SCHOOLS), ONT. ..5.750/ TRANSCONA, MAN. .6.00% ESTEVAN, SASK.-6.00% WATROUS, SASK ....6.50%7 .. . . . . . . . . . . 6.75%?/ Write for Pull Parficulars, Gladly Sent on Requesi. A. E. AMES \u0026 CO, Union Bank Builing, Toronto. EstabIlshed lm8 The Cna..a Ba-nk of Commerce Head Offce : TORONTO Paid-ap Capital, $15O,OO0,; Reserveé Fuaâ, $13,500,O SIX EDMUND WÂLKER, C.V.O., LL.D., D.C.L ....... Presîdent. ALEXÂNDER LAIRD................... General Manager. JOHN AIRD ..................... Assistant General Manager. Branchw In svery Province of Canada and ln the. United States, England and Mexico Traveliers' Cheques The Travelrs' Choques ied, by tusa Bank are a very convenient form ln which to provide funda when travelling. They are issued ln de- nominations of $10 $30 $50 or $100 aud -the exact amount payable in the. principal countries cf the world la ehown on the. face of eaoh choque. Thoe choques may b. used to pay Hotels, Railway and Bteamship Compm.ni.s, Ticket aud Toturlat Agencies and leadlng mercliants, etc. Each purchaser of these coques la provided wlth a liet of the Baflk's p\u003erincipal paying agents and correspondants throughout the world. They are isuued b\u003ey every brandi cf -the Bank. Iil Is paying about four and three-quarters per cent. on the money actually re- ceived, while a four and a haîf per cent, bond sold at par means 41/ per cent. interest. In making comparisons, therefore, one must consider both the nom- inal rate of interest and the price realized when the bonds are sold. How the Loss is Figured Now ta figure out Toronto's loss as compared with Montreal's. On the fourteen million dollars which Toronto sold at $89.00 Toronto pald a discount of $1,540,000. On the two million dollars' worth of bonds which Toronto sold nt $95.00, it paid a discount of $100,000.00. This, however, ls a gross loss, flot a net loss. If ail the bonds sold were 4%/ per cent. bonds, this would be the net loss, but the larger quantity were only 4 per cent. bonds. The valuation tables show that when money is worth 41/ per cent., the \"present value\" of a forty-year $100 bond, paying 4 per cent., is $94.199. To get Toronto's net lose il Is therefore necessary ta ascertain the différence between $89.00 and $94.199 on fourteen million dollars' worth of bonds, and the difference between $95 and $100 on two millions. Working this out il wiil be found that Toronto's net discount or loss was $800,000.00. That is, If Toronto had sold Ils bonds on a 41/2 per cent. par basis, it would have received $800,000.00 more than It did recelve. Figured on the same basis, Montreal's first two flotatiofle reaiized their full value, while the third flotation, made lu November, was sold at a discount of $105,000.00. Thus, reduced ta the same basis, Montreal lost $105,000.00 ou the sale of twenty-one million dollars' worth of bonds, while Toronto lost $800,000.00 on a sale of sixteen million dollars' wortli of bonds during the~ same period of time. As Toronto's total bonded debt is less than Moutreal's, Toroiito's credit should be equally good. Torouto maintaîns a sinking fund, and Montreal does flot, and if this bas any effect upon the market it sbould be favourable ta Toronto, one incident lu Toronto's financlng for 1913 may be especially meutioned. in 1912 it lssued Hydro-Electrlc bonds for four and a haif millions and sold these ta Its siuking fuud ait par. Iu September, 1913, the Toronlto treasurer, or whoever was responsible, took these bonds out of the sinking fund and sold themn to a firma of bond dealers la Boston at $83.57 grass. If they had been soèd ln January o! the same year they would have brought about $92.50. On this single transaction there vas a net loss o! $405,000. This ls directly chargeable ta neglgent or Inefficient methods. The bonds either should have* been sold lu January or they should have been held until the January price could have been obtained. These bonds, sold lu September last at $83.57, are nov quoted on the bond market at around 90. IL seems difflenît, therefore, ta avoid the conclusion that Montreal la better served iu financial matters than Toronto. If these arguments are correct, Il la about time Toronto revised it$ finaucial methods. Farmers Bank Depositors HE Mînister of Finance has introduced a resolution loto the Hanse of Com- Tmons to provîîde -for paylng the depo:itors ln the defunet Farmers Bn where about $1,200,000. Opinio~n differs as to whether the precedent la a dan- gerous one or not, but it certaIly Ludicates a posslbility that some day a gen- erous House o! Commons wili pass a law that all depesîts lu chartered banke shall be guaranteed by the GovernmeYt. Modifying the Trust Bill W HEN thr Model Trust Comnpany bill was iutroduced Into the H-ouse of Commons by the Hon. Mr. White, it contained some drastic provisions Wregardiug the responsibilty of directors ln the case of Insoivency, or vhere dividende had been pald out of capital instead of out of earnings. As lu the case of the Bank Act the sting has been taken out of thie bill during ils progress through commiftee, and If le now as mild and Inoffensive as a thor- oughiy respectable bill oughf to be. Apparently, Mr. White's courage has falled hlm again. The Match Bank Statement ONE remarkable feature of the monthly statement of the Chartered Banks for March, ls the Inerease lu Interest bearIng deposite. These were five million dollars greater on the last day of March than they were on the last day of February, and llfteen million dollars greafer than they were on the corresponding date lu 1913. The deuiand deposIfs alsc grew durîug the month, making the aggregate gain thirfeen million dollars. The total Increase lu deposits for the year le nearly fwenfy-eight million dollars. The current boans for the year show a decline of sixty-seven millions. An increase lu deposits and a dechine ln boans is a natural result of restricfed business and Increased popular thrift. Assets, too, show an Increase. R. and 0. Transfer Under Weigh HOLDERS cf R. and O. who have been wondering how long Il would ho before the re-arrangeinents settled some months ago wenf Into effect, wili be glad ta learn that the transfer of their stock for Canada Steam- shlp certificates le ta be made ln June, after the regular quarterly twa pcr cent. dlvidend on R. andO. bas been paîd. The basis o! exohange la 120 shares cf Canada Steamohip pre!erred, and 40 shares o! 'Canada Steamshlp common for each 100 shares o! R. and O. stock. Meanwhlle negotiatlons are lu pregrese for the testing of the nev Stock On the Montreal and Toronto Exchanges. Mr. Carruthers le enthusiastle about the re-arrangement,. and points out that already economies ln the Toronto office, amounting ta $90,000 a year, have been effected. What the earnlngs o! the new company wiii be, ho'we-ver, depende upon two thInge, the weather, and busliess conditions, whlch wiii have ta become more normal If there is ta be much freight traffic on the lakes. Cuttln« dowa expenses doesn't alone make profits. Uniformity in Insurance Legisiation AT a luncheou given lu Winnipeg te Mr. Arthur Fisher, Saskatchewau's Provincial Superintendenlt o! Insurance, il, vas announced that about A the mIddle cf this month the officiai heads o! the insurance depart- mente cf the four Western Provinces wiii meet together lu Calgary. The end ln view le the obtaiuing of ail possible uniformity lu Insurance legislation and administration throughout the entire West. Insurance companies and their agents vil be IuvIted te set fOrth thelir i'eWO to those officlafly representIng the provincial departments at the Calgary conference. This is a good thing. Sauce for the goose le sauce for the gauder, and where uniformlty lu leglelation le possible it le desirable. Mr. Fisher, at Winnipeg, detailed how Saskatchewan, like Québec, had enacted legielation calling for liceusîng cf ail Insurance agents doing business within the berders of the Province, and testlfîed te the protection whIch such a lav gave ta cempanies and public allke.",
         "CANADIAN COUIER. LITTLE M OTI E1R S CUTICURA SOAP And Cuticura Ointment. They afford a pure, sweet and economi- cal method of preserving, purify- ing and beautifying the skin, scalp and hair. For distressing eczemas, rashes, itchings, inflammations and chafings of infants, children and adults Cuticura Soap and Cuti- cura Ointment are most effective. CUtlUOa Bonn andi Ointment Mr moiti throughout tie worId. A Uberal sample of eacb. euhb 32-page booklet on the cars anti treatinent of thie ski a anti eralp. ent pooskfree. AditretqPoter Drug ôChou,. Corp.. Dep7 K BnUS. A. Drive Away the Worries of Housecleauiug by usiag_ an The Mop that dusts, polishes andi disinfects at saine tmle. Malles ît easy to get et those hard-to-get-at places, high up andi iow down, saving mnany a back-ackie andi crippleti knee. .-Preserves your hard- wood floors andi gives thein a hard, dry, lustre-lke finish. -Froni your dealer. or sent express palid any- whore In Canada on recelpt of $1.50 If Yeu men tion Canadiean Courier. Channeli Chemical Co., Lid. 369 Sorauir. Avsme, Trnto The Senator's Horse Trade (Continued trom page 8.1 pastures. Ail that winter the bllnd Wilkes mare lolled in a loose box, feed- ing on thie best. In the spring site wcas apparently in as good shape as an y thoroughbred ini the entire stud. S~ethî Hluckins lied frequently wond- ered wliat the Senator intendeti to do w itki the useless mare; but lie knew better than to venture an opinion aloud. *\"Ske's toa old to breed,\" lie sait to hîmself, \"and nobody would take hier for a gift.\" The mare liad been clippedl la the fail and now, with bier kluxurious livIng bail taken on a coat as glossy as satin. Skie kielli lier head up proudly, as be- fited a Wilkes, and the Senator would have bet the entire farm that flot one man out of a hundred would have said skie wals blind-stone blind. One day ln April the Senator re- turned froin Toronto witki a flne set of russet kiarness. Next day a box buggy, wlth automobile tires was de- livered front the train. Old Bob camne out of the bouse, with sometking of a grini smile In kils eye, as lie saidl to Seth* \"Dock lier tail, and bang lier mie; bave bier re-shod, and ber feet painted up. We'll bave some fun wlth ber, anyway.\" Two days afterwards the Wlkes nmare was encased in the magnilicent new harnesb, and attackied to the smartest buggy In the tnwnship. The patrician blood whicb coursed tkirougb hier veina seemed to assert itself, and thie mare fairly cbortled, as thaugli anxious to bie on thie track once aigain. The old man stad and Iooked at lier. \"Sie looks fit for the Grand Circuit, don't skie?\" bie asked of Seth, who stood at hier bead. \"Skie sure do\" answered that worthy. \"Shîe'Il drive ail rigkit, I guiess.\"* \"Skie's gat to drive\"l answered the Senator, grinly-\"'at least for a wbule.\" He climbed Into the buggy and took tkie reins. The kiandsome animal, reared a little and then started off ait a rapiti pace up the road. As skie gatbered way the oid man found that it required ail kie could do ta keep bier under control, and ho reacbed down for the 'kiandles,' In a Hatle over an baur bie returned ta the yard, breathiesa. \"*Anotkier liaif bour of tbat, and I'd a been aIl ln,\" bie gasped, as kie got out of the' buggy. T AT niglit a irai resolve seemed te lmpross kils mind. \"Fil do it,\" ho sald tu hiaiseif, as lie wen' to bed. Next mornIng ho ordered Seth ta put la the Wilkes mare again. \"Teil Miss Beaton I may go au far as Port Despard,\" hoe called, as ho drove away la a cloud of dust Out on the hlgbway tbey sped. Her physical disability dld not seem te, af- fect the mare one iota. Skie reeled off tbe 18 mlles to Port Despard ln ex- actly one haur and a hiait. As able entered tbe yard of the Conmmercial hotel it could bie seen that she hadi hardly turned a hair. \"*Just put ber under tbe lean-ta, Charlie,\"l ho sald ta the stable mnan, Who stood admlrlng tbe new herse. \"Caver ber over, and after sh.'. cool give ber a drink,\" and the oid man entered the hotel. As hoe passed down the hall ta the office, tbe door leadîng tnto the bar opened and a large man. with a florid face emerged. Tbe Senator staffled, but isald natblng as ho passed. lnstead, he turned and entered the bar. \"'Morning. Senator,\" greeted the bar. tender. \"Good morning, Mike,\" answered aid Bob, cheerfully. \"F'm mighty dry after all that dust on tbe road. Gîve mie a glass of beer.\"1 \"Well, Senator, Yau've always got som1ething to show In horse flesh,\" sald the boniface, as ho drew off the beer, \"but that horse you druv, In just now has got them ail 'kinned. Dld you ralse her?\" \"NO, bought her lat lU,\" replled the ald man- \"'SaY, Mike, who was that bit red !aeed man Who came out Of the bar Just flOw?\" \"Oh. that's JIM Walker, who bougut the Ward 'Place last sunhîyer Hoe Freshi [rom the Gardens of thQý finest Tea-producing country in the world. 11(I1 'I1 m mm * -ff Ceyloit Tea. Scaled Lead Packets Only. 017 Try it-it's (leliciotis. BLACK, MIXED or GRREN. D U R AHB L E-Fire grates are three-sided; last three times as long. Shaped in the M'CIarys Sunshînte #ÀD to grind up clinkers when \"rocked\". See the McClary dealer or write for bookiet. 3z Regularit-y of Income It ils important to an investor that he should receive hie income at regular dates. On moneys invested under our Guaranteed Trust Investment oeplan the interest i. paid promptly on January 2nd and July 2nd. Suais of $500 and upward arc accepted. Particulars on request. 3ati0ntXd rnst \u0026t1M n » --, iud I1 L 8-22 KING STREET EAST, TORONTOI Montrel WÎaipeg Edmionton Saskatoon Regina, THE ,INDEPxvENDENT ORDER 0F FORESTERS FURNISHES A COMPLETE SYSTEM OF INSURANCE Policies issued by lhe Society are for the protErction of your Famiy and cannot be bought sold or pledged. Benefits are payable ta the Beneficiary iii case of death. or to the member in case of bis total disability, or to the mem- ber on attaining seventy years of age. Policiell issuod from $500 to $5000 TOTAL BENEFITS PAID, 42 MILLION DOLLARS For furtiwl information, and lftera' j. appfr te FRED J. DARCH, S.S. L G. STEVENSON, S.C.R. Temple u\" TONO 1WJ~~CTL~MTHASPêID 7 PER CENT. THIS IVSMNq PER ANNUM half yeariy aince the Seurities of this Corporation wero pwaeti on the market 10 years eg. Business establisheti 28 year. Investmert may be wlthdrawn ln part or wbole any time after one year. Bats e as a mortgage. Full particulara and bookiet gladly furnisheti on request. NATIONAL SECURITIES CORPORATION, LIMITED C0manFEIII unE IUIDEN - ROMI. 0ONT.",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. progressive Jones Say8: \"Fertilize Flowers and Grasses ' FRnight and They will Repay You.\" It's worth while to make the best of your Rlowers and grass. To do so you mnust keep up the riglit condition in the soil so as to provide the various plant foods required. Something mtîst corne from outside the ground to main- tain the correct balance. - s especially adapted to the requirernents tor which it is recornmended. If vour dealer does not handie Harab Fertilîzers write to the firm direct. The Harris Abattoir Company have a special booklet, on lawn and flower fertilizers which they will be pleased to, send any- ane interested. The Harris Abattoir Company, Limited j - Fortilir Dept., Strachan Ave. Toronto, Canada 20 - w W HIT E LA BEL, AL E with your Lunch or Dinner coaxes an indifelrent appetite into pleasurable anticipation of the meal. ,Try it. At Demle»s and Hotels. Browd sud BMdeld bY DOMINION BREWERY COMPANY, LIMlTED, Toronto JUST Ur .. $*Md. lisésibt \"«HOW te. (ET A POSITION This is one oi thie niot sensible itti bocks of advice ever offered to thie Y011111 Mani or younf womnan seeking emploi'- mcent. Mr. Lii has been with a large correspondenCe ichool, and bas bad mach experîence in getting positions for young meni. Above ail, he %iould have the. yotng maxi droP ail fooliah notions about the. etig and holding a position. liard wviortk alone mikes gond. H. £ives much pracica advice oni letters of application- 0esi\u0026 plcdton. what iasgood at what s ad J for, etc., etc. x2mio, Cloth. 140 Pages. 6 EnM enet Contents. 1. Special Abiliti' and Choice Of Occupation à. positions Obtained Through AdvertenxtAL to. Positions Obtained Throug unsoiicite Letteru. 4. The Letter of epIl tiO 5. personai Interview and Lettera of RecomnmendatiOn. 6. Special Hints to varions Classes of AND HOW TO KEEP I'I\"' OW à. ROLAND \u0026ALL NOIRMAN IRICHAIRDION, TOROtO» E.welIagwOliSt eD,-À. corne from Tonawaflda, used to run a drug store there. H1e started to sell out just after lie camne here, but some- thlng went wrong and be's declded to work the orchard for this year, any- way.\" Old Bob ieft the hotel and went over to the bank. In about an hour lie re- turned and ordered the mare to be brouglit out. He drove up street. \"The old man must be going to get married,\" the postmaster remarked to the chief of police, as the Senator sped by. \"That's the dinkiest outfit I've ever seen him, behind.\" Horse and man made the circuit of the two main streets two or three times, and finally drew Up before the hotel, where qulte a crowd had gathered. Walker was among tbera. \"Any of you young fellows lke to have your arms worked out?\" ilsked the Senator, gaiiy, as lie addressed the assemblage. \"HIave you got roam for a big, fat one, Senator?\" asked the ex-druggist. \"Sure,\" replied the old man, \"«get In.\" M R. WALKER hoisted bis bulk Into the buggy and they drove off The mare seemed to resolve lier- self Into a piece of clockwork, so even was her stride. Walker got a good grlp of the side bar and held on. Dowfl the road tliey whlrled. Farmers made way for the Senator,' as was their wont, then turned and foIlowed the flylng chario't, wlth their eyes. After tley bail put about six miles bebInd them, tey slo'wed up as tliey began the assent of a blli. \"Wliew, but she's a flyer,\" sald Walk- er, speaklng for the first Urne. \"Have you go ma ny lk ir eao? \"Tell -the trutli,\" sald oid Bob, \"I've got too many lior ses. Wisli I could get riti of a few. I'm gettlng,,too oid to look after tbe wboie works Ilke I used to.\" ý1 If Walker recognlzed the Senator as the easy mark on 'wliom he bad unload- cd the bllnd mare It was nlot apparent. H1e went on, eagerly* \"Say, Senator, last fali I got cauglit by that Northwest cbaif, and startcd to pull out for tlie wleat fields. After I'd sold off pretty near ail my stock 1 got sorte reports front the West that put a crlip Into the whoic business, so I declded to stay riglit where I was. Now I'm trylng to pick Up some stock andý start over agaln. Wbat 1 need most Is a good horse, wlth some class. 1 always owned good ones on the otber Bide. H1e gianced, nervously, at the Senator, as lie added: \"Don't suppose you'd feel like sellIng this mare?\" \"Weil, 1 liadni't tliouglit about it mucli,\" answcred thie aid man. 11e spoRe truly, for obvious reasons. Waiker continued: \"This la the Rlnd of horse I've always wanted to own; would you consider ant offer?\" The Senator iooked off acros the blli as he repllcd. \"Sirice I've been drlv'lng lier lately *I've corne to the conclusion that she's a littie toc smart for an old fellow liRe *me.* Now, if I thought shld be wltl a man wlio'd treat lier rIglit, and ai- ways drive lier bimself, price wouldn't be se mucli an objeet witli me.\" Walker bit, like a liungry fil. \"Would two bundred and a quarter be any obJect to you, and we'Il caîl It a bargain rlght now?\"I He seemed so eager tliat lie reaclied for hie Inside pocket and pulled out a roll of bisl. dWeilt answercd. tle ad man. 'II dn want ta take advantagc of yeu. The mare's turned tbirteen years aid.\" \"I don't care a bang,\" Walker an- swered. \"Any liorse that can road like tliat can bave my moncy. Io lt a go?\" Tlie old man slghcd. audly, as lie answered. \"Weli, I guoe I ma an old fool, but if Yeu drive witli me over' to Cobunk where I eau catch the train for home, l'Il boand her ov r to you for two fifty, and you can send the buggy and bar- ness over later.\" \"The money's yours, Senator,\" ex- clalmed l eI udietlnt five crisp bank notes for flfty dollars eacl Into the old man's pocket. It was a long tinte before Seth Ru1ck- ins discovered, what becaine of the blind mare, but lie knew that lie was Iridher by ane liundred dollars the niglit the Senator returned from Port Des- pard, and walked home front the sta- tion. WRMT TO »THE CUDMIY PACKING CO., Toronto. Canada .FOR ouR EOOICLET \u003c'HntatoHooeusvit. - - - - ------- ----------",
         "g ~F 'S UPLEEN 'IpEW pAOES PREp4RED TO MY LADY'S TASTE eVr\"t à,\"-f. As We Sec Others A Singer of Brave Songs IT cae on a golden April morning, !oliowing a day of grey mâsansd relu, this book, clad lu olive-green wlth \"The Miracle sud Otber Poemae\" inscribed lu goid. There wss a saucy, gay robin singing ou the bure branches o! the cherry-tree out- aide the window, us 1 read tbe story o! tbe beallng of Bartimeus, wbo sat by the wayside, sud tbe sang of the bird seemned to ecbo the gladuesa o! the liue, telIîng of the Miracle worked long ago lu the higb- way wbich stretcbed wbite from jerusalemn to Jericho. These pooms, by Virus Sheard, are f ull of *\"eartb's new wine,\" sud bave a joyousuess wbich la s verîtable spriug sang. Yet the writer lia as sensitive to tragedy as ta mirth, aud, lndeed, tbe very dedîcatlon o! tbe book to ber brotber, Eldridge Stanton, sounda ý the deep note o! lassansd its myatery. We ail rememnber tbe fate o! tbe youug busbaud sud wife Who perisbed together at Niagara ons February afternoan two yeara ago, alter an bour's atruggie to reach tbe shore. Yet, even lu tbis scene, tbe poet finda the llght o! heroic de- vaLlon Illumine tbe darkness:K \"No tears for tbee, no tears, or aigbs, Or breaking beart- But oane, that thou so well tbat bitter bour Didot play tby part.\" We bave given up the didactlc Ides, witb re- gard to litsrature-tbat It muet formally teacb a leason or enforce a doctrine. We recoguize tbat there must be much o! the \"firet, fine care- leas raptu'~ about a poot'e souga, wblch are poured forth lu uncousclous pralse of that power wbicb made ns capable o! lovîng tbe oarth sud ita creaturea. This Canadieu singer bas the true. melodious note, sud yet ber jayounesa je tbat whlcb bas kuown o! pain, sud bas looked througb, atrife sud gloam ta couquet sud radiance. The Dreamn-Flowers T HIS writer'a songe o! summortime have alWays apposled to me as the aunulest flashes o! poetle mood. Virus Sheard bas nover forgatten the vivld dellght of cildhood lu grass, sunlight sud flowere, sud It je mast a merrybearted hittle girl, grown a bit wieer witb the yesrs, who singe o! \"*The Fafry Clock\"1 I arn sure that Peter Pan, bîmsel!, maigbt murmur: \"Tell me-tell me o! the bour-fOr tbere la se iuuch to do! le it earlYT la it late? Fairy Clock! O tell me true, As I blow you down the wlnd, ont upon a road o! bine.\". Butterfiles. dalsies. roses sud Doppies, ahi tbe things O! gleamn aud giadnese whicb make our sommer daye s season o! brigbt Colours sud sweet scouts, are lu the verses wbleh beguile tii day'a work. If you ilue popples, thon you Winl rom more thon, once the sang near the close wblch coi brates the Uîttie day o! these flawers of flam Poppies, wbilh brlng the \"drangbt o! Lethe,op alwal carry my fsncy off ta a uorthern lake sud au Augul afternoon loug ago wben a girl saug \"-The Gardon,4 Slep,\"' as boat attor boat drl!ted psst--canoo,, sail-boat, or tiuy yacht-a*il lu the aunahino o! or o! Muekoke faireet days. There wsa semall gi climbiug Up) tbo bank, triomphant aftor rlfllng ti treasures O!fs a ld-fashioned, gardoen. As si scrambied Up the verandsh stops, ber IJro'wn finehie cheeoks, ber miachievous dark oyesansd the gipi haïr o! brown, framlng the eager face, semed match the giowlng popplos wblch te ciutched bier baby banda. The girl sang On, o! the old gardi whero '*the POpples are spread-wbere a tower ruine stands guard o'or the deep.\" sud after s wbi tbo cild fell asloop witb the dresm-llowera et clasD-ed close. The singer la awsy at the. Other si, O! the 'world, the baby-dreamer tomne yemr ago we to tbe land where dreama corne true, but one rea\u003c the \"A Sang O! Popps\" over again and the Augu sunlight sud blassoms ýbrighten and bloom on, more. Thore le suother Canadian womanl Who bas writti àdeliglutful poppy gong. Gertrude Bartlott, o! MOI reai, has gong of the \"White Poppies,\" the true blos- soms of siese, whicb bave alwass ymbolized lu European art the reat wblch !ollows strife. They are aIl fiowers of singular cbarm-tbe red, wbich ling their gay challenge to s duli world; the gold, which fleunît their brightness aguinst the Ocean spray, or the white of eternal, peuce. The Literature of Hope T HERE was a lime wben gloom seeuied to be s part o! religion sud service, wheu drab looks sud gowns were regarded as evidences of rigbteous character. Hlowever, we have corne ta the mise conclusion that the Maker of the world muat AN ANGL.O-GANAOUAN VOCALUST. Miss Wlntfred Hlcks-LyflS, who le mnuch ln demand Un wy Toronto by vtrtue of her speclalty Germen lieder, ln pari Brahms. She ls also soprano soloist of new St. Paul'a i Bloor let. This rarely olfted mezzo-soprano le returnlflg t\u003c land on June 5th to Cive a recital ln Aeollan Hall, LondI Lehave approvedl o! wsrmtb sud brigbtneae or Re wouli ,d ardly bave givon us ab mucb o! brilhiant besuty Ir e.sky aud ses, snd flowers. To beip bumanîty tai reahizq rathe beauty o! tbe earth sud the joy o! more life li et snrely the part o! those who have the creativo gif So! the poot the artIst or the muelcian. We havi 1ail heard the noe lu the aid mlsslonary hyinn de le scrlbIug the Island o! Ceylou-\"where every prospec nI pleases sud only maen is vile.\" The worid o! to-da. la 1 bardiy wlling ta accept such a description a letrue regarding any commuuity. ed It le to be regrettedl that we have bad au much c §y, Pesslmlsm fromn certain naturalistic Europea to writers; but we bave atil mucb that la heaithli lu sud constructive lu the Imaginative efforts o! th Dn new Poota. Mr. Alfred Noyes, wbo bas juet visite lu Canada, le one o! the happleet sud saneat force le among modern English writora o! verse, sud ho la ni in witbout bIs comradoe. le Y nt The Quinquennial Congress et IOMEN whO are interested lu clubs, socletlen ex ce W the federations thereof shonld regard t] glatboring lu thls rmnth -o! May,-in the clty i Rame, wltb more tbsu passIng attention. The Iiite Bn national CouncjI Oo! arenIlh dates from M8 Sthe year o! the WorId'sFair lu Chicago, haa heooor a great unifying force for feminine organizatiofla, a power for centraliziug women's efforts ln philan- thropy, education and industrial enterprise. Lady Aberdeen, wbo was the first president of the National Council of Women lu Canada, has been for some years at the bead of the International Condil, aud bas certainly sbown mucb devotion to it8 interests. Mrs. W. E. Sauford, of Hamnilton, and Mrs. Willougbby Cummings, of Toronto, are the Canadian women who have been most active ln tbis worid-wide organiza- Lion. Five years ago, thîs quinquennial gatheriug was held ln Toronto, and the University of Ofltarlo's Capital saw the assembling of a vast number of delle- gates from ah quartera o! Europe. It was a stînlU- lating slgbt, to say notbing o! the souned, aud a Toronto newspaper ststed that five bundred women hsd tallced on two bundred subjecta ln the space of one weec. It wlll be suother bundred yesrs, before the Quinquennial Cougresa assembles agalu ln To- ronto, and by that time we shall fot care at sîl wbat thia chsrming planet ta doing-unlesa. o! course, we are reiucarnated and stiil taking an interest lu the affaira o! mundane progresa. Per- hales the Quinqueunial of 2014 'wili see the dole- gaies srriviug lu silk-lined seroplanes and niaking the Journey froin Amsterdam to Toronto in twenty-!our.bours. ERIN. An Interpreter of Brahmns B Y M. J. T. 'T HERE la a singer lu Toronto who interprets jGerman lieder as few Toronto vocaliats do and, therefore, !ew ln ah o! Canada. This singer la Wiulfred Hicl\u003cs-Lynie, the gifted mezzo- soprano from London, Engisud. She la not Ger- mnan, as migbt be sxpected, but on ber motber's aide la of French extraction, sud on ber fatber's, a cbild o! the lyrIcai race whicb producsd that soug the whole world knows, \"Kiliarney.\" Ger- man songa are ber apecialty, bowever, aud par- ticularly la abs dovoted to the sang o! Brahms, ~.This singer recoived ber musical training first lu Englaud, under Mise Marie Witbrow, the colo- brated toucher of siuglug lu London, later under Monsieur des Clieuls, o! Grand Opera, Paris, aud finally under Herr von Zur Mublen, of Ber- nl She made ber debut lu 1909, lu London, and subsequently gave many succeseful rocîtais lu that city, sud bad a large numbor of concert en- gagements In London and lu the provinces. Ber fame spread sîso as a toucher. Ber lat recitai lu London was given with the assistance of Mr. Den Davles, the famous tenor. Miss Hicks-Lyue came to Canada ln the fani of 1911, sud In a very short time became estab- Iiabod au s vocallaet and teacher o! rare ropute SSbe bas given sevoral recitals lu Toronto; baie aiso suug witb the Toronto Symphony Orchestra at Massoy Hall; sud bas been lu constant demaud lutical for ber specialty at concerts, at bornes aud at ticular. Causerie Musicales. In addition, Miss Hicks- ,hurch, Lyne bolda tho position o! soprano sololat o! 1Eng - new St. Patulle Chiurcb, Bloor Street. Ber name o. as a teseber la au enviable one; one of ber puplis, Miss Mary Russell Camupbell, la glvIug an Invitation recital at the Margaret Eaton Hall on May 5th. \u003e A singer la apt, like Sir Boyle Roche's bIrd, to a flit often sud give tbe Impression of beiug beard lu ant least \"Itwo places at once.\" Miss Hicka-Lyne B s lehortly returuing to Engiaud, where elle 'wli givo \u003e-a recital on June 23rd, at tbe Aeolau Hall, lu Lon- tdon, lu coujunction wlth ber associato, Misa Grace \u003e,Smith, the- Engliab. Dlanist, weil-knowu lu Toronto. Ber numerous trans-Atlantic engagements Winl occupy the summer sud lu tbe autumui able wiil re- sume ber work lu Toronto. nMeanwbIle, Miss Hlcks-Lyue la among us. She wae aone of several deligbt!ui soloiats who purtlclpatedl lu i the recent Shakespeare fete, whlcb was pro- d sented by tbe Hehiconian Club. Songs from tbe esvarlous ploys were Sung sud were Iilustrated by )ttableaux vivants lu reproduction o! Edwin Abbey's pîctures. There la a peculiar siucerlty lu tbe slnglng o! Miss Hicks-Lyne. It la 'honey withont wax\" lu happy earuest. Her voico la not one o! those manufactnred til volcos which art la proue to wrtug fromn unwilling ie nature. It la, rather, naturels spontaneous gift ricbiy at cuitivatedl and, used ase the Instrument of German er- Ileder., i places is possessor lu a place dtstinci 48, smoing ber many rivais lu Toront:6. But as au lntnr- ie pretor o! Brahms elle basý no rival.",
         "WOMAN 'S SUPPLEMENT-CANADIAN COURIER. The Mirror and The Web By TIHE LADY 0F SHALOT A CONFIDENT, THOIJGH VOUTHFUL, RIDER le, Mise Elizabeth Coulthard, who, la here seen skilfuIIy talng a gate at Major Kligouers recent prîvate Horse 85,0w. Mise Coulthard la a student of the dramnatlc art aMOI and has won honours at the Margaret Eaton School. 8h. le one of the speclally admlred rîders at the present National Horne Show. Her father la Mr. J. B. Coulthard, of Toronto. To the Beat of Hoofs ONE ho lu chdhood sat for hurs on croeked tence witb a clip like a aaddie le vas conscieus ouly et a rushing vind a] earth streamlng by like vari-coloiired r, bons bas, naturaliy, a leap et the heart when a g rides by on a herse et fiesh and talces a gate as were a skipping-rope. The leaping prociivity et such a beart w thoroughly teated at the National Herse Show, wh the fair Dianas, toregathered In Toronto, Incid a number ot the ridera herewith deplcted. The Canadian berseweman net enly rides, but nud witb a chaimIng esprit and nonchalance. in 1 shapely habit and severe bat and equipped with 1 crop wbich ahe se ably bandles, with ber white etc and ber white gloves-a deligbt te watch, for 1 banda are ail, ln riding-sbe la a figure alert, s debenair and wortby te be placed In honourabie c trast witb any auperb equestrienne of England When Europa rode off on a flower-wreathed belfer she set ne precedent for lady ridera. The cheice vau net ber cheice, but Jeve'a compulsion. The immortal huntress, Diana, lu contraat, eut a figure se noble on ber equine mount that every sperting dame muet imitate It. It survives fer the herse te carry Diana and te show the pride ef bis form lu tbe ring-wblcb la net vouchaated, te the duil, though oxpensive, bovine. 11ev beguillng and sveet la the power ef tancy which pormIts the watcer la ride with the rider, te rock ln pace with the beat on the tan and te chant vithin whon the manes start tossIng:- \"Then ve began te, ride, my seul Smoothed Itsl eut, a long-cramped acroli Freshoning and fiuttering Iu the wInd. .. There's more, but tbe reat ef It really doesn't matter. Livinge on the Budget Plan IT sounis about as bevllderlng as the lite ln the Looklng-Glas Ceuntry, vhero the greund, accerdlng te the puzzled Alce, vas \"marked eut mast like a huge chesa-board!\", And as If It wore up te one te play the game. The principie, neventhelesa, la Simple and as set forth by ber wheae hobby It la, namely, Miss Helen Johnson, of Nev York City, who was re- cently a visiter In Toronto, It la'planning one's lte and living ees plan se as te m1ake expendi- ture brIng returns lu due proportion ln ail life's fIve departments. Whlch live respects are- Housing, food. Clotblng, methoda of, eperation, and hlgher lite. Misa Jehnsen la head ef the Rousehoid Eceno- micl; Department ef the Federation ef Women'a Clubs lu Nev York. For a Score ef years abe bas been mistreas of ber subjeet, and ber practici writings on domeatic tepica have deified ber name among the heusewives. lier clever articles ln \"Goed U1ouse-keeping\", have beeu widely queted In the, vemau's columuna througbout the United States andl In thia country. She bas aise contributed largely te Harper's Bazaar. Owlng te ber Jeurnailatie connectien, MISS Johnson vas recently the gueat of boueur ef the Torento branch ef the Canadiau Women's pres Club. She vas gIvlng ber fermai address lu that city under the auspices ef the Woxnen's Canadian' Club, but ber.,Inforinal talk vlth the flOvapaper women had the added charm ef aimost lutimacy. The talk vas lz essence a vemans version of that practical volume of Arnold Bennett's \"Hevw te LIve ýon Twenty-four Heurs a Day.\"1 It des- A GARDEN CITY EQUESTRIENNE. mise Banale McSloy has foillwed her mother În fondness for the saddle, Mr*. James A. McSloy, of St. Cathares, belng ane ai Cintarlo'. recognlzed horsewomen. Miss Mc- Sloy, on the welI.known \"Confident,\" la a gracelul figure ln the ladies' classes at the Canadlan National Herse Show, whlch ends to-day. ciared the uoed te exceed ono's programme; te live, In addition te making a living; te meet net merely the demanda of rent, raiment, table and the running ef the machinery, but te attend as well te the fluer MRS. DOUGLAS ROWIE, OF ST. JOHNS, P.Q., is lnevltably fond of the horst. Brought up in a cavairy atm phere under the guardlanship of her uncie, Colonel*,Nellle 1 remalhIng in Ut as the wife of CaptaI\" Bowle, thé We an ard rider and wlll pay her devoirs ta tho prince 0f qijadrupedse t b the Ottawa and Montreal Horse Show. MISS KATHLEEN TEMPLE, Daughter of Dr. C. A. Temple, of Toronto, la another young rider whose horsewomnanshlp has won her an en- viable place ln hunting cîrcles. She rode expertly at the Armourles thie week. Our pIcture shows her vault- ing, ln the arena at Sunnybrook Farm. exactIons-\"to buy white hyaclnths to feed the soul.- The floriferous margin la the due of everybody and becomes the possession of the wage-earnlng woman, no matter what ber salary, when 8be makes up ber mind to live by the necessary \"budget.\" It takes Intelligence to make the plan and more, and training in addition, to operate It. But intelli- gence Is nlot at a premium yet among our Canadian women of stated Income and ahe who, adjust8 ber lire to a principie, wbo differentiatea \"price\" and \"coet\" and makres ber lite expand In due proportion, wIli make ne puzzle of the cheas-board country, though li flowers talk and Its smiles outlaat the Cheshire. For living la chess, bowever yen take it. On the budget plan lt la simply the game made easy. % W W Woman and the Weed \"A voman's only a woman, But a good cigar's a amoke.\" T H-E Kipling couplet would bie clever but fallacions, if the statement were true which was recently made before a Parliamentary Committee In Ottawa that the majority of young society girls there are habituai ln their use of cigarettes. For, If woman la equal te a cigarette, and that la amoke-albeit ber smoke-the point la at once made dull by axIom I. The above accusation was lodged ln the ear of the Commons cigarette bll commIttee by Mr. W. L. Scott, President of the Ontarlo Union of Cbuidren's Aid Societies and a son et the late Sir Richard Scott. Locally, the charge vas greatly deprecated as a taise assumption which would doubtless be quoted to the undeserved dis- credit of the city. One newspaper macle the de- claration tbs.t flot One ln twenty ot the clus referred to was addlcted te the use of cigarettes, and probably, scarcely one ln fifty. The smoking percentage of mature women It likewise stated te be reassuringly smail. 3uat why smoking on the part of girls shouiJd Sbe counted more a dîscredit te the city than the same more prevalent habit on the part of boys ls one ef the questions convention bas settled-- otberwise Ethies ln the tabloid terrm and difficizit pilla for wholesaie deglutition. I have seen young women simoke vith grace-as useful and pretty a trick as blowing bubbles. The only dis grace lay ln the Intent te sheck one. Wben a fair amoker attempts te be startling, then It lai U tme she was thlnking about ber tablold. On the ground that cigarette simoke, inhaled, la apt te resuit lu anaemla and other bedily ail- ments, one la glad of the assurance that the Scott charge vas a grossi exaggeratlou. and thst in the Capital, as happily elsewhere lu wholo- some Canada, woman. and the weed are as yot for the most part strangers. News in Brief H, L IS ROYAL HIGHESS the Duke of Con- J Lnaught viii place the memorlal atone te the late Mrs. Osier, wife of Sir Edmnund Osier, in the new ving ot the Georgina House, Toronto, on May 22nd. The Georgina Hous la a vorking girls' hostel, and the new ving vas bult by Sir Edmund as a tribute, te the memlory o! his wife. At the recent conferen\u003c\u003ee at Vancouver, B.C., S of the Graduate Nurses' Association of the pro- ,,d vince the matter of an eight-hour day for nurses en vas dlscussedl. It vas Miss McDonald wbo iný oth troduced the suibJect, a graduate nurse who vas rocently madle polieewaman. Fer the sake of - 1 . ... . ................ .... . ::e",
         "WOMAN 'S SUPPLEMENT-CANADIAN COURIER. both nurses and patients, she stated, the hours for nurses ln training- schools and graduates ln hospitals should be sbortened. A number of nurses opposed ber opinion, lncluding Miss Randall, of Vancouver, and Miss Wright, of New Westminster, but the opposition was flot at ail convïncing. A Montreal wedding of e'oeeptîinal interest, uniting, as it did, two prom- înent familles ln the social life of bath Ontario and Quebec, was that of Miss Mary Hendrie I3raithwaite, daughter of Mr. and Mrs. A. Douglas Braitb- waite, to Mr. Guy Melfort Drummond, son of the late Sir George Drum- mond and Lady Drummond. The members of the Winnipeg Politi- c~al Iquality League recently pres'ented for the second time their clever farce, \"A Woman's Parliament.\" The per- formance was received, as before, 'wltb enthuslasm. Mrs. Neille McClung, the well-known wrlter, was a great success ln the role of premier. At the April meeting In Hamilton of the Women's Wentwortb Histori- cal Society, it was decided to place a portrait o! the soclety's first and only president, the late Mrs. John Calder, as a memorlal in the Stoney Creek Battlefleld bouse. This pînin- ently fittlng tribute will ldentlfy Mrs. Calder ln future wltb a work to whlcb she devoted mucb of ber lire. As a re- suit of bier efforts 1913 was the so- ciety's triumph year. It wltnessed Ftph Avenue, New,. York, the erection o! tbe monument whlcb îs now a landmark on the Niagara peninsula, aiso the cancelling o! the debt agalnst the property, and the handing of the same over to the proper authorities for a park. Mrs. J. S. Heu- drie is acting president of the society. A Fair Lecturer f rom Qtieen's By M. M. OHN MASEI\"IELD, that rising v ouaig Englisb writer, neyer ap- peared lu more attractive guise than through bis expanent, Miss Wil- helmine Gordon, who lertured re- cently before the May Court Club of Ottawa. Miss Gordon would bave been a de- llght badl bier subject been anytblng front the poacbing of es. ta tatting, as our graudmithers knew it. In the selectIon or Masetleld and is work she was particularly happy, his poems, prose and plays -coing very well\" h.t tbe Capital as one' book-dealer com- nierelally expressed it. Miss Gordon Is tbe daughter o! the Rev. Dr. Gordon, Principal of Queeu's University. Sbe ls onu of the Le. turers on Englisbi hiterature there. Sbe began bier srbool days ln Hiall- fax, where bier famlly lived: subs4e- quently, shle went te Dalhousie. theni on te Queens, wben bier fallier mioved te Kingston, After ruelin br M. A. thure. sbe took a two year-s' course -and bonours- at Bryn Mtawr, foi- lowed by a course-and dîstinctIiono wlth capital I\u003e-at Oxford. Site then returued to ber AIia Mater and ac- A Canadianized Baby\u003c as il Appcared on Easter Sunday, when ThouA Cosmopolian Pageant of Sping Fashlor, MISS WILHELMINA GORDON, Daughter of Principal D. M. Gordon, of Queen', University, Kingston, and fier- self one of the lecturers there on Englieh lterature. Mise Gordon recently upoke on Masefield before the May Court Club of Ottawa. cePted the post she now holds. She la a charmlng combination o! student, sport and-just girl! To quote one of bier frlends: \"You would neyer dreamt, meeting ber, how appal- Ilngly clever she la You kuow wbat 1 mean! She ls go Young, go fun-lov- lng, 80 entbuslastic and so natural!\" As a lecturer Miss Gordon's fleld bias flot spread mucb beyond Kingston, but wlth a vocation go plalnly marked, It la e 10e hooped tbat sbe will givu more Canadians tbe pleasure of know- lng bier and those authors she sn de. ligbtfully Introduces. linds Represented thîs Country in' a 'fO far la It to Baby \u0026tH owon ?\"Just the dis- lance to New York Clty-wlbe la nlot so great for eastern Canadians wlth that centre of Fashidon b- bavlnig ais a magnet, and the further tact of an Easter- tide excýcursion. So the needle of feminlue Inclination dlpped beavily New Yorkwards and Baby- Ion becamne Canadlaulzed to tbe ex tent of many tbou- sands for the recent Fifth Avenue drp.ss spectacle. It was \"bomey,\" of course, but a bit dlisapipolntlng, ta dIscover that the go wn wblcb dlstractedl ydour atten- tion from mort or leas clever acting of Laurette Taylor was worn by your craguai partnier gait bridge l14st week ln To- ronto and flot by a dame of the Astor complication; that you bad to become an **artful dodger\" to escape runnlng Into Madge and Helen and the rest of the set who were doing llkewlse, wben you made a tour of the cabarets \"to see\"; that the costume you were devoutly observing wbile the boy choir ait Grace Cburch was challeuglng; the angels was surmounted by the fac% (whicb recogulzed you) of Mrs. Blankety-Blank, your next-door neighbour. There was plenty te Bee, nevertheless, and the gay Iiabylon's Dress Parade, part of It bores deplcted, partook of a flavour no legs piquant for that plnch of \"Salt of the eartb\" Canadians stand for. Easter and New Year's are the two seasons when New Yorkc City ls Babylon ln earn- est, and perhaps of the two the more Babylonlah ts New Year's. Then there la an orgy of demonstration when the street tumuit in Trlnity Square completely drowns the beils at the hour of maid- nlgbt. The Baster observance la ax dress lavent and le at Its zenith, naturally, et noon-tide, when the churches diagorge their congregations and the world la abroad to look on Mistress Mode. Let Us Help You With Your Spring Clothes -W lVy flot solve the, yearly Spring Clotho\u0026 puzzlec easily? Recolor, \u003e00 r last year's auits and gowns wlth DIA- MONt\u003e DYES. A e color, a few alteratians, and perhaps a littie trimniing wili m ak e thein as pretty as when Sit dowii IUw and w\\ritc, for the DIA- MONt\u003e IYE ANNUAL and D\u003eIRtECTION BOOK, aise saniples of dyed etoth. See our offer ut the bottea of this ad- vt-rtiscinent. Mrs. J o h n I3urnett writes: \"My daughter Mary's oid rose serge dresu faded badly. I dyed It black wlth your magl- cal dyes and trlmmed It with a new black silk girdie. Mary Ia so de- lghted wlth'it that she Insiuteci upon havlng her picture taken ln It Old Rose Serge and sending one ta Oyed Black. you .\" DÎamoiuDyes \"A clsild clan use them\" SimpIy dissolue the dye and boî! thejl material in the colored wa fer. mrus. D. J. Proweil writes lu part: been of gra., my Spring ward - robe complete at very limall expense- For example, the photograph 1 en- close shows a last yearls cloth skIrt whîch I dlyed blue. lit was gray and had faded badly. I ripped up an and dyed the ma- terial orange. Then I made It up Into the new style cont blouse. \"The resuit of My use Of DIA. MONO DVES lu that i have a coin- piste wardrobe ci Sprlng Clothes and have nlot worried one scrap over the p r 1n g Ciothes problem.\"l Truth About Dyes for Home U8e Gray C th Dyed There are two classes of fabrics-_ani- mal fibre fabrics and vegetabie fibre fab. rdo. Wool and 511k are animal fibre fabrics. fCotton and Linen are vegetable fibre fabrlcs. \"Union\" or \"Mlxed\" gonds are usually 60% to 80 1 Cotton, so must bc treated as vegetabie fibre fabrics. It la a chemnical impossibillty ta get perfect color reaults on ail classes of fabrics with any dye that dlaims to color animal fibre fabrIca and vegetable fibre fabrica eaually weil ln one bath. We manufacture two classes of Dia- moud Dye nainey-Damond Dyes for Wool or SIlk to celer Animal Fibre Fabrics, and Diamond Dyes for Cotton, Linen or Mixed Goods ta color Vege- table Fibre FabrIcs, so tbst you may ob- tain the Very i3est results on EVERT fabrie. Diamond Loges Sel! ait 10c Fer Package Valuable Book and Samples Fred. Send us your dealer's namne and ad- dressa-teli us whether or not bie selis DIamond Dyes. We wlll then send yeti that fainous book of belps, the Diamond DYe Annual and Direction Book, aiso 36 samples o! Dyeti Cloth-?ree. The. WLL \u0026 RICIRMUSO COU0111pffT. Lbiu4. 200 Mouatuin St.. MONTREAL. Casad",
         "WOMAN 'S SUPPLEMIENT-CANADIAN 'COURIER. - - -The Down-Town Girls' Noon four A n O5sqerva!ion of Con diona in Toronto Whlch Make or Mar the Good of Ihe Mid-Day Rccess By EDITH LANG William Barron \u0026Son UMArrED Inventora cand MaI\u003cers of PRICES: To Carry 2î ton\u0026 £67 \" 4 \" - £77 \" 6 \" - -£88 \" 8 . -£102 F.0.8 Liferpool or London. Transplanting Machines Borrowash, Derby, England A DCsk-bOOk of Errors in Engli.h By Frank H4. VIzetelIy, F.S.A.,, Assoliate Editor of the Standard Diction- ary, treats the hundred and one questions that arise In daily speech and correspond- suce which are nlot treated of ln the diction-ý ary. The New York Times: «'The scope sud plan of the volume, which la of handy aize and aiphabeticai arrangement, strike one as pleasantly sans, and uound.\" 12 mo. cloth., 240 pages. Price $1.00 pot-pald. NO\u003eRM AN RICHARDSON, 12E Welliiigon Street - Toronto W HERE does the down-towa girl lunch in Toronto? The an- swer to that question la that it depends on which of the dowa- town girls is referred to, sud w here and at what she works. Girls are to be found now-a-days in every branch of industry-ln factorles, stores, offices aud professional caliings, and the places where they get their luncheon vary even more than their occupation. Take the factory girls, for instance; some are near enough to go home to lunch, but with the lu- creasing sîze of modern culies, their number Is getting smaller, and more and more these girls have to depead on what they can take with them or ean get down town. A great difference exists not oaly between employers but also between the employees themselves In the lIm- portance which ls placed on the noon- liour meal. Some girls just bring a couple of sandwiches with them, and an orange, others sead oui for a 10c. or 15e box lunch, others buy to- matoes, milk and other substantial fare and cook themselves a tasty lit- cents. At least one of the banks in Toronto supplies its women clerks wlth luncheon on the premises, but as a rule girls who are flot employed In factories or the two stores mentloned above, have to go out to lunch, and theirs is a much more difficuit, propo- sition. The Y. W. C. A. runs a cafetarla, excellent In is way and cheap at the pries, but ht Is overcrowded every day. The King's Daughters have a house on Bond Street where llght lunches (too light to be practicable, the writer would think) can be got, but the rest room proves a great attraction. The churches have business girls' clubs, whlch, provide luncheons for their members, and rest rooms at a nominal fee. St. James' Is limited to 50 members, and provides a hot meat luncheon for 20e.; the Metropolitan Is limited to 300, snd provides a sim- ple luncheon, not always hot, at 12e. whlle St. Andrew's supplies a llght luacheon and dellghtful rest rooms and iibrary for between 200 and 300 AT INVERLEY SETTLEMENT, MONTREAL. The Goverflor.GOflral of Canada la a Literai Vice-Roy, Rn that.he emnulates KilngGeorge in the interest he takes In the P0oPie'S Insttutions. The Princeas Patricla accompanled the Duke on the recent vIsIt recorded In this plcture. le luncheon on the stove provided by the employer, who la addition wll sometimes provide tes and coffee free or at a nominal coat, snd samuetimes also a woman to do the cooklng. Most factory owners provide the girls with a separate room la whlch to take their luncheon, and In some trades these luncheon moms are coin- pulsory by law. Others provîdo cafe- tams, where a gond, substantlal meal can be bought for an average of 13 or 14 cents. The cafetansa plan is Increaslingly popular la laýdustrial restaurants which neod te deal qulckly with a large clientele, and the two big stores ln Toronto are maklag use of thîs prnncple. Of course, Eaton's caf e- taris ls on an enormous scale; la It la fed an average o! 2,000 people daily, and at busy seasons, such as Christ- Mas time, the average rises to 2,700 dslly. The mon aud women use the samo building, but different parts of It; there are, separate rosi moims, each Provlded wlth the daily papers and some flfiy magazlines. The food la ex- cellent, and the coat Se. for aoup, 6-9e. for meat, go. for desserts, tes, etc., and 6c. for the ubîquitou1le cream. The average prices of all the dIanema takea is 13 cents, but ihis does not psy, and nover has pald dlrectly, but the flrm la recouped, as, ail gond em- ployers are, by botter service ren- dered by well tenfded empIoyiees. The use o!. the cafetarla Is net compulsory. The girls eau go, elsewhere, or they can briag their own food and est it In a speclally reserved roomI. Slmnpson's, ton, have an employees' cafetansa, wheme 'the prîces are extra- ordlnarlly 10w, ranlglng fromn bot ineat Pies at 5 cents, cold ham at 3 cents, practlcally regular la aiteadance, as their places of work are ton far away from. the ordlnary restaurant district. T ERE are. stli many girls who day by day have te find a place for luneheon. Tbe leas weil paid frequeuit the Iquick lunch\" places, where food ln plenty, but nio deceacy; or comfort, le handed out for 16 to 20 cents, or they go toChilds', where, ac- cording to ail accOunts thie beat luncheon at the cheapest price can be obtained la town. That may be, but the noise and crowd there nullify it for many womefl wbo must tahe their luncheon at a dehnIte and busy tine. The big stores have luncheon roonus, and these, wtth Nasmlth'5 res- taurants, snd one or two o! the \"Tea Pot Inn\" and \"Queen Mary\" type, cater for the botter pald stenograpk- ers, headls of departmeats, profesional women, etc. Most Of these provide a 20 cent vegetarlan luacheon and a 25 cent o with meat, whlch give an adequate food value, but their a-la- carte prices are mostly beyond the prîce of those women who do net hap- pen to rellsh the menu Affered on any particular dey. Altogether, the lot of the womaa who la down towui every worklug day from 9 a-m. te 6 p.m., and has daily to take luncheon somewhere down there, le flot an easy one. Every one consulted sald that the greatest d~if- eulty was that of monotony. The0 res- tarant pr'eprietor's la the same prob- lem as the housekeeper's to provide a variety of sustainiag food to suit a variety of peoplo ont of a iited Income. i",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. THE PROUD CALIPH AND THE POOR WIDOW. IT was la the days when te Moors -were trlumphant ln Spain. The proud Calipli Hakkam was at the heigitý of lis glory. He resolved to make his palace and gardens at Cor- dova larger and more splendid. But to do thls be had to purchase thn cottage and grounds belonglng to a poor widow who lived close by. The woman did nlot like t0 part wîth her land, but the flerce Calîpli ordered his officiers t0 talte thte place by force and turn the woman out ln the streets. It was a great act of Injustice, and the poor old woinan, *ho was com- pletely rulned by il, lried te gel some of the chief Mînisters to tolie Up her case. But the Ministers were too much afraid of the Calipli to do any- thing for her, and the woman at last went 10 Bechîr, the chief magistrale, and appealed te hlm for justice. Ber-hir thouglit the malter over, and, belng a brave, Just man, lio deter- mlned to try te put an end to the scandalous action of his master. Taking a very large sack with hlm, lie rode te the palace of the Caliph. and found hlm sitting ln a pavillon that had been buîlt upon the poor woman's garden. Sack ln band, Bechir approached Hakkam and lumbly asked permission to fill bis sack wlth thte earth of the gardon. The Calipli was naturally mucit sur- prlsed at the strange request, and granled Il out of curloslly. Haylng filled the large sack, the magIstrale Ihen entreated the Caliph lu lielp hlm t0 carry It away. \"But il would take more Ilian lwo men te liftIil,\" mald Hakkam laugllngly. -Yet ibis sack,' sald Bechir cour- ageously, \"conlains only a very smaîl part of lte ground thut you took by force from, a poor old widowed woman. 110w wll you be able on lte day of Judgment 10 support lte welght of lte wliole of Il?\" The Caliph's botter nature was louched. Ordering te woman 10 lie brougitt ln 10 hlm, lie restored her properly lu lier, together wlth lte buildings lie lad erecled. THE GROWN-UP ME. By Margaret Widdemer. IDfO su wieli that I could 8ee The grown-uýp girl thal wIll lie me- Sucli heaps et lhIlngs 1 want te know, And site could tll me If tliey're so: If ltey let iter slay up 1111 laIe, And nlot go off 10 bed aI lgt And itow Il feels, way off lu, lien, To stay down-stalrs awake 1111 t'in? And If site ever wants to cry - The grown-up me In by-andfy- (But I don'l tâit site could, do you? If aIl lte thlpgs I want corne truie?) But wlien Site's here, grown-up and tani, There'1, le no Il11111e me\" aI all- So I sall nover, neyer soe Tite grown-up'gIrl wlio wll le me! --St. Nicliolas. THE LUCKY MAN., T IMOTHY LINCOIJN wu lte luckl. est man In lte country. At tweuty-oue lie was flot onIy te owner of a prosperous farm, but lie hla a nîce 11111e sum. of xuoney puit away in lte bank for a raluy day. \u003eTlie farm, had been left hlm by bis nid master, Whto itad taken a rare 11k- iug 10, the lad'a handsome face and quicli intesllgence. Nol long ago Tlmotliy ad coma Jut a legacy from a long-forgotten uncle. Re had titrown the money into lte farm, an~d the old mnan had mnade him a partuer. Soon afber lis master had died, leavlng everything lie possessed to lucky Timothy. And yet, Timothy was not satisfled wlth bis lot. For, lrutl te tll, Tlm- olhy was le love, and, as the lady was a banker's dauglîler and far above hlm in station, ho had no hope of be- ing able te win lier. But, wilh the extraordinary luCk Ihat continued to pursue hlm, he was enabled te save the lady from a very nasly accident. When asked to nome bis reward Timolhy boldly told the banker the only reward hbcul c cept was the hand of hisdagtr The Young lady blusled and seemed not displeased, but lte disayu lte face of lte father bold anuther slory. However, he consented t0 consider the malter, and promlsed 10 give tie Young man bis answer that same evea-i Ing. Accordlngly, Timothy presented himself at the banker's house aI te appointed hour, and there ho was en- tertained tu dInner. As the repast proceeded, the hotus suddenly rose to WaItIng for Summer to Corne. bis feel, and, poinllng to a covered dish, lie said lu his guest: \"Tell me whal dalnty titis dish contaîns and my daugliter shaîl be yours.\"1 The young man lurned pale, and, abandoning ail hope, he exclaimed in despair: \"Titougli far the fox may go ite'11 be caugitt by lte tati aI last!\"' \"I declare you have guessed il!\" said lte bunker; and, snatching off lte cover, lie disclosed lu lte astun- ished young man a fox's tail! Timolliy marrled the lovely girl, aud 10 tlie eud'of bis long and htappy lfe lte lucli by whidh lie baal won lier nover deserted him.-Tite Cil- dren's 'Magazine. AN OLO HEN. A N old lien sat on turtie's eggs, And site iatdlied out gesilus Two were turkeys with slender legs, And nue was a bumble-bee. \"Very odd dhidren for such a mother!1 Sald ail the hons to one another. GETTING OVER THE DIFFICULrY. 'T R1E twio chuldren were playIng lu thle Yard at lte home of Con- stance. Site remembered lthe Ieadhing of lier pareuts, but site wlshed -t0 play a certain game anId Taylor dslired tb play anther game. \"You'ouglit te play xny game,\" said Taylor. \"beeause I'm your 'visitor, and you ouglil 10 do wliat I wanî 10 do.\" Constance realized the trutit of titis, yet site dld nol wlshl lu give ln 10 lber l1111e friand. *'Leî'ei go Over to Your house, Tay- lOr,\" aile said.-8elecedj The Vest Pocket Kodak \"As right as a watch. \" S 0 small and smooth that it îs pocketed xithout annoyance; is instantly ready ~~ for business xithout focusing. Fîtted with Kodak Bail Bear- ing shutter, Autotime scale, reversible finder. Loads in daylight with Kodak film cartridges of eight exposures. I\u003eicturcs 1 5-8 X 2 1-2 inches. So accurate is this little camera that enlargements can be mnade froîn the niegatives to any reasonable size, and at sm-all cost-to the post card sîze (3 1-4 x 5 1-2), for instance, at sîxteen cents. Furniihed u\u003eilh \u003che d4fercni liens Actual Size. equlpmenis: Vea Pocket Kodak, with meniscus achromatic liens, - $7.00 Do., with Kodak Anastigmat liens, Speed f.8, - 1 t3.50 Do., with Zeîss-Kodak Anastigmat lens, Speed f.6.9, - 22.50 CANADIAN KODAK CO., Limited Kodat catalogrua fret a Vo\u003c TORONTO oiters. or bio mail. Less Work and Better Resuitsk A K1EUK r AIIESIBNY ombnines psotjry, iheci boari ai china cab1inevt ill bie a 1.1-de t ii or eýot ii article. of kitcP oie, Iouiil K ot a1 pa id witbh ii t -'lee .,.adaei ne b il --~ dun a y ith i hat -ic j, ianou clletin f pavliu , oag. ie, tii. ie adPackage. thaýt make euhamd l, iiI may kirçec Io raw% up yriur chair %nd il d(owu t o work. Rightl thr 1i(n front of p- on b, ever i g yop e,, e. a-1 utr, aty bsd pie di -ceai vr\u003e' ingre'diet qi re Noi uunpun a ... sesrichîg foitie tat r he oth4er. Your cabiiet ae yu manyâl a tl Look frtli.ýTrd-Mak vatri n ., A il n e ,ooinizr, a temupor aparer.' a $eee $aver and a worry chacer that'n a KvixçlTEL KîTuilE KABINECT. Write for Bookiet \"E showing many bandine 8tyles and oize, Sold In every town and city by beit furnitur. *tore\u0026. Oib Ile Knechtel Kitcheu Kabinet Co., Ltd. Hanover, - Ontario I NTanmod",
         "CANADIAN COTRIftU. .y3iz/sA orogzle OUR NEW SERIAL STORY SYNOPSIS. Dr. Arnold i3assingbroke performs a clever operation. and by it maltes sanseta man who bas been îoad for three years. Afterwards the doctor gues borne, and wishing to prove the efftcacy of a drug. takes It blmself. He goos out and Is knocked on the head. lostng his memory After examinatton at thie police offie which proves lneffectual-be ls released and searches for a position. Hie la en- gaged as a chauffeur. Hie goes to a filt rate boarding bouse ta Ilve. Complications ln the lodgtng-bouse leat hlm ta befrtend a stranded young womn whom lie commits ta the- cars of an agéd and pitous couple. Miss Pragg, by whorn he ts engaged as chauffeur. susp-\"cts some mystery of lits past ta the Intene- Interest of ber charmtng niece, Peggy, Youngest daughter of Lady Assitas. Miss Pragg remenstrates severely wltli Peggy's mother because she la trytng ta counisel Peggy ta marry a young lord- ling. John Grey overlicars the conver- sation and flnds that lie le ln love wtth Peggy. CHAPTER XIII.-(Contlnued.) AGREEABLE to thîs resolve, a week later lie wendod bis way once mare wltli lelsurely tboughttulness tovards the West Endi, llngerlng purposely an lits moadl til a nekzhbourlng dlock struck the raid- n il't ba ur. \"They cau't say be's h'out now,\" thougbt James Kenvay, \"an' If T rings lte nlght-bell. p'r\u0026ps l'il see saine other biake besîde that saur aid flunky Wat allus sentis me awav--falr silek af 'lm. 1 amn. Yes. tbat's the ticket, l'il ring the nizht-belsayr lt's h'urzent. n'raps that'iI rail 'lm.\" Pull of these thouglits he turneti lu- ta Partinan Square, whlcb looketi ex- ceetiiugly sln anti deserted. Ail at once he came ta a dead stop, whIîle a cold sweat brake ont an bis foreheati \"My Lord!-oh my Lord!\" be graaned, \"I'm golng off my blooming chump agine!\" Rie layes stareti lu a fascînatet ier- for at a tail, white !orma wblch was appraacblug pbantom-llko sometimos bobblng andi crauchîug lu the shadow, then creeplug slowly anti noiselessly forward. Kenway's first impulse vas ta take ta bis beels anti ruu for dear Iîfe, but fear rooted hlm ta the spot, wiîle the white phantom etole noiseiessiy nearer anti nearer. Approachlng a gas-iamp, ho Ial that what hati cousei hlmi such terrar was enly a waman. after ail. A voman clati lu a nlgbtgown, wltb bedroom alippers on ber bare foot, ber black haïr hanging ln a long plait dowu ber back, ber face as witte as lier robe, andi wlth eyos vIde open anti starlng stralght befare bier! Fear left hlm as ho realizeti that ho vas confronteti wth a beîng o! fiesh anti bloati, anti not a phantom. or chi- mors of the brain. Ho gave a Il of profounti relief, and moppei ies braw. \"Poor critter,\" be breatheti sottly ta bimeself, as ho scrutinlzed ber care- !ully; \"she's elthor off ber chump-or vaîkin' ln 'er aleep!\" Like many'blg mon, James Ken- vay vas wontierfully gentie vberea vo- men anti llttlo chiltiron were con- cerneti. \"tNov vhat am I ta do? She aln't fit; ta be on the stroot lke that. 1 vontier vhero she livear\" }ls hqart vas full of pity. for ber, anti ho walteti quletiy tIll she came up to hlm. As the woman vas about ta slip past, ho salti very gently- 1111adn't You botter came wîth mer,~ Site pauseti, laoked Inqulrlngly luto bis face, but dîid fot anseor. Ken- way tnok bier band anti tueketi It under hies arn; altbough the girl vas tail, ho vas a beati taller. Site diti not re- sent bis action lu anyr way, but clung closely to liim, clasping lier other baud over his arm. Ilavimg doue thl8, she gave a deoep sigli, as If from a feeling of protection. Greatly perploxed, James Keuway moved siowiy £orward la the direction from . whicli lie lied seen lier come, the woman moving with liim, witliou. proteet or oxplanatlou. Ho looked dowu luto lier upturned face. it wae white as papor, and very emaclated, lier great, violet eye liav- ing a dazed and giassy expression. As thiey turnod a corner o! the square a man nearly coliided againsc tim. lie was rushing heedlong lu the opposite direction, and was pur- pie lu the face and pautlng audibiy. fies pulled up witiî a jerk. \"Great Jeroosalein! 'ere she le!\" lie gasped, selzlng the woman roughiy uy the arm. \"Steady, mate,\" crieti Kenway warn- lngiy; \"dou't be so rougli; you'Il hurt 'or. ýSie is quiet enougli. Does site beloug to you?\" He looked the man ovor suspiciousiy, and the coarse, bru- talized face dld not reassure hlm. \"Tlat site do-an' a power o' trouble she bl\" muttoreti the man, wlth au oath. Tlie woman buried lier face agaînst Kenway's coat, and lie fo11 lier trem-l biing violently. \"'You'd 'ardiy tlilnk she wero my dauglitee, would you?-an' off 'or bloomin' 'sud at that, worso luck.\" S EE ING Kereway's look of surprise and distrust at thîs statement, lie edded ln a lese brutal tone \"Don't lok liko as if she belongs to me, do elie?\" **.No-she dou't,\" sald Kenway cau- dldly. \"Comnes o' givin' 'or au eddlcation above 'or station lu lîfo. I ailus told mY aid woman It 'ud lead to trouble I dou't see no good ln ahl thîs 'ero etication. I don't'olti wlth lt-I doue very well without It. Iu course me lady 'oro givo 'orseîf airs an' looked down on bi'us wot fetclied 'or up, an. notliln' 'uti do but elie muet gît a pluce as lady's mald, an' go travellin' wi' the gentry ta furrin parts. She 'adn't no use fer h'us---oh, no-anm uow, no one Il' no use for 'or,\" ho added vlndlctIvely. They were niovlng Ily forward durlng tii speech, tlie woman keep lng lier face averteti, whlle sho main- talned a rigid silence; but Keuway coulti feel lier violent trouiblng anti ,tho convulsive clutch upon his arm at tlie sounti o! the man's gruif voles. Ho pondereti over the fellow'e re- marks In silence; thon hIs face -cleared. \"Ljook 'ere, mate,\" ho exclaimeti sud- denly, \"if the poor gel la off 'or chump, yer ortter take 'or to Doctor Basslng- broke-a vondorful man '0 le-top o' Harley Street e' lves; you'l ses 'le b.rass plate on the door. Il mortal, man uan put lier strîte 'e cau. Ditin't you noyer 'oar of 'lm'?\" The man adtiressed cast a gwlft, sus- pîcclus glance at Kenway, andi thon anewered gruffly- \"'u, thet I noyer dîi-not as I kuows on.\" \"What sent 'or off 'or chump?\" asked Kenway curlouely. \"lShe seml quiet euoughYf \"That'e the artfuiness of 'or,\"* grawloti the man, \",sho's that violent at times, sh'd murder yer If she got -the \u003cchanst-a Proper fury sho le. You can't noyer trust 'er. She got a gun- stroke In india or some, of thom there furrin parts, an' I tell yer, se's a lair 'antlful.\" By tbis time they had reacliet a dark and sombre-lookIng bouse whlch bore every appearance of being empty. The front door stood wide open, and a wouiau peered anxiously front the top stepe. Instinctively Kenway paused. \"She's 'ore, 'Liza,\" sald the man sliarply. -El~p me to gît 'er into the 'ouse, mate,\" ho added, turning briskly to Kenway, wlio Itld doubtful wliat to do. \"We'll boi 'avin' the bobby along If we ain't quick, an' thon lie'll be makini' a song abalit it at the police station. We're caretakore 'ers, an' it's as mucli as our job's worth If Lt gits out. (E'oor folk cawa't afford to 'ave the bread took out o' their mouf- tliat's why we lias to e o keerful ho explalned anxiously. He laid a heavy and Impatient lianti on thie woman once more, trying tai drag her forcibly up the stops. Sho sh uddoerod and clung more tenaclous- iy to Kenway's arm. \"Don't du that,\" remonstrated Ken- way angrlly; -be, more gontie with her.\" The man broke into violent oaths and clutclid at the woman, wrenchlng hier vloleatly from Kenway. Slie beat out wltli ler bande franctically. \"No!-no!-no!\" elle screamed as site struggled lu his grasp. Ho gave lier a violent shako, and ail at once elie wont Iimp, and lurchod forward; her eyes ck\u003eeed and lier face turned grey. The man cauglitlher, and fling- lng lier over lis shoulder, staggered Up the stops. Tlie woman at the doar slammed It lu Kenway's face before lie had time ta realize what hllt lap- pened. As lie reached the doar lie heard the harsh grating of a key ln the lock, tlie rattle of a heavy chain on the doar, and tlieu ail was sllent darkness. 44m y word!\" lie muttered uneas- VIly, as lie Ilstenoti at the door. He was breathlng liard, and ies mind was workIug anxlously. \"P'raps the poar gel don't know nothlu' abalit it, no more nor I did -but-but--oh! etrike me! It'a awfuIll\" He wipeti the cald sweat from lxi brow, andi gianceti agaîn wlth uneas scrutiny at tlio repellant sombre bouse. He sol It was to be \"Lot or Solti.\" The big board creaked anti rattieti dismally above hie hoati. \"Must bo rîglit wot 'e Baiti abalit hoin' caretakers-but wot a face! Wot a lovely face! l'il see Datitor Bas- oingbroke If I has ta ait 'an 'la door- stop for a week, au' wot'5 more, Frl gît 'lm to see tliat poor dementeti critter. Lts onuif ta break anyone'5 'oart to look st 'or,\" lie added lu a toiue or deep pîty. Ho desceutiet the stops, anti was moving away whon lie bear a long, plerinig scemant, anti a colti chill rau down bis spino.' Thon shriek after shlek made his blooti curtile wlth horrl Ho sprang Up the vide stops again, liammerillg on the door with the heavy black knocker, anti boating help lessly upon it willi bis knuckles. \"#My Lord! Vhey're murdering 1the poor gel!\" he muttereti. Again ho hammored upon the door with clamorous Violence.l No one came.' The sorlm ceasod. J u s t a light, nourishing snack before retiring-try Easily digested -pure aud wholesome. The delicious flavor of IugetoU Cream Chees is most enjoyable. Seud for littie lugersoli Recipe folder telliug how ta make daiuîy dishes for everyday. \"'Spreads like Butter\" Sold by ail Grocers in 15c and 25c packages. THE INGERSOLL Packing Ce., Mt. lngeraoll,. Ont. HllIBorchert Dre\u0026a Forme s amplhf the Most difficuit part of home dreasmaking-the, fitting on. The form exactly duplicates yoar 6Sgure, whether atout or alight; itting on becomes a plea. autelyu dresses a Buorela ~PERECTIONII ADJUSTABLE ORESS FORMS i Write to.day for frercatalogue booklet -Dresamakiiig Made E.xy,- întensely interestflg. * aIl-Boreet Dreas Frr Co. of Canada. Liuulted 43 a Lombard Sf..,Tomut 'l'O subinit tea aheadacheis a aste 1 energy, Urne and comfiort. To stop Il at once simnPlY take NA- DRU-CO Headache Walers Your Druggiat wtili cofirm Mu sattementthat they donocol anything that cao luri heurt or nervous\"aytem. 253c. abox. NATIONAL Dm00 \u0026 CImemicAL CO. OF CANADA, iJMiTro. 2DM %tM p ,l ODOR ounty onelarth ; gnt ted Wrt o aao 448 E. I l wt y at , a",
         "CANADJAN COURIER. as suddeniy as they had started, and complete silence reigned wîthin. He waited for some time, then, reaiizing that ho could nlot gain admittance, turned and ran dowa the steps. So disturbed was ho, that lie ran almost without pausing titili ho ad reached Harley Street. His agitated sunhmons on the night- bell brouglit the sedate man-servant to the door in a state of disheve,- ment. He looked with stera severity at the persistent visitor, \"Don't teit me Doctor Bassingliroke aiu't ln,\" spluttered the panting man, anticipating the usual formula. \" tell yer 1 mlust see 'im.\" The servant passed a hand over his ruffled liair and stared at Kenway with an air of perplexîty; but seelng a dogged look of determînation in Kenway's eyes, he cteared lis throat nervously. \"See here, my man,\" ho whlspered ln a confidential tone as he ieaned forward, \"my horders Is, nlot to sat- isfy folks' curiosity, but as you've bin so often, l'Il jest toit you, that I)oc- tor Bassîngliroke 'as gone to Central Africa to study tropical diseuses- sleepin' sickness an' slich like-can't say I knows mucli about lt-he's dola' 'researchi work,' they cails it, but it's as much as my place Is wortri te tell you-mum's the word!-but It ain't no manner of use you commn' 'ere because we don't none of us know when lie wlll return. Doctor Wilson's doin' lits work while he's away.\" Dazed and bttterly dIsappointed, James Konway turned away, as the mani quickly closed the door. \"He'l never corne back no more,\" lie groaned. \"My Lord! Central Afrîca! As If any foot wouldn't 'a done to go out there to die! A man lîke that! It ortn't to 'a bin allowed -t's wlcked, that's wot It Is-he can't be spared, a man liko hlm, can't Tlieer's a lot o' men could be spared- but flot him-not hlm!\" His voîca had almost a sob In It as he stumbled home to bis anxlous wife. 06 And littie dld ho guoss, aIl hoîpless as ho feit himself te be, that he, James Kenway, had toucbed upon a dlue that milght lead ta the solving of a great mystery. CHAPTER XIV. The Home of the Praggs. APPLETREE HOTJSE was tho, country seat of the Pragg faro- lly-a family that had always been naval until Captain Pragg. break- ing away from the traditions of his forbears, turned lis back on the sea and went Into the army. The ancestral home descending aI. ways ta the eldest son, beîonged now ta Captain Pragg; (but as most of bIs time was spent on forelgn service, the bouse was at the dIsposal of Mise Pragg wbenever she wisbod ta mako use of IL. A square stona structure. solidly bulît and severely simple ln appear. anco, it suggested comfort rather than show. It stood on a blgh bluff over- looklng the beautiful Falmoutli Bay and the Helford River, the vlew beîng extensive and magnîficient, whle notbing was ailowed ta intercept Il. Like a watch tower, the old stone hauso staod on the lonely Cornlsb belght--a home wortby of a race wediled ta the soa. An urtificial bank or rampart bad been ralsed ta screen the gardon ln front from the beavy gaies, and on this w.as planted a tblek hedge of hardy sbrubs as a further protection from the wlnd; nothing else divlded the front gardon from the green sward whlch ran ta tho sheer edgo of the clif, agalnst whlch could ho heard the wash O! the wavos samo bundred feet below. At the sîdeoaf the gardon a private gate aponed an ta a shingly path which led more gradually ta the shore. \u003cThe front gardon, partially shet- tered as it wasby the Drotectlng ram- part, shawed only'hardy fiowers and a weil-kept croquet lawn. A balcany on the second floor rua- nlng acrass the front of tho house, altawed the lumates ta gît out and enjay one af the most enchanting views la 'the south af FEngland, em-. braoing, as It dlid, the wide sweep aif A jimm--y pipe is bully fin e just jammed full of deliejous Prince Albert- tobacco that's pleasing and fresh and fragrant You get yours, and know yourself what it means to gyrow smiles where grouches used to sprout!1 Now, listen: \u003eRINCE ÂLBERT the inter- national joy smoke can't bite your tongue, because the bite's cut out by a patented process that just gives you the best smoke any man ever put a match to, And you can smoke P. A. ail day and ail night and just feel fine and dandy and most cheerful lx-cause it's tobacco wdlhout a comebacki And that's why men go to it natural-like. Change your brandi Prince Albert is manufactured only by the R. J. Reynolds Tobacco Co., at ils factories in Winston- Salem, N. C., U. S. AX, and 18 imported frorn the United States by Canadian dealers. Prince Albert is the Iargest sellhng brand of pipe smoking tobacco in the world. Buy Prince Albert in the first store you hit. You know, yau get it right off the bat in the tidy, foul 2-oz. red tins. IL J. REYNOLDS TOBACCO CO. Wînston-Salem, N. C., U. S. A. coPyright 1914 l'y ' v. If You Can Rend, C- D-E-F-G-A-B-C Yeu cari Iearn ta Play the Piano and Orgau ait Home in From 15 Minutes to 3 hours. YourGet Full Instructions And 100 Pieces of Music Without .sending a Penny Yeu can't rend Chinese, but when It Is translated into English ouread It easlly. That ls just what thîs new method doea-.-translates the puzzling signe and mysterlous marks of the old- style, liundred - years - behind-the-tlmes music Into the modern, simple and logical way of denotlng musical sounds by plain Engtlsh letters (C-D-E-F-G-A-B-C) that telt you exactly what keys to atrîke and when to strîke them. D3y this metliod eîldren wbo nover touched a plano befor-ç have played ln less than an heur. and somo People who knew nothIng of music have played inside of 15 mInutes after starting wîth Easy Metliod Music. AIl this we stand ready to prove. Ail you have to do la to write us. and we'l send full Instructions and 100 pleces of besgt known music, beautlfully bound, ail charges propald. 'You keep it sevon days; then If you're flot so pleaaed that, you can't part with lt, send It back and owe us nothlng. Or you dan keep It by sendîng us $1.50 and then $1.00 a month until the prIce of $6.50 la paid. Isn't that fair? Could we do this if our niethod didn't accompltsh all we dlaim? Write us to-day, stating \"Send nie Easy Method Music for 7 days' FREE TRIAL as announced In The Canadian Courier.\" State aiseo how mzaîîy white keys on your piano or organ. Do you play old-styie note music? Give home address, street and number or R.M.I) Address Easy Mothod Music Co., 413 Wilson Bldg., Toranto, Ont., Canada. SPRING F SHING:IN ALGONQUIN PROVINCIAL (O1NTARJO) PARK ; A U«segbI7 Uaiveml Open Season for Fish Speckled Trout-May lot ta Sept. 14th. Salmon Trout-Dec. lot te Oct. 3lst following year. Black Bases-June 16th to April 14th followlng year. Highland Inn, Algonquin Park Affords excellent hotel accom- modation. Beautitully situated 2,000 feet above sea level. Rates $2.50 ta $3.00 per day, $16.00 to $18.00 per week. For adverttslng matter and ail particulars apply ta any Agent of the system, includlng J. Quîn- ian, D.P.A., Bonaventure Station, Montreal, or C. E. Horning, Union Station, Toronto. G. T. BELL, Passenger Trafflc Manager. Montreal. 17-lb HaeTOL Uadk. G. ELLIOTT, in Field and Stream Contest. 1913 lugh General Passenger Agent, ln Raggt(I Lake. Algonquin parký nt. Montreal.",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. Live Stock Pavilion on the Toronto Exhibition Grounds Roofed with ASBESTOSLATE q The big Live Stock Pavilion ilustrated was the only new building erected lait year on the Canadian National Exhibition Grounds, so the choice of Asbestoslate for its roof was doubly sîgnificant. g Asbestosiate is not an experiment with the Exhibition authoriies-they had already used it on the roof s of the Dominion Building, the Wonxen's Building and the Police Station. q This is but an instance of the way government, municipal, anid public authorities generally are now specifying Ashestoslate -and ià i8 used by every Railway in Canada. ql Asbestoslate is fireproof-weather-proof-needs no paint or dressing -and is practically everlasting. For private residences, as well as for public buildings, à' is the most satisfactory roofing made. For Bookiet C.C. glvlng prices and full Information write Asbnestos Manuf'acturing Company, Limited ADDRESS: E. T. BANK BUILDING 263 St. James St., Montres' FACTOIT AT LACHINE, P. Q. mear Mestreal \"LAUKNTC\" .IWU.y28 .... duine 20 -. Or Lo.aAUât* Fv.îzbt Office, IN ANSWEING ADVERTISEMENTS MENTION \"THE CANADIAN COURIER.\" the bay, tbe red cliffs juttiug Out -.\u003e sea lu tbe distance, and, ou a further t bill, silbouetted against the sky-line, an old tower or coastguard look-out. t A foot-path rau aloug the cîliffs and s over the dowus, sometimOs dipping r down to the water's edge (where one 1 miglit stand a moment for the water t to ripple to one's very feet, or watcb awbule the lunumerabie sea-guils idly sittlng on tbe incomiiig waves or e swirling In a white flash to a further rock), thon again mountîug to a dizzy beigbt over the clii! s, and wormiugE its way aiong the coast-Ilne for miles It was a perpetuai deliglit to Miss Pragg wheu she wearied of bondoni to bury berself lu this solitary rotreat, where sbe adopted country clothes and country hours-going to bed early. risiug early, and diuing lu the middle o! the day. Whîle the front of the bouse was devoted to the sea viow, the reai gar- dons and grouuds lay at the back and sides, and were fairly extensive. There were old-fasbiotLOd fiower-beds witb box borders, quaint old trees o! clipped yew, a carefully sboltered rose gardoni, sweepIng lawns, and a flue shrubbery wbich separated tbe apple orchard and kitchon garden; beyoud these, again, were two fields and ex- tensive out-buildings. The stables had beon receutly utillzed as a garage, for Miss Pragg always brougbt ber car. Old Mrs. Mellor, the housekeopor, b-ad grown grey In the service o! the Pragg !amily, and was In great cou- trast to Mrs. Law, of the White Mai. sonette. Her busband had performed the duties of butior for more yearb than lie dared to remember, aud two young country girls from tbe neigli- bouring village completod tbe bouse- hold staff. FORMERLY the ouse ad been Jcompletely eut off from the outer \u003e1world except for the tiny village with Its baîf-dozen cob cottages, counl- try Inn and old vicarage; but of late years, to Miss Pragg's extreme dis- gust, sevoral large new 'bouses had sprung up about tbe old stone bouse, for othor adinirers o! sea and coun- try views bad found out this beauty $pot. Manson spent lis timo lu reviliug the country, Miss 'Pragg, aud ail ber works-behind ber back, of course. Sbe, on ber part, nover falled to snub hlm on ail possible occasions, ntil Jobn Grey. woudered wby tbe super- cillous secretary stayed, Wheu the reason was made plain, to hlm, it oc. casioïned hlm a groat sbock. 'Life weut on very quietly tîli the end o! tbe summer, when Margaret Assitas made ber appearauce at Âp- pietree House, Iooklng ln wouderful bealtb and spirits after ber yachting crulse. The atmospbere o! the place bocame electricai at once, and aive wlth the vitalIty o! ber presence. Seated on the balcony lu a 10w, wicker chair ou the evenlng o! ber arrivai, the girl drew lu a deep breatb o! satisfaction; the a!ttr-glow o! the settlng sun was stili reflected In bars o! red and purpie across a darkeulug sky, wbl at the samo time a pale moon shone bigh lu the heavens, and the soft wasb o! a summor tide lapped laziiy at the foot o! the cllff. Miss Pragg pretended to be roadiug a book, but was lu reaiity studying the refiued profile o! ber niece, whicb looked like a delicate ivory ep.meo lu the soft. llgbt. \"I have uot seen anytbiflg hai! s0 beautiful wbIie I've been away auntie,\" said the girl at last \"Grand- or scenery, perbaps, more austere and Imposlng, but not so tender, not s0 euchautlug. It le good to be bere again! \" 1'l always feol like tiat,\"1 returned Miss Pragg lu a toue that was, for ber, wonderfully subdued. 'ThaIik goodness they, can't bulld on the seai\" se added. \"lBulld on the sea?\", queried ]Peg-gy, romovlng ber 0y05 froin the s1\u003c\u003e to lookc at ber aumt. ,Weil, 1 gÊuess those jerry.-buildOrs would stIclk a row o! villas before us if ther could, retorted Miss Pragg vin dIctively. \"HavOD't You noticed tho, new bouses ai. the baclc of us? Thore bas actually been five buflt, ln the last two YP-ars- Wlve, Peggy-Apple troc House wlill 1e ruined-31' wiil 'I be furlous wben ho cornes home, for he place will be built up ýat this rate.\" \"Five miles of sea-front liebetween bis and Falmoutb,\" observed Peggy erenely. \"After ail, fixe bouses wou't 'eally matter mucb; I thought they ooked rather nice. Who lives ln hem, do you know?\" \"Good graclous! 1 don't know,\" re- flied Miss Pragg with unnecessary ~mphasis. l'Yeu bave flot calied on any of thei iewcomers, then?\" said Peggy, witii issumed astonisbment. I!-I! Cai on a lot of upstarts?\" cried Miss Prngg, the light of battle n ber eyes. \"But bow do you 1\u003c11w tbey are upstarts, auntie? You just said you did flot know wbo lived in them!\" \"And 1 don't intend to know, eitber,\" etorted the eider lady firmly. \"R- tired shopkeepers, most probably, or miii people who want to forget their origin. Tbey always get disgustingly ricb-one eau t know sucb people.\" She spoke stiffly. 111 simply adore sbops, auntie,\" per- sisted Peggy wickediy, \"and the poor people that keep tbem must retire some time: and you forget old Lord Wentwell got ail bis mouey from mlîls.\"l \"Oh, that's dlifferent,\" said Miss Pragg obstinately. \"And didn't Sir William Blunt keep quite a small sbop when ho was a young man, -and it kept -getting bigger and bigger until ho was made Mayor, and afterwards he got knighted be- cause the King laid a found-ation stone or sometbing wheu be was In Office- and you know very well, auntie, you slmply adore Sir William!\" \"Rurbbish!\" declared Miss Pragg, looklng ont to sea, hastlly. \"Besid 'es, SIr William le a very fine man,\" she added inconsequently. *Auntie, you are the most Socialis- tic Conservatîve-or ConservatIve !So- clalst-I ever met,\" laugbed Peggy, \"and to-morrow moring 1 intend to make -a round of visite and leave my card on ail the newcomers.\" Miss Pragg looked at ber niece lu borrifled and undIsguised dismay. \"D 'EGGY, you muet not do .any- Itblng of the sort-lt's-lt's most imprudent,\" she remon- strated. \"Why Imprudent, Aunt Pragg?\" laugbed the girl. \"Have tbey got scarlet fever In the bouses?\" \"You know very well what I mean, Margaret. You know notbing about them. TI'ey mlght be anybody-re- tired burgars-or-or-\" Miss Pragg was rendered Inarticulate with alarm. \"How ]ovely,\" declared Peggy. *11 neyer met auy retired burglars; tbey muet be Interesting\"-tben, catching a look\u003c o! genuino distrese ou Mis Prs.gg's face, she became suddeuiy contrite. \"'Neyer mmnd, auntie dear; I promise you I wlll be most borribly proper aud atrocloisly rude. If I meet auy of these good people who live at our very gute 1 will stare stouily througb them as If tbey lu no0 way obstructed My view. I will Ignore their smlles. and give them a chiliy reception If tbey offer me suy civllltY whatever- I - $ 'Teoggy, iyou are Impossible,\" laughed Miss Pragg, lookIng dýecidedly re- leved. Peggy slghed aggressively. \"lTo think that I shahl nover be ablc ,to speak to that porfectly adorable looking youtb that 1 saw sucking the knob of- bis caue as I .passed the green gate o! the bouse on the loft 1 I do wish people would wear labels round their necks giviug an accurate description of tbemselves, their vedi- groG, their mens of living, and past and present occupation. It would save au awful lot of bother, wouldn'lt it, auntie?\" lu tragic toues. '\"Wbat rubbleh you do talk, chlid,\" remarked Miss Pragg severely. \"*You can!t Ignore class distinctions, especi- ally, lu these days when there are so mauy 'vulgar rlch.\"' \"Id-l rlcb,\" orreted Pegy, laughi' lug. l'Weil, If I muet not kuow any of the uew people tIil some oe vouchea for thoîr respectabllty, -teil me how ail the old eues are gong on. The Vances, for Instance. 1 must. drive over to thoîr place to-morro.\"",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. \"Nu good,\" laughed Miss Pragg; -they have let their house with the flshing and shooting, and taken a lit- tie villa outsîde Naples.\" \"Whatever for?\" asked Peggy, a shade of disappointment crossing hier face. \"I thînk they have to retrencli a bit. Kenneth is going in for the Church, and Cyril cost themn a lot at Cambridge; they intended hlmt for the Bar, but lie threw i Up and went inta poiitics. SD the poor things have ta make the best of a bad job, let their country house, and economize in Italy.\" \"What became of Ethel; did you ever hear, Aunt Pragg? She was sucli a pretty girl, i remember; but It la years since 1 saw hier. There always seems to be a sort of mystery about Ethel.\" \"Ethel Vance made an awful hash of things with lier marriage,\" said Miss Pragg grimly. 6iW1YTY, 1 thaught she made the NYmatch of the season wheni se marrled!\" exclalmed Peggy with surprise. \"Do tell me about it, auntie.\" \"One doesn't lîke ta talit about it,\" saiýd Miss Pragg siowIy; \"it lias near- ly killed lier mothee. Ethel was the idol af lier heart-;hie twa boys were simply nowhere. 0f course, wlien Ethel came out, na expense was spared, and the famlly were seriously crippled ln their frantlc efforts ta push hier into the front rank; certainly the girl was strikingly handsome, but 1 thouglit her vain and selfisli, and hier mother was a slave to ber. \"As she didn't carry off the prize ln lier first season, they went over to Ireland, letting their estate bere ta meet the drain 0f expenses. Tliey took letters of Introduction to the. Lord Lieutenant and other good familles, and entered Into ail the gaieties of a second court. \"At one of the ,,rand statle balis. Ethel met an officer attaclied ta tlit liouseliold. He was a dashing, band- some fellow, and iiie\u003e became madly infatuated with encli other, wltli the resuit that after a very short engage- ment, they had a brilliant and fasl- louable weddlng. \"Mrs. Vance was beside herseif with deliglit. But soon after the wed- ding the Boer War broke out, and wlien, amongst others, Ethel's hus. baud was calied ta the front, Ethi, with foolisli obstlnacy, insisted on going too. At flrst no one felt very anxîcus, but wlien month aiter moutli went by without word fromn lier daughter, Mrs. Vance became dlib- tracted witli anxlety. Bringing ail the influence she could ta bear upon the War Office, she was ailowed ta go ont lu a liospîtal slip wlth a detacliment of nurses.\" Miss Pragg Vaused as If unwilllng ta go on. 'Did she find Ethel '\" asked Peggy eagerly. 'Yes, she faund lier, after long ami painful searcli, found lier alone on tue ved, in the. tlny lut 0f a Kafir woman, lyiug on a buutfle of- strav, on the mud floor; and thora lier first baby was born wltli only the Kaf tir woman ta attend lier.\" \"Poor, poor girl! how terrible for lier!\" murmured Peggy softly. \"Dldi she live?\" \"Yes, she llved. Her liusband had ta look alter the. army suppi, of horses, and when lie was founld to have acquired large sums or mouey in the course of is transactions, sus- picion was àrolused at lieadquarters, au Inquiry look place, and, couvlcted cf dlieatlng and flagrant dlsliouesty, lie was dismissed the service in dis. grace.\", \"How awful, for lier--for ail or them,\" murmured Peggy in sliocked accents.. \"What became of thexu?\" \"Sýhe Is now keePIng a littie public- liouse in some remote corner of Wales, serviug behlnd a bar, whule lier bus- baud loafs about and does nothlng but abuse lier.\"1 \"How untlinkable,\" crled Peggy lu liorror. \"Of course the Vances neyer men- tIon lier namue; lier mother looks a cruslied and liaunted woman, and no doubt lielps lier wlthL mbney prlvately. Cyril lias given tliem a lot of trouble, Knit-to-form-knit from the best materials- knit to fit the varying types of men, women 4f4îand children, with scientific accuracy.M There is no chance work about Penmans Underwear. It must be as near perfection as A. 1. material and human ingenuity can make it, ---- before our trademark goes on. No. 95 natural wool garment is a very Iqepopular style and sure to please. Loo fo hstrdm in ____ on e4 --- FFODJ joaAM t Is~exe eM ceIf Fhafo The youngestd aegsenti for fýIIr îst anefari gor lu an exce thtas ras COfltipat infant. mnais bay the aond lan flb. tins, lu al Druggis. Fere t. Mots Wtetoday fo te e sud book \" Ins e otbaby', ta te. Canadienol Agen x ED ib UtLE 14~~~Fe tetsrja, mtORON 14Fr. J. r EaVE . ORNTO. N ANSWERING ADVERTISEMENTS MENTION \"THE CANADIAN COURIER.\" Electric Service» Means comfort, convenience, econoniy, and safety. The home that is completely equipped with electri- cal devices is a happy one. Ail the drudgery of housekeeping is eliminated by electricity. You can wash, iron, sew, sweep, cook, keep cool in summer and warmi in winter, by means of electrical apparatus designed especially to relieve you of un- necessary and fatiguing labor. At our showrooms ail these devices are ready for your inspection. Competent demonstrators will operate and explaîn themn for you. The Toronto Electric Light Co., Limited * AT YOUR SErRVICE\" z: Adowde St. E. Teléphffle Adelada 404 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 T 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1 l ý 1 1 1 TT= À 1 À l l l l 1 1 1 Ti Il _1_ . 1 ............ L 11 1 1 À À - - - - - - - - - - -",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. h The Supreme Luxury of Bicycliug is achîeved in the ~à - CLEVELànD HygÎenic Models Cushlofl springs be- tween rear forks and scat post-flexible con- nectlOns betwecfl low- er forks and hangter- and spring-cus4ilored, handie-bars add a we nderful sma othn';' ta thls famous wheel. Clevelanid WVheels se t a speedy pace, wlth utmoest cornfort ta the rider pver ANY road. ow \"MA WARalf TO \"le MAJ eVi' KINO GEoRGE vu -.de tao; but I think Kennetil wIll tura out ail riglit.\" Thare was a long silence, broken anly by the 10w lappinýg of the waves, andi the whisper of the breeze pass ing thraugh the fir trees; the bars of red andi purpie hati fadeti out of the sky, and the moon ahane with a -calt, luminaus whitenesa. Peggy abivereti. \"Aunt Pragg, ara there no happy marriagas ?\" as asketi piteausiy. -I0f course, chld-tliousands of thern. But those are the anas we don't hear about. There la no happi- ness sa perfect as a true marriage, no misery se great as a faise ane.\" \"It la -se difficult to tell beforeiattd how it. will turn out,\" breathed the girl. \"Itýit-frîghtens me, Aunt Pragg.\" Ail at once tears glitene in la er eyas, andi she rose suddenly andi kIssati bar aunt. l'Yeu will lielp me, auntie, won't you?\" site saiti rather wistfully. \"You bat i will,\" repliati Misa Pragg; wlth energy, as s rose from lier seat and entareti the bouse through the open Frenchi wlntiow. ;Margaret Assltas lingereti a ma- rnent longer on the balcony, looking out into the gatherlng darlinesa; thoan, with a stifieti siýgl, elle turneti andi foliawed iter aunt Into the llghted room. OHAPTER XV. Country Life. r E followilg morning, Margaret was Up anti out early. Sbe de- ligitet inl tbe old-faahioiiet groundis of Appietrea House. Dawd- iing la anti out of the rose gardexi, ae piucketi heavy bloorns for the break- fast tabla. lier basket was soon full of every shatie la rati, crimson, dam- ask, pink, anti pale rose; there wera creamy white anti pale yellow anas as Wel. Rambler roses climbeti over the aid atumps of big trees whlch bati been eut tiown, anti ran aioag trelliseti arches. The parfume of thte bias- soule acenteti thte whole gardoen, andi Margaret drew It la witb tielîcate an- joyiieitt. Passing frout the rose gardon, elbs palti a visit next ta the littie vinery wbich supplieti tbe table with black grapes. Tben able carrieti Ia ler spolia ta the housekeeper, anti was buBy arranglitg big china bowia ful of roses when Miss Pragg matie ber appearance Ia the breakfast room. IfWhat! have you basa out uireatiy, Peggy?\"I exalalmeti that lady with a laugb, as ha stooti for a moment watch- ing the active girl. III thouglit 1 was unconscloitably early tbls morning.' S' e tirew out ber watah anti coasulteti It wltb an air of vîrtue. \"I simply bad ta gat Up,\" tieclared Feggy, as s kisseti ber aunt;, \"It'e a positive crime te stop In beti on sucb a glorlous morning. I've been la the gardeot an bour already.\" :Peggy was trylng ta boîster u\u0026P a top-beavy bloomn that woulti perasi ln toppliitg over. \"Diti you ever ose sncb roses, Allai Pragg? Tbey are poslt'v51Y toc heâvy te o lt up,\"' salid tbe girl bap piuy. \"Jackson seema afrali ta cut then back, as ha auglit ta do,\" repiet Miel Pragg wlth a crîtical air. III tbîn) they ail want pruing beavily.\" I'Tbey are simply perfect,\" tieclare( Margaret, burying ber nase ln th4 fragrant bowl wblcb elbe bati pow ar rangeti ta lier satisfaction; \"anti 1 an simply starvlng. Do ring, auntie, ai jet them, know you are tiown.\" Misa Pragg was saveti the necesit,, of doing thia by the eutrance of thi olti butler, bearlng, wltb great dlgnit5 the silver coffee pot. The morning ineal over, Margare was out la tbe gardons agalu. Sb amusti baraelf witb searchtIlg thi strawberry botis, anti captureti larg barries bîIdden under the beavas--fa the climats waa marvellous anti, cou bineti witb the fertile soli, the sa-al anti the almoat perpetual anaMie, th seasoils seemeti ta gst complets! mixeti, s0 far as fruit anti flowers wer concerneti. Strawberries ripeneti 1 September for the second tîme, violai bloometi lu October, anti roses 'wer stilI pleritiful at Christmas. Margaret passeti through the ras gardon again into the orchard, wbere the applea hung thick upon the trees aond, stretching Up her arm, plucked the rosy fruit from the 10w boughs, eating it without plate or silver kaife, and declaring It tasted ail the better for the absence of these conventioflal adjuncta. She stooti lîstening for a moment ta the creaking of the windlass, as the under-gardefler drew up water from the weli; then s walked across ta the outhuldifigs andi, opening a door, calleti ta \"Roy,\" the big, brIndIeti bull- tiog, wbo nearly knocked ber over In bis buge delight at this attention, as ha gambolleti arounti ber with ele- phantine clumeineas. \u003cSbe stoopeti down to pat the dog, and tben turnati bacli ta the garden. \"We are going for a waik , Roy, Just ta finti out bow evarybody la!\" se explaîned. Roy testifieti bis deligbt at this an- nouncentent by naarly knocklng ber down again. \"You are really too« rougb, Roy- Yeu must bebave llt a gentleman,' elbs atimonisbed, as snle picked Up the saft, corduroy cap and replaced it on her head, wbence it bati fallen during bis last onslauglit. Roy wagged bis tail and sbowed the wbole of bis fine set of teatb In a broad grin, lifting up bis doggy brown eyes adoringly to ber face, \"Yeu dariing,\" crled the girl, stop- ping ta pat hlm again, \"*you are glad ta ses, me, aren't you. dear ?\" Roy sbowed ýunmIstakably that able bati quite inadequately stated the strengtb of bis affection. John Grey, standing at tbe door of the motar sbedi, watcbtng the tali, slim figure In ber country tweeds anti soft, cap, tirew In bis breatb sbarply as elbe stoopeti ta caress the dog. \"You tiarling,\" rapeateti the girl softiy, as tbe bull-dog looked up fit ber face; and tbe mnan went white ta the lips, anti turned baatily Into te sbedi. tiA BEUTIFUL wornan-and an BEAY dog,\" muttereti John Grey savagely. Yet under ordinary circumstances ha and Roy were the beat of friands. Captain Pragg was very fond of Roy, for be waa a pedigree tiog, andi bat won several'medals; but the exigen- cles of the Indien climate made it tnt- perative tbat he aboulti be loft at borne. The dog was a reserved and dignilled animal, anti alioweti no liberties ta b. taken witb hîm; aven tbe servante who tialY attendeti bis wants were rather afraid of bin, for be looked very for- midable at tintes. But no matter how long an Interval elapseti bstwef Peggy's visite ta Appîctree Houas, Roy neyer fargot ber, andi always bati a boisteraus welcome ta give. Tbey were making thelr way now along tbe country lana, Faggy alliiIg to the rosy-cheeoed children who bob- bati curtesys as she madie lier way tbroug the tiny village ln the direc- tion af a country vicarage standing by itsîf la the mitiat of fjelds. Truth te say, fi wau rather a dilapitiateti cob building, very dan'p, and covereti with virginia creeper of a deep bronze anti blood-reti colour. Several cows were la the fieldi wbich they bati ta cross, anti Roy looking aak- ance at them, anti bsing by nature dis- creet wbere borna were concerieti, kept close ta Peggy's aide, walking witb ataiti tignity. Arriveti at tbe wooden gats of tbe vicarage, Peggy turneti ta give him some necessary Instructions. r\"Yoiu are nat aven ta look at a cat, Roy, or I ahaîl bave ta leave you out- aide, fastened ta the gate.\"1 The tiog tbung his hoad. dejecteily. F R1ernembar yon are a visitor, anti tbe cat la at borne, anti you muet be- bave like a gentleman, or 1 caa't brlng r Yeu out calling witb me.\" Roy lfteti bi hs brown eyes wistfully te bers, anti .r waggeti bis tai! encouragiiglY. e The girl patteti bis gloasy coat anti, y pusbIng open the gate, paisseti up the ýe garden path. A big, yellow cet, sun- n ning bersîf an tbe windO'w sU! *sacramblet i p an adjacent tres no 'e quickly tbat sble looketi like a flash Ot golden light. Roy titi not show bY ýe tbe fliaker o\u0026 an eYttlaBh that he bati Floors -Walls -Ceiings- Every part of the bouse can be dry-dusted andi kept perfectly clean if you use P\" BQ\u0026 ( DRY DUSTLESS\") I*OpS a nd D ULs-t-e'r$ No o!! ta amear or stainna ail ta leave greasy marks on rugs and fur- nishingsno cil ta buy. Here are three of the mot popular styles of Tarbx ChemicallyTreated No-Qi Dry-Dusting Mops and Dusters:- Triangular Gooti for getting into carers and awkward places. The top le padded so that t cannat mar fumiture. . . $12 TARBOX Circular Dry-Dutîng Rather small-p er than the tri- angular moP. Particularly well adapteti for dustng wafll andi urider furniture. Aso padded. $ 1.00 TARBOX Floor Polisher Cavera a large surface and le gooti for halls and large floor apaces as well as for general purpases. Enda rubber tippped ta prevent Inarring. $ 1.50 The chemical action of Tarbox Mopa lasta as long as the fabric. Washing renewa their efficiency. At Departrocrt, General and Hardware Stores. Fromn 25e up to $2.0. Ask your Dealer. TARBOX BROS. Rear 274 Dundas St TORONTO Extradd MAUM- Not a headache ini a barrelful - and neyer makes you bilious. It's extra xnild and absolutely pure. MUORS ast Me Md net. bfflut vut Zmuste et patity, ane Ita rsmeBUdtiO Mways * we WIIITE MORSE .p«cly Il 7 est ttI Wot b S ou omWE Ibb WSt U t U U",
         "CANADIAN COURIERI. 31 noticed the sudden flight of bis beredi- tary enenïy. Peggy Iifted the latch of the front door and waiked In, foîlowed closely by the dog. *Any one at home?\" cried the girl gaily. She was answered by eudden screams of delight front varlous direc- tions. A tali, dark girl tore down- stairs and kissed her effusively; a cracked piano suddenly ceased from, troubling, and a tibm, leggy girl with a pigtail bursi. out like a cyclone and, got herseif inextricably mixed Up with Peggy, whlle from the kitchen a vision presented itself clad in an overail, w 11h doughy hands and round arms white with flour. At once there was a perfect hur- ricane of noise-babel w'as let loose. every one was talkîng at once, rnd no) one w-as able to hear a word of what the others were saying. Laughing and breathless, Peggy was pushed ani pulied Into the faded drawing-roorn, where she sank on to a sofa with brok- ,en Springs. Roy lay down at ber feet, silent but disapprovîng. A sudden hissing In the kitchen, ac- conïpanied by a strong erneli of bumn- irig, t-aused the girl ln the overail to give a, shriek amid rush out of the room. \"Gracious! there's the xnilk boiled ovpr!\" she cried. \"Another burnt blanc-tuange,\" groaîî- ed Albert, a tal, -sunburnt youtb wbo bad just strolled ln from the vegetable gardený ta learu the cause of ail the noise, and now smillngly advanced te shake hands 'witb tbe visiter, a big black collte following at bis beels. Roy sat up expectantly, and the two dogs exchanged civIlities, the collle throw- ing herseif full lengtb on the bearth- rug, and laying ber head on ber paws witb assumed indit'ference, ber eyes fixed on Roy, who thuumped lis tall and grinned at ber from ear to ear. \"It Is ail tny fault,\" laughed I'eggy. S OT at ail,\" protested the \"N youth; \"we are used to Mil- .dred's cooking\"-tlîls ungal- lantly. \"Wbat bas happened to Foliy?\" asked Margaret. \"Ob-Pofly! She has gone to one of the new bouses; they offered her double the wages we could afford,-' was tbe united answer. \"110w mean,\" crled, Margaret in- dIgnantly. \"I1 sbouidn't bave tbougbt Polly wouîd have llstened tb them.\"1 \"Oh, weil, sbe wants ta get married next year, anid Is saving mrp to furnisb. I suppose she thought ît would be a good belp to get double wages. One can't blame ber. Nobody can keep the servants tbey brIng with them here, you see. It ls too lonely, unless tbey are brougbt up ta lt-no theatres, no picture shows, no young men. You would be surprised how bard It Is to keep a girl here!\" \"That la why we are al dolng our own work,\"1 said Albert gloomily. \"Mabel does the beds-jolly Iumpy tey are too, at limes,\" be remarlted, wlt a brother's candeur. \"Maud teaches hersel! the piano, and Mild- red does the cooklng-oh, my!\" He doubied UP as If suffering from acute indigestion. \"And pray, wbat do you do--except grunbie ?\" asked Margaret witb severity. \"I? Oh, I smperlntend the others,\", replIed Albert easil\u0026, 4'and-er-dig UP tbe vegetables, harness the pony and drive te Falmouth te do the shopping; occasionally I eut tbe grass or water the garden-in fact, do ail sorts of odd jobs-pump the water-and-er- clean my own boots,\" he condluded tragieaîîy. \"It aJeems a long time oince they were cleaned,\" observed Peggy, look- lng aI them. crIically. \"We\"lead the simple lfe bere,\" re- turned'Aibert, looking at bis soli-laden boots serenely; \"the 'back to the land,' 'close te nature' life-you under- rstand! ,,It Is very beautiful-in tbeory,\" lie added earnestly. \"And what la It in practice?\" laughed Peggy. \"Cblwlily backache.\"1 groanéd Aklbert feeltngly. \"I'm simply worked to death.\" (To be centInued.) PRINTING. ]SITIN'G CARDS-LadieS' or Gentie- mnprlnted, to order-lates. stYlez* fty cents per hundred, post-paid. Frank H. Barnard. Printer, 35 1)undas Street, Toronto. INVESTMENTS. FREFOR SIX MONTHS-MY SPEý CAL offer to fntroduce my magazine 'LNVESTING FOR PROFIT.\" It la worth $10 a copy ta anyone who bas been getting poorer wvhite the ricb, richièr. It demonstrates the REAL earning power of moneY. and shows how anyone, n0 matter how poor, CAN acquire rIche$ý INVESTING FOR PROFIT is the onl.v progressive financiai journal pubiished. Il shows bow $100 grows te $2,200. Write NOW and l'il send it six months free. M. L. Barber, 465 28 W. Jackson Blvd., Chicago. \"AMN THE MLET.\" By A. Lamp- first édition. State price and condition. 1. ddress \"Bookma\u0026n,\", \"Canadian ('ourler\" Toronto. PATENTSi . A btVOReyour M(\u003eDEL sixud b built 1 Our modern machine shop and tools are ai your service. We are the only mnanu- facturing attorneys in the world. Get our advice regarding your Invention. Ail advlce free. The 'Patent Selling and 'Manufacturing Agency, 22 Coilege Street, Toronto. W TRITE for our Inventors' book, -Pro- y tective Patents.\" Tells howý to i'i vent and dispose of patents. Trade- marks registered ail countries. Rohb \u0026 Robb. 287-290 Southern Bldg., Washing- ton, D.C. HELP WANTEO. dANADIAN GOVERNMENT EXAMIN- \"1 ATIONS for raiiway mail clerks everywhere suon; cîtIzens over 15 eligi- bie; big pay; yearly vacation with foul pay; sample questions, free; write ti- mediateiy. Franklin Institute, Dep' t. F175, Rochester, N.Y. EDUCATION. chanical drawing and machine designs taught by mail. Write Canadian Corre- spon)fdelce ('ollege. Limited, ]Jept. K., Toronto, ('an. STAMPS AND COINS. PACKAGE free to coliectors for 2 cents postage; aise effer hundred different foreign stamps; catalogue; hinges; tive cents. \\Ve buy stamps. Marks StamP Co0., Toronto. BAKERS' OVENS. 11uBBARD PAxTENT PORTABLE Ovens Plans suppled; iatest xnachinery; lowest pricë,ý: eia.e free- Warren Manufacturing Co., 782 King West, To- ronto _ _ _ _ _ BOOKS. Aj IESK3OOT- or ErrtORàS iý-NCN- TISH, b', F H. vizetelly, Is an In- valuabie text book for those who are par- tictillar about tle language they use. ('ioth. $1.00. pmo't-raid, Norman Richard- son, 12 E. Welllncrton St.. Toronto. CLASSIFIED ADVERTISING",
         "In the Growth of COrn There's a time when the kernels are plumped out with a sweet, nutntious \"milk.\" As the corn ripens this \" milk\"\" slowly hardens and finally btcomes the flinty, pearly white part of the kemel. Post Toasties are made from this best part, carefully cooked, rolled into thin bits, then toasted to a delicate golden brown, without touch of hand. Ready to eat! Add cream-and a littie sugar if you like. One doesn't for- get the delicious \"Toastie\" flavor. Ask your grocer-anywhere- Post ToastieAOhs"
      ],
